body at various altitudes. An excellent adventure story for both men and women.
I also was really looking forward to reading this book but had to force myself to finish. As a redhead, I feel armed with some more knowledge about the history of redheads but was left... hanging, somehow.I found it disjointed and it was not an enjoyable read.
Since I have a red-headed daughter, this sounded lioke a fun book to read. I gave it up just about 1/3 of the way through. Maybe it got better but I wasn't going to stay around to find out. The author really stretched it to make her point. Her point? Maybe becasue she's a redhead, she wanted to be so very, very special, so she took a few supposed facts and made a whole concept from them. Come on! Trying to make redheads all some sort of special witches, monmsters, super-human people was dumb. And she totally dissed red-headed men. My husband read it through but we both quickly decided NOT to send it to our daughter.
I really wanted to love this moisturizer! I have very fair, sensitive skin, and this was supposed to be one of the best bets for my skin type. It also has a great high SPF.But, alas it does not sink into my skin. It does not blend well at all. It leaves a terrible white residue that takes forever to rub in.Maybe because of the high SPF? I am not sure,but I was definitely disappointed.
The series is excellent and faithful to the literary history surrounding the Robin Hood legends. Clannad's music adds a bit of authenticity, as does the use of magic and superstition, and the UK setting.Acorn did a reasonably good job digitizing and adding subtitles to the original film. Colour was on the dark side, but nothing that can't be adjusted.The poor packaging of the 'complete' set prevents me from giving it a perfect score. I like the look and the folding-book concept of it, but the casing is made of hard plastic, making it prone to chipping and difficult to remove the DVDs carefully without breaking or cracking them. I had a similar problem with the "I Spy - Four-Pack Collection" cases. So, take care to remove the DVDs lest you damage them permanently. You might consider alternative storage like a plastic CD envelope case, considering this DVD set is not cheap.Aside from this, I highly recommend the complete Robin Hood set.
Picture is fuzzy not digitallly remastered. Also Disk 2 had a glitch in it on the first play. Disk is clean. Over all quality is not great.
The image shown is EXACTLY what you'll get; it isn't misrepresented on Amazon. The package is mis-leading. It clearly shows a 2.2 mm Hex-nut. It does not work on any glasses that have a hex-nut. In fact, I was about read to toss it out, when I went and took a dental-pick and pick some plastic or parafin out of the tip of it--when I finally got it to work on my CostCo glasses that use a "star" driver. It contains a tiny phillips head, tiny flat-head, and the "star" driver. No hex-nut. I'm going to have to order something else. Isn't worth my time and frustration to send it back.
What makes this film truly great is how many different styles of comedy it has. You see not only slapstick and situation based comedy, but also some fabulous dialog and scare comedy. I didn't want to watch this movie at first, thinking it'd be a run of the mill b/w film, but was amazed, and immediately rewound and watched it a second time.
This book is a pure pleasure reading for anyone interested in statistics, but wants to have a break from formulas and software! In fact, I would make it a must read for all citizens who are bombarded by over-complicated news about all areas of our life.
Someone once said "there are three kinds of liars: liars, damn liars, and statisticians."I read this book in high school, and it shaped my judgement of the news media, business, and advertising ever since. Never trust the numbers without knowing their basis, and remember: a statistician is the type of guy who would put his head in an oven, and his feet in a bucket of ice, and say that, on average, he felt fine.
Although "How to Lie with Statistics" is a bit dated (having been written in the 1950's), the principles it puts forth are still valid today--if not moreso than ever--and the material is delivered in clear, concise, and even entertaining anecdotes and illustrations.How often do you hear statistics bandied about in the media or used to try to prove some special-interest point? "Of course" the people quoting the figures must be right with numbers on their sides... until you look at just how those numbers were arrived at.This book isn't truly a guide on how to lie with statistics, but it is an excellent text that informs the reader both how others will lie to them using statistics and on how to interpret the validity of purported statistical data.
How to Lie with Statistics is a fun and informative look at the was in which statisticians try to decieve the public with misleading statistics. Every chapter contains plenty of real-world examles that provide excellent insight into the concepts. The book is a quick read (only 142 pages) and it holds the reader's attention; both are necessities for an educational work. How to Lie with Statistics is perfect for the beginning statistics student or anyone who wants to learn how they can be decieved through the manipulation of numbers. The reading level and math make this more appropriate for high school or college students than for younger students. Using three randomly selected paragraphs, the mean Flesch-Kincaid grade level was 10.4; thus this book is excellent for sophomores or advanced freshman. Although the writing is a little dated (1954), it is still clear and highly relevant. Overall, this is a highly recommended and worthwhile read.
This book is a very good primer for getting one's feet wet in the world of non-profit organizations. While it is by no means exhaustive, it is certainly broad and deep enough for anyone to run their non-profit more efficiently and more ethically. It covers excellent project, team and board building strategies, as well as nearly every type of fundraising and solicitation. Additionally, there is good information on employing the internet for communication, engagement and fundraising -- STILL a fairly new field for many.Appendices A-C cover some very good tools and examples. Though the listed government grant sources in appendix D focus mainly upon the Humanities and the Arts, valuable web sources are given for finding grants in other areas.
not really what i wanted xxxxv xxxxx xxxx xx xxxxx xxxxx xxx xx xxx x xxxxx xxxx zzzz zzzz zzzz
This collection amounts to three dollar-store discs jammed into a pretty package. For those who prefer substance over style, look elsewhere for this material, which is given a pretty shoddy presentation overall.Disc 3 (which was unplayable on the two DVD players I tried it on) repeats the entire contents of Disc 2, and adds the TV pilots Kook's Tour and Jerks Of All Trades -- making Disc 2 a pointless redundancy. Avoid it at all costs.
You get what you pay for with this set. Only contains maybe an hour of classic stooge fun. It may fill the gap in someones collection, but mostly contains fillers and short dvds. It appears to be a collection of videos that no one else wanted. One full DVD is the lame three stooges cartoons. If you are looking for classic stooge comedy this set contains very little.
The price was attractive, as was the packaging. The box shows Curly. But alas - Curly is not easily found in this compilation. Also - a lot of the "extra features" are lame. Stay away from this product. If you really want the Three Stooges - buy the 8 volume compilation from Sony instead.
The Three stooges( Collectors Edition)The box says "7DVDs over 11 hours" what they dont say is that there are only 4 classic stooges shorts and only on the first DVD. The rest of the set is crap. The reamaining 6 1/2 dvds /10 hours are patched together bad movies and cartoons ( remember the really bad stooges cartoons you wouldnt even watch back in the 60's) It is intentionaly misrepresented. The packaging is first class, a real eyegrabber, but whats inside is junk.
i read this book many yeawrs ago and decided to buy it again and read it. I enjoyed it but will not read it again.
Go to a used bookstore. Search the internet. Scour the newsgroups. And find this book. I have never read a novel before nor since that has the power to terrify the way the late Tryon does here. His mastery of sentence structure alone puts him above the vast majority of horror novelists. Simply a sensational piece of work -- and a travesty that it's out of print.
cheeks grove is the hook on this cd . chico has that groovy back beat and always a top notch band....worth a listen BIG DADDY
As philosophy of science this work is very fascinating. Unfortunately it is permeated with rather Marxist ideas which the author seems to cherish. But, as an incissive criticism of reductionist science, especially biology, it is very good.
Reading this is reading a master at work. Pinsky wields so much skill it's ridiculous. Reading the poems here is like listening to an intelligent, old man sitting in a chair somewhere in a field, giving his thoughts free rein, following them where they land. In my opinion, the poem "The Figured Wheel" is a lyrical, breath-taking masterpiece.
Pinsky is in love with being a poet, but his poems don't mean anything to the rest of us. This book is a perfect example of this. We are supposed to admire him, not read him, and I find it a shame that this lousy work got him a Luareateship.
I like em a lot, wife thinks they're the best cereal she's ever had, teen daughter thinks they taste just a bit better than hamster food, the others here like them enough. Bags are pretty small but still a good enough deal that I'll buy again, just too good (and a unique flavor...really like the pumpkin seeds in them) not to.
This is a great resource for victorious living! It shows the consequences of choices each of us make in our lives and how important it is to make the right choice to live a life of true freedom and liberty! It is a quick read - I was fascinated with the stories shared from the beginning and had a hard time putting the book down! I got copies for my family to help encourage them as they are getting ready to enter the "dating" stage of their lives to help them stay on course and help give them the tools to save themselves for marriage as God intended. I highly recommend this book - whether you're married or single!!
This is a fine Randolph Scott film. Unfortunately the DVD has interference on the audio channel (bass-heavy contemporary music, as if someone was playing something through the board when the transfer was made) and the print itself shows damage in places. I have never encountered a major studio release with this level of audio interference. Thanks for caring, Columbia Pictures!
Item was just as described. Very nice fit...does not slip down your leg and also securely holds your weapon. I would definitely buy this again. Perfect
Ruarke is rightfully called the master of outdoor writing. This is a fabulously written story of his first safari in Kenya and Tanganyika (now Tanzania). It is a must read for anyone who enjoys outdoor literature, hunting stories, or Africa.
This eight pound bag lasts our cockatoo 2-3 months. Way more economical to buy here on Amazon than in the store. We reseal it for storage, and use it well before it goes stale (colours and smells still vibrant).
I have to say I haven't actually read this book, but I feel like if you are considering giving this author a chance to influence your eternal salvation, you ought to give the nice people who come knocking at your door a chance too. Then pray about what you have learned and decide for yourself. But if you want to celebrate over Choco Tacos, you would have to go to Taco Johns, I used to work there and they are the ones who sell the tasty treat. (see other reviews for this book to understand what I am talking about!)
It's the truth that early Mormon leaders told fanciful tales about Moon Men and the Lost Ten Tribes . . . to their kids at bedtime. It seems there's a difference between what a Mormon leader says from the puplit as official doctrine, and what they say having fun with their family. It's the same with anyone. This book takes snippets from private journals and attempts to pass them off as official doctrine. As a How-To Book, this one just doesn't work.A better book to buy from Amazon on this subject is Tinkling Cymbals and Sounding Brass : The Art of Telling Tales About Joseph Smith and Brigham Young (The Collected Works of Hugh Nibley, Vol 11) . Hugh Nibley, David J. Whittaker (Editor) / Hardcover / Published 1991
Don't get me wrong, "Harriet the Spy," was one of my all time favorite books (and movies), growing up. I'm almost 26 now and had always wanted to read "The Long Secret," So after re-reading Harriet, I went to the bookstore and ordered myself a copy. Well, at first it wasn't so bad, but there really wasn't any real point to the story. Harriet hadn't matured much at all, and to make matters worse, really offensive and hostile notes were left all over the place. I am also a Christian and find it offensive that the phrase "Jesus Hates You," should be allowed to be published in a Children's book. This is especially true in this day and age, when almost any threat has the potential to turn violent.Skip this one.
just didn't like this book. it seem to be crude and it's really a book for girls only.
This product is light in weight and good for smaller non parralel limb bows. I have a Mathews Reezen and it was too small. Amazon has a great return policy and traded for Plano Max XT.
This book presents a marian version of the traditional Greek orthodox Jesus prayer. Instead of "Lord Jesus Christ, son of the living God, have mercy on me a sinner", Sister reveals that Jesus has told her to constantly repeat the phrase "Jesus, Mary, I love you. Save souls." While on the surface the prayer is very simple, it is difficult in practice because of the requirements of purity of mind, intense desire, and continuous repetition. Sister says that Jesus finds the prayer most pleasing, of great benefit to all souls, living and deceased, and with the help of grace, can be done by anyone. This is a method of prayer for the "littlest ones" of all ages.
I returned this product. The legs were too big and the waist too small. I looked like I was in a strait jacket. I have the high back waist cincher and am pleased with it, other than the rubber smell I can't elimate, but this product sucks!
Leaving the issues for apostates and apologists to bicker over, this book simply looks at the lives of people actually in the church: what they do in their normal every day lives. I especially liked the depictions of Latter-Day Saints in nations outside the United States, including the temple trip down the Amazon and a few shots of Victoria Peak! Beliver or no, these pictures tell 10,000 words about a people that are industrious, optimistic, and compassionate. These photos aver that while many continue to criticize and ostracize this church, the Latter-Day Saints frequently hold the moral/ethical highground on their idealogical opponents. How many other 200-year old American religions would stand under this kind of across-the-globe scrutiny? This book contains real, in your face, irrefutable evidence that like them nor not, the Mormons are indeed a "peculiar people."
I enjoyed this book a great deal. The story was very interesting and kept the reader guessing. I thought that many issues in the book were easy for students to relate to even today. The author didn't pull any punches in this startling work. I enjoyed this book and recommend it for students in sixth grade and up.
I have never read a book that was so boring. The book talked about a jewish girl helping out a nazi. Nothing happens inthe begining and the climax is the girl housing the nati. WOW,NOT! Weas a class read this book as a class and i asked everyone what they thought of the book. They all agreed with me!
Although at first glance the book seems to have a good plot, it does not. I didn't like the character of Patty, she seemed so pathetic and she whined too much. The relationship between Patty and Anton is very disturbing, becuase Patty is weird about how she reactes when she is around Anton. The book disturbed me.
This was a present for my boyfriend. He seems to like it. It arrived in a very reasonable time. It seems to be very sturdy and easy to operate.
This book was an interesting reading for me. It was one of the best school readings I have been assigned. It was a up front look at a man looking to uncover his fathers past. His style of writing was upfront and direct. We did not feel compelled to censor his minds work of placing swear words in the text where needed, or being vague about intimate love sessions that had taken place. I most enjoyed the idea of the go-cart club. The inventiveness of having this club to lure in the king is one of the most original ideas that I have read in a long while. The book also has a sense of being a bit personal. I do not know Henry Bromell, only that he is good friends with ny english teacher, but from reading this book I have a sense that I know a little about him. That is why I believe people write books, is to allow the readers to have a brief glimpse inside the authors mind and life. He has, in my opinion, succeeded in doing so with Little America.
Fine as an introduction to Duncan, but not for serious study. At best, this is a "Greatest Hits" record--though that said, it's a bit like buying Bob Dylan's Greatest Hits. It's good in that it touches every portion of his career, but since Duncan worked so fiercely in the poetics of the series and the idea of "the book of poetry," ultimately it leaves the reader wanting.
We outgrew our 8x8 tents with the kids, so we bought this tent preparing for our next camp trip. We test it out at our back yard right after we bought it. It's easy to set up, and roommy. However, the zippers are done in very low end quality. The window zippers work ok, but both the door zipper did not work well! The mesh zipper will open up after you zipped it. The door zipper is not well stiched on one side! And it's hard to zip it around.We are return it back to the store tomorrow!
i bought this tent brand new and had it for one year and opened it up one time to put it up and brought on a fishing trip and the string thats in the tent poles broke in 3 places. and the zippers are terrible always get caught.its roomy but its cheap!
This rice cooker works great. My only complaint is with Amazon. This is the 2nd non-book item I've ordered from Amazon and I don't understand why these items are only shipped in their mfg packaging with no exterior boxing. Thankfully this item arrived in good shape. This is something to think about when ordering non-book items from Amazon.
If your a fan of the games you will enjoy the anime watching the familiar characters I like the dubbing I am a dubb person I perfer it, so its rare I ever complaint about it. Good series having played the games you will enjoy it more. Art style is diffrent its a good different nice change . For the price I paid 13 bucks its worth it
Maybe it was my bad to buy a knockoff product that was so cheap. Compared to Gum brand picks, Doctor's BrushPicks are unusable. The picks have no flexibility or give. Maybe I could use them to clean out tiny metal machine parts.
This Dvd is amazing. Braid is rock at its finest. If you get a chance you must see them on their reunion tour. The extras are hands down the best on any live dvd I have seen. This knocked the Impossibles Never Say Goodbye Dvd out of my player finally.
this book was written before the pci express standard was ratified so much of the information is speculative. nevertheless, it is well written and complete.
I USED to LOVE this perfume and used for years. But the last two times I bought it from Perfume World or I give someone to use, I have noticed that it smells worse than sweat - horrible. I don’t believe this is the original perfume. Something somewhere is not right with it. But the original (real Paloma Picasso) was excellent. Everyone used to ask me what I was wearing and where to get it! My $60 down the drain! Next time will try to buy from Macys like I used to and see if I can get the original Paloma.
Yoo's arguments in favor of an essentially unchecked executive fly in the face of everything that the Founders intended when creating our great country. He is undoubtedly intelligent, given the prowess with which he manipulates the Constitution and legal precepts into seemingly supporting his own theory. Despite the packaging, however, the fundamental basis for his theory is fatally flawed. He is, at his core, merely an opportunist who advocates theories for the sole purpose of furthering his own career, rather than because they actually have merit. In other words, he's just a hack at heart. This book isn't worth your time or money.
This book contains exactly one chapter on hydroponics and it's not a very good chapter. As a general book on growing, it's not bad, but anything that purports itself as being a "grow bible" should include extensive information on evaluating hydroponics systems and mediums and how to use and maintain them throughout a grow. This book contains some information on this, but not nearly enough. For whatever reasons, it includes far more information on genetics and breeding, but most growers I know buy clones or seeds. Those pages would have been better devoted to all things hydroponics.Is there a good book focused primarily on indoor hydroponic growing? Not sure I need it now, but it would have been great to have a few months back.
Some ideas in this book are as helpful as any newspapers' garden section. There are EVIDENT growing ERRORS in this book. If you are a beginner or intermediate grower, this book may misguide your gardening efforts. If you want real facts, there are better sources out there.
This book was a great find! It has more information than pictures which is okay, it is very descript in its information and easy to read. I'd recommend this book to anyone looking to further their knowlegde in this art.
This book never shipped. ordered over 6 weeks ago. Smazon still says ships within 1-3 weeks. it has been 4 weeks past their estimated ship date. So don't bother ordering this book.
This book is a sure snooze-fest. Luckily for me I did not have to read the entire book for my undergrad art history photo class. We read selected chapters of the book.They writing was horrible. Many parts were unclear. I had to reread what I read over and over. I can't stand this style of writing. Barthes attempts to come off as interesting and intelligent. Instead, he comes off as boring and pretentious.Skip this book... try something else.
It is my belief that people who really know what they are talking about can explain their thoughts clearly. I cannot be sure if the fault in this book is with the original author or the translator, but it certainly does not measure up to this criterion. It may be of interest to photography academics, but I doubt if a photographer will get much out of it that is useful.
I had this VHS tape years ago but no longer own it. I'm looking for the DVD version of it because it is one of the most enjoyable work-outs tapes I've ever done...and I've done a lot of them.
This is a great intermediate video. It's one of my favorites. It's set to Motown music and it's very fun. The moves are dancy but Donna has great cueing and after a couple of times you get it down. I don't like videos that are easy the first couple of times through because I get bored to fast. I recommend this video to anyone who enjoys dancy aerobics. IT'S FUN!
For the first time, I read a book in which I thought the artist was sitting in the room and telling me about her life. The is one of the most inspiring, eclectic, and electrifying books I have ever read. It's just fabulous.
I admit I did not read the back of this CD carefully. I happily bought it and popped it into the CD player anticipating the wonderful tunes I had heard throughout the movie. But my favorites weren't there. The most important missing item? It's Tough To Be A God as sung by the stars of the movie. Elton John's duet with Randy Newman just isn't as much fun. It's not a bad album really. I was just disappointed.
The king of Crocodile Rock lost his teeth 25 years ago but here he is -again! - plugging away in geezer FM heaven. While old pharts may love the way John's campy cream puff crooning fluffs up their Depends, kids will absolutely hate this flaccidly-themed soundtrack of paint-by-number sugar pop fizz and bombastic lik-a-stik storytelling. Incredibly, The Road to El Doh!rado is worse than Elt's last Tim Rice collaboration AIDA, the 1999 multi-guest stinker currently being loaded in skeet machines around the world. Indeed, the only level this one works on is a cheap alternative for parents who want to sedate their hyperactive whippersnappers without having to shell out big bucks for a Ritalin prescription. Give it a rest Elton, for gawd's sake.
i was thinking that this was a cd where the music was taken from the movie, not all resung by elton john. the songs lost the flavor i was looking for. if you're an elton john fan you probably would like it
Totally fun and captivating with creativty for children 3-13 plus lots of stuff for older brothers/sisters as well as Mon/Dad or any extended family member to partake in. Great pace for ALL. Perfect music and voice and a nice outdoor background lending itself to an uplifting and yet mellow mood.Everyone will be inspired to increase their mental/emotional calmness, physical coordination, flexibility as well as focus of mind alone and with friends/family.
The book I ordered was a gift. I am sure they will enjoy reading it but it took a very long time to get here. Disappointed in that!
Once I started reading this book, I could not put it down. It gave me even more respect for those of this generation. After reading this book, I had to order Mr. Brokaw's other books.
Excellent book with profiles of folks who survived WWII and came back to our country to make a productive life for themselves. The format is very readable and the stories enjoyable despite some very serious pictures presented of the war.
Tom Brokaw has chosen a fanastic topic: the Baby boomers' parents. Their life & times, trials & stamina through the Depression, war(s), and raising families. I wish an author with a bit of distance and vision would have done the actual writing of this book. As it is, Brokaw cannonizes his subjects and does a poor job telling the real story. I hope this topic gets explored further by someone other than Brokaw, who has little talent as a writer. I was very disappointed reading this book and I made the mistake of buying gift copies for my elderly war vet friend & neighbors, and my own Father without pre-reading it. Live and learn, I guess. Sorry, I had expectations of being thrilled with this book...but wasn't.
Rather than letting his subjects tell their stories Brokaw interjects his politics and philosophy. I donated my copy to the city library. Instead, read Studs Terkel's "The Good War." It "is" what Brokaw could have "had", if he would have imitated the master oral biographer.
Mr. brokaw couldn't possibly imagine the conditions under which most young men were living when called upon to save their nation.Mr.Brokaw found mostly officers to interview,most of whom went into the service as officers,and later became politicians. Where are the uneducated,poverty stricken youths who went into the armed forces,fought and died for their country, and, those who survived,returned to their former lives little better off than before being drafted? The author never mentioned the fact that machinery is always in place to keep our rich youths out of the service,making their service in our armed forces strictly voluntary; and always as officers,most-repeat-,most of whom never heard a shot fired,the exception proving the rule
A very moving and informative book. A friend gave me this book shortly after my father passed. After reading it it made me realize what my father went through when he was in WWII. This book helped me bring me closer to my father.This book is full of stories of WWII vets, what happened to them, and how it changed there life, and how they succeeded.
I am tremendously inspired by the stories contained in this book. The American spirit during WWII is unequalled especially compared to the sick societies of Japan and Germany. Whether this generation is the "greatest" or not, there is no doubt in my mind that the cooperative effort that was required to defend freedom and defeat the fascists is without a doubt the greatest effort in history.
Mostly pontification. Where's the scholarship? The only reason I sat through this one was that it was an audio book and I was on an eight hour drive. If this is the greatest generation, I'm in the generation that got the bill. This book glossed over most everything. If anything it proved the opposite of its title.
Brokaw writes not like a veteran newsman, but like an awestruck, hero-worshipping kid. That's not a crime, but one expects more from a man with Brokaw's experience and training. I felt the text was very shallow -- especially in the final section when he interviews celebrities. One doesn't learn a lot in this section. Nor does one get any meaningful insights. I also felt there was a tremendous "sameness" about the interviews. Surely, there were people who had bitter memories or less than passionately patriotic views. Brokaw could have presented a more accurate picture of the generation by including a dissenting opinion or two. Regrettably, one has to wonder about the accuracy of his reporting on NBC News.
I used to enjoy Tom Brokaw when he was NBC anchor man as a critical and competent journalist. His book however is a real disappiontment. For me, belonging to the post-war generation, it reads as a very shallow "hurra-patriotism" story, without any ctitical investigation of the time priode he covers. Not everything this generation did was so great and I would have expected from a critical journalist like Tom Brokaw to take this aspect into consideration as well. In this sense it is not very demanding book.
I bought some because it was advertised as "A healthy snack choice..." only to find out when it arrived that it has half a gram of trans fat per serving due to its use of a partially hydrogenated oil.
Years ago, I had purchased some VTech products and was very displeased with the their quality. At that time, I swore never to buy VTech again.While recently seeking cordless phones with speakerphone options, I came across the i6775. The price was right, and some time had passed, so I bought two sets (home and office) in June, 2006.There's only a three month warranty on these units, and one set recently (11-2006) died. After finally getting through to VTech support and troubleshooting with them, we couldn't revive the system. The phones are useless, and I'm stuck with them.You can guess my advice.
looks cool. Key word people "looks" cool, it isn't bullet proof, please don't think it is, or that pockets make you look the part.
This book along with all other books and seminars on tech analysis are mere ploys to make the authors wealthy.
I bought the book because I think it is of the latest edition (edition 9?). But obviously, it is not, although it is printed in 2008.Amazon should specify the edition of the book!
These paper back editions are pirated and unauthorized. They do not contain the modern emendations.DO NOT BE DECEIVED AND IF YOU HAVE ALREADY BOUGHT IT PROTEST TO AMAZON.
The book is the reprint of a old edition date back 1948 with some little update up to 1963. The Amazon's Search-Inside(TM) refer to another update version of the book (9 ed.). The book's style and content is very old, the charts are hand-made and frankly speaking now it's possible to do much better and the calculation of indicators now can be exact. If you are interested to the prehistory of technical analysis a would suggest "Welles Wilder - New Concepts in Technical Trading Systems". Modern and better books are those of Achelis and Colby.
Hello Champions, this IS NOT an OFFICIAL 2 Skinnee J's Digital Download! Support THE BAND by downloading it from the band's official website webstore (2SJ.com) where it's available for LESS MONEY and in Hi-Res format!-=AA/2SJ
When you hear the term rap-rock these days, you probably think of artists like Limp Bizkit and Kid Rock. But the label applies just as well to 2 Skinnee J's. The J's mix Beastie Boys-style old-school rap with guitar riffs and a healthy dose of humor. Clear some dance space in your bedroom and shout along to the hilarious "Stockholm Love."Best Song: "3 Minutes"
This is a great bathroom reader. I find that the references to geographical locations as the word names a bit off, but I imagine inventing new words would be quite challenging.
This is a very good CD. There is no song on this CD that I don't like, even though the radio only plays one song.
Johnson, a clinical psychologist who is a graduate of Fuller Seminary and Fuller Graduate School of Psychology, writes a clear and careful study of the psychological factors that can unconsciously affect the way people read the Bible. He points out how issues of perception, cognitive process, social interaction, and culture can shape how a person interprets scripture. He writes from a committed Evangelical position, and is not by any means reducing the meaning of scripture to merely human processes or psychology. Still, he does caution against the naivete that says, "I don't interpret the Bible, I just read what it says."This is an essential volume for anyone interested in psychology, religion, and the Bible.
My Dell 2650 has 256mb of ram total. More then one program running and it would slow down sometimes freeze. I took out the two 128mb sticks and purchased two of these, getting a total of 512mb. Its still not a lot compared to modern laptops, but it was a noticeable improvement. Now I can get on the internet while a program is running and not have it slow down. Nice product.
The introduction mix with lot of unusual verbal, loud and unpleasant voice!!! I don't understand it even... But I like Seane demonstration. Seane is a fantastic demonstrator, that's advantage of her. The sequence is really senseless for detox flow. But it's good for beginner without full audio mix.I'd like to ask why the video starts with about 20 minutes of advertisement? Its something they give this DVD as free gift...I tried both workout Twist and flow, Purify... Really its not going to work with detox. Well, I agree that She studied Pattabhi jois Ashtanga yoga sequence with someone and use that for her sequence. Actually here the sun salutation A and B help to open your body, after the body opening, her sequence like warm down your body. I may try with traditional sun salutation with detox flow. Lets see, how its work. Anyhow, I'm not going to play this DVD again.
all the songs in my opinion are very cheesey. I only like the first song. the rest....are all CHEEZY!
I am more of a traditional gospel person but as I mature in the Lord, I'm able to get pass all of the hip-hop and hype of the music and get the message that's being sung. I am a big fan of Percy Grey, Jr. and I think that his helping produce this project is what gave it that taste of "chuch!" Overall I say that the project is good and I believe that it will bless the listeners.
I bought this CD in hopes that some of Destiny's Child's songs would get a better beat or become more interesting for dancing. What I got was a horrible butchering of "Emotion," a never-ending "Bootylicious," a "Say My Name" mix anyone would be more than happy to do without and mixes of songs that weren't very good the first time around- several weren't even singles! (Dot, Nasty Girl, So Good)To make that sound better, they throw in Independent Women Pt. II, which is taken directly from "Survivor," and hawk a song from Michelle Williams' upcoming solo debut (Heart to Your, Apr. 16). It's sad when the best song on a group's mix CD is one from the member going solo.I would not recommend this CD at all, if you like Destiny's Child, get Survivor or Writing's on the Wall. If you're looking for good new R&B check out Ashanti instead.
These lights are not blue.I can't even tell that I've changed mine from stock bulbs.There is absolutely no difference here.They don't deserve one star.Absolutely do not buy these..It's a waste of time and money.CON
I'm a relative neophyte to skiing and bought this with the expectation that it might facilitate my learning. In my estimation it was pretty much a waste of time and a total waste of money. Yes, it does provide a modicum of instruction, but for the most part it's suppose to be developing muscle memory by having you watch techniques being repeated ad naseum; didn't work for me.If you want some truly helpful instructional materials, look at the Lito Tejada-Flores and Harold Harb books and tapes.
Our whole family loved this video. It is not only a great introduction to skiing for new skiiers in the family (both young and old alike), but also gets you excited and ready to hit the slopes come winter. For intermediates, this is also an excellent review of the basics and some things you might have missed along the way. Don't miss this one!
I purchased this video for my son (who loves them) and fell in love with it. It is my favorite Veggie Tale to date. A must see!! It is quite hilarious especially the silly song with Larry.
I enjoy a good romance film as much as the next person, but this dreadful film is so forced that I could barely sit through it. Greg Kinnear who is usually very good is flat as a pancake along with his irritating co-star Lauren Holly. There are a few scattered moments (mostly from Joan Cusack), but not not nearly enough to get this awful film off the ground. I rate it 1 1/2 stars because I was somehow able to sit through this lazy comedy with no romance to be found.
I made the mistake of seeing this movie in the theater tried hard to get my money's worth. It was impossible. The dialog was so contrived and mindless. There was not a laugh to be had and the chemistry between Kinnear and Holly was nonexistent.
I read those positive reviews here and bought this item 2 years ago. It worked pretty well at the beginning. Starting from about a year ago, it couldn't keep the rice moistured for long. Now, it is no better than a 20 bucks rice cooker and I have to replace it.
We bought this rice cooker because everyone raved about it, but no one seems to have mentioned it's one huge drawback: it takes FOREVER. I tried to make two cups of brown rice this evening. After 75 minutes the water was just beginning to boil. As a working mom, I do not have 2 hours to make rice every evening. Yes, I suppose I could get in the habit of setting up my rice in the morning and setting the timer. But this requires a level of menu commitment I don't presently have. Or, I could go back to our old one-button cheapo machine that cooked white rice in 15 minutes, brown in 30. My husband is Asian, but I'm not. He may like the rice better from this machine, but I'm cooking it and I'm fed up.
For the price, I expected this unit to last longer than my parents' bigger and less expensive cooker (can't remember the brand of their rice cooker--either Panasonic or National) which they've used EVERYDAY for more than five years now, and it's still going.My family didn't use this Zojirushi everyday--but we were pretty close! After about a year and a half, the rice doesn't keep as well as it used to. It dries out faster and doesn't cook as evenly as it did while it was under warranty.I noticed most (if not all) the positive reviews were posted after recent purchases. The handful of reviews from folks who have owned and used this item beyond warranty isn't as glowing. Please keep that in mind if you envision using this rice cooker for years to come.
I was very happy with this rice cooker until the very fragile rubber grommet on the lid tore. They do not sell the part. Beware. It is great but it will not last long this feature makes it very very vulnerable. I had it for 10 months before the fragile grommet tore now it no longer makes good rice. The cost to repair it makes it useless because I would just have to repair it again in 10 months. This is not a rice maker for anyone who cooks a lot of rice it just won't last.
We bought this 2.5 years ago. It was very good at the beginning. However, just after 2.5 years of light use, it is now toasted. The rice comes out sticky and lumpy and drys up in less than 12 hours. We thought Zojirushi stands for quality and durability. We made a big mistake.
All I can say is that every working, healthy and modern kitchen should have a fuzzy logic rice cooker and by buying a good one that will make Porrige and has other modes, you open it up to providing all kinds of wonderful and creative meals.
I purchased this rice cooker as a Christmas gift for my parents. I was looking for one that also cooked hot cereals or porridge. I read the reviews and decided to give it a try. My parents loved it - my mom has Alzheimer's so my dad does all the cooking. He has become an expert at making great yummy hot cereals. Once my husband tasted the hot cereals he ordered a cooker for us as well. The cooker is very easy to clean! We are very happy with it. Ours is made in Japan
The rice turned out perfect! Very different from other rice cookers I have tried. I am worried about what the other reviewers mentioned that the battery could out for the LCD display though since I don't intend to plug the machine in all time.
I was a little confused by reading reviews but I decided on the goFit ball at 65cm and it worked out just right for my 5'8" frame. There was no odor from the ball and was not difficult to blow up the ball with the pump provided.Did my abdomial exersizes with no proplem with my 215 lbs of body weight.I would recommend this item.
As other reviews, band around ball showing the exercises is unnecessary and not nice looking. Functions well, no problem with the pump. Use it as an alternative desk chair.
It is possible I got a defective ball, but I bought this with the intention of using it for p90x2. I inflated it following the directions precisely, but I found it nearly impossible to perform most of the exercises because the ball compressed so much. It is very high quality and was nearly odorless, but I highly suggest going for a cheaper ball (I'm now using a TKO ball) that is more firm.
I read the reviews prior to ordering, the color indicated in the photo was purple (which I really wanted) but I took note that several folks received red. I ordered anyway and of course received a red one. In spite of not getting a purple ball I still think it's a good product. Heavy duty, which was important to me since I need to "trust" my ball, as I too am heavy duty. It holds it's shape and it's volume of air and I feel very comfortable on it. I'm in a stability ball class and have tried the other balls there and like the weight and feel of my "red" ball. I'll probably order another smaller one, a 55cm. The 65cm is great for sitting but a little to large for some of the other activities so I think having a pair of different sizes is the way to go.
We have not figured out gow to inflate it fully yet. The go fit customer service is open only monday - friday 9 - 5.So we haven't used it yet. I think i should have just bought it from a local store. The instructions are quite poor.
A coworker of mine had ordered this exact ball and I liked it so much I ordered one for myself. Great value, arrived promptly. This one is fairly large, but I am 6' so it works great for me, shorter folks might want to try one of the smaller ones.
This ball is extremely durable, a great size and was easy to inflate. For tall people, it is excellent. The skin is thick and we have had no issues with it, and do not feel any danger of it popping.
My husband got this ball as an accessory to a workout program he is using. It has served that purpose very well, and also our kids love it. It's pretty big, so to them it's the ultimate toy. I'm happy its anti-burst, and I can see us using it for many years, it is very quality.
This book contains a myriad of case studies concerning a wide variety of acoustical problems. Very rich in detail. I found it helpful when trying to tackle challenging acoustical problems.
This is very odd. In 1998 Garth Brooks had success when he put out a box set with a similiar theme. However for some artists that kind of treatment doesn't work and it falls flat. I like Toby Keith but this box set is just a way for a record company to make money buy repackaging three CD's (None of which are any good or have any worth) and make an extra buck. It's just sad.
When I bought this box set, I expected to recieve compact discs that were fully remastered with 24 Bit Technology. Instead, they sound exactly like the original discs I already have. While you may find several top quality country hits in this set, the sound quality isn't up to snuff for today's standards. So now I'm stuck with doubles of everything and out thrity bucks.
Just buy this album. 'Dry the rain' is the best song ever. 'Dog's got a bone' is close to being the best ballad ever. Each song is as original and unexpected as an earthquake. Push it out. Feel the Beta vibe.
Thank goodness for the Beta Band! I must say this album is a real treat for the ears- sonically broad, lyrically uplifting, and overall a good time for all. Kinda like if Graham Parsons spliced his genes with Beck Hanson, had a daughter, who then married David Byrne and had a mess of kids, thereby amounting to the Beta Band. Musically, it's that hard to pin them down, and that's a good thing. Definitely an album that can be enjoyed for ages on end- the only drawback I felt was the appropriately titled 'Monolith'. But hey everyone is entitled to their madness.
A great, comprehensive guide that helped me to understand why this happened in a historical context. Also helped me to get a better grasp of what to expect with the war against Afghanistan and Al Qaeda. Now I know why this happened and what to expect. The news media seems to breeze over historical elements in favor of status quo Anthrax and millitary events but this book really helped me to get caught up on my facts. Highly recommended!
In the begining thier was house.......and before that thier was SALSOUL!!!! The root of house music started with salsoul. This cd captures some of the best songs that they produced. To say that this is just another disco cd, would be doing it a grave disjustice. It would be like calling the Mona Lisa just a painting or the statue of Dave just a rock. This is a compilation of the best dance music ever recorded. The blend of rebel rosing vocals and smooth lyrical contents with the monstrative rythems are timeless classics. My only regret is they didn't release all of thier gems out on one compliation. This is a must have for any disco, house, dance, or r&b collection.
This was an important book to me when I was a little girl growing up in Colorado. I couldn't tell you how many times I checked it out of the library to read and reread again. I even remember where it was -- second shelf from the end, three row up, reddish hardback cover.Over the years I'd forgotten the title, I just remembered that it was about a little Native American girl who climbed a tree and found another world in the sky. After a tedious search of my old towns online library (yay for modern internet searches) I found a title that rung a bell and won a copy on ebay!I'm so happy to have this book on my shelf now. Wonderful, wonderful story.
I loved this book as a young girl. I loved the message about finding your talents and making the most of them, even when you are feeling out of place or far from all that is familiar. I've been looking for it for my children for years and am so thrilled to have finally found it!
I have purchased several bluetooth headsets in my attempt to obtain a good quality sound. I purchased the Nextlink AX2 with the hopes of solving my search. I was not impressed. It was loud enough (as they stated), but with the volume turned up it created an echo for the recipient of the call. It is a ROYAL pain trying to get the thing in your ear while driving. Once in, it was fine. I hung up on several calls while attempting to secure it in my ear.I have put the whole thing back in the package and will try to return (though for the $30 less shipping both ways) it probably isn't worth my time.I have gone to the expensive H700 MotorolaAs they say -"you get what you pay for"
My wife thinks this product is identical to the product we found in local stores, but at a much lower price per ounce. She has been using this product for years.
We hate this thing. Hate. Hate. Hate.Even though it is supposed to hold three bikes, we can't even get two bikes on it, they are so squished together.Every time we try to use it, we just get covered in grease, angry, and abandon all hope of ever riding bikes somewhere that is not at home.Foaming raging hatred.
At first glance this rack seems well designed. In fact when I first put it on my car it felt very secure. However, after 3 days I noticed that one of the inner arms was loose. On closer inspection I realized that the screw that tightens the arm was defective and wouldn't tighten. After pulling it out I wasn't surprised because the screw is made of plastic. I couldn't believe it. The entire rack was total garbage because of one plastic screw. The screw is not replaceable with something from your local hardware store either. It is a specialty screw with a large cap on it that lets you hand tighten it. I can't believe that Saris would do this just to save a few bucks. This rack went back to Amazon and good riddance.
The Quality is tenth rate, this DVD is almost unwatchable and the audio sucks.
Air is a pretty decent show, though not quite as good as Kanon and Clannad that came afterwards. ADV also gave it a great dub. But it's not worth buying this set. Not only does it cram all the episodes onto two discs, with Funi's usually bad AV quality as a result, but it also strips one of the episodes from the series. It may only be a recap episode, but it's still part of the show.This is not a complete collection, and not worth buying.
This novel takes you from a warm fire to the icy wastes and carries you on a wild flight to survive the elements and overcome the threat to innocent travellers. A excellent adventure with a unexpected ending.
This is a story with a modicum of drama except for a small dog (surprising given the starry nature of the human cast), close to nonexistence suspense, and muddy sound recording compounded with hard to understand dialog (English accents and all that). Gielgud's performance as the hero is mostly one dimensional (when you can understand his delivery); as the heroine, Carroll's "acting" ranges from chatty to zombie; and Lorrie's delivery is over-the-top ham (and, quite frankly, an embarrassment) as he portrays the "good-guy" killer. All this is in marked contrast to the achievements of the fourth principal performer, Robert Young. Young provides an acting tour de force as the subject matter of the film. He makes the film his own!There are some gee-wiz (for the time, 1936) special in-camera/editing effects which were then fast becoming (and would continue to be) a Hitchcock trademark.Not one of Hitchcock's masterpieces, but not one of his disasters either.WILLIAM FLANIGAN, Ph.D
These three discs are a perfect place to begin your Stereolab collection as it covers a wide cross section of "the stereolab sound".And the music...??? just look up the individual disc reviews on Amazon.It's all there....Enjoy
I bought this book thinking this was Historical fiction...I was wrong, this is trash, one of the most ridiculous books I've ever read, he doesn't know squat, and his characters are ludicrous, badly written and boring.
This movie is very enjoyable and handles the topic of adolescent obesity and eating disorders very tactfully. Could be shown in high school health classes.
I like Feinstein's work but this book is a bore. The first 100 pages are mini-biographies of USGA staff. Someone out there must find interesting which college basketball team is the favorite of the USGA publicity director, but I am at loss to understand whom.
Feinstein takes a different tack in The Open versus his previous golf books, A Good Walk Spoiled and The Majors. Instead of stories about the players on the tour, this story focuses on the people behind the transformation of the worn-out municipal golf course Bethpage Black into the great course that hosted the 2002 U.S. Open championship. I found I couldn't stop reading, as Feinstein's prose is once again funny, heartwarming, and flowing. My only critique is that I wished for more detail on Rees Jones' changes to A.G. Tillinghast's design, with illustrations. For a book about the transformation of the golf course, there isn't enough about the physical changes that were done. The book does a great job portraying the enormity of the project that was undertaken, so the satisfaction that is felt with the success of the championship seems to be well deserved.
The subtitle should be, "Inside the Port-o-Johns at Bethpage Black," because Feinstein devotes many pages to the man who set up all those portable toilets that lined the golf course, every last one, even one that Tiger briefly did some business in! The guy who unloaded the Port-o-Johns off the truck is interesting for about a clause, but we get page after page of this guy. You'd think he was the Pope of Bethpage Black. If you want to know fascinating stuff like the PRECISE NUMBER of Port-O-Johns that actually lined the golf course, then attempt to burrow your way through Open. The playing of golf -- I'm talking about the first actual golf shot of the tournament -- doesn't make its first appearance until page 256. At that point, the book is more than two-thirds over!!!Feinstein phoned this one in. Did someone edit this? He should have called it, "A Good Open Spoiled." Don't waste your money.
DVD was in excellent condition, brand new. The Film is very good, well made, very good visuals to go with the story telling, however, this is a short version of the original film, that is the only negative of this production.
If you read it through and through, you will find how wonderful it is to approach calculus in a graphical, numerical and symbolic way. If you want to challenge your mind in this way, this book is probably the most suitable for you. I am using it in my calculus calss, and I found the concepts are very clearly explained. The thing that I love most of this book is that it helps students develop a good understanding of calculus through observing and studying the graphs of the functions. This only imperfection of the book, if any, is that there lack of some theoretical exercises. But any book can not be perfect. The most important thing is how you enjoy it. For me, it is a new and fresh guide of the study of calculus.
I am a fan of traditional theorem-proof exposition, and this Ostebee-Zorn text demonstrates why. This book attempts to make calculus easy to understand, but the only result is that it is impossible to follow. Essential concepts are buried deep within piles of verbiage, and the examples skip important steps making them hard to follow. Add to that the large number of typos and errors in the solutions manual. As a teaching assistant, I have had strong mathematics students who could not understand this book and whose knowledge of calculus suffered as a result. With so many quality calculus textbooks on the market, it is hard to understand why a school would choose to use this unsuccessful experiment.
I wouldn't recommend this book...I believe that Roth is too involved in the characters having sex than trying to get some sort of plot going....I didn't enjoy reading Goodbye, Columbus, but I did enjoy reading the short stories where it is not about sex but rather about religion. thank you for the short stories....
NOTE FOR PARENTS: What was Nickolodeon thinking?? SpongeBob and Patrick stuff themselves with sundaes then behave like drunks...down to the staggering about, talking with slurred speech, and suffering from a hangover the next morning on an unshaven, bleary-eyed SpongeBob. The scene could have easily been played with stomachaches.Also, the movie features Patrick in black fishnet hose and stiletto heels- I kid you not!My sons, fans of SpongeBob on TV, rarely laughed and pronounced it 'sorta OK'. We all wished we'd seen someting else. The story was contrived and not even clever.Watch the show- don't bother seeing the movie.
What the f**k is this? The TV show was funnier than this garbage! People who doesn't have seen this movie, DON'T SEE IT! It's a yasste of time and money!
I loved this movie. It's about Sponge Bob and Patrick going to Shell City to get King Neptune's crown. ANd while SB and P are going to Shell City Plankton takes over the world. IT's a great movie. See it.
This is just pethetic! I don't get the point of watching the movie. There was abot hmm... 2..3 funny parts that don't EVEN GO WITH THE MOVIE! Even my dad fell asleep in the movie. I should'nt even tell you the stroy. It's so STUPID! DON'T BUY THIS MOVIE WHEN IT COMES OUT! IF you buy, I hope you enjoy being bored.
I really like watching the 15-mins Spongebob Squarepants episodes on TV; they're very innocent and happy, but when I watched this movie I almost lost my head because of the awful it was! This is actually "the longest and most boring Spongebob episode ever", the critics here in Chile said that and I totally agree with them.The worst thing the producers could do was to include real people and stupid effects that make you laugh in the movie. Like David Hasselhoff, the made fun of himself by acting here!!!! plus, the stupid effect when he starts acting as if he was a boat or something, I had self-shame when I watched that part!!!!!I think that the worst thing you could do is to buy this DVD: you'll watch it once, you'll hate it and you'll waste 18 bucks. Bad purchase.
I've built three computers for family using this case and they all love it. A bit wider than the sandard case but about half the height. Glossy black piano finish.... it only appears cramped if you fail to plan... I use modular P/S and tie down all the cords ...getting ready to buy another.
Out of all the shopping I have done through Amazon, this is the only thing I will be returning! The book only measures 6 3/4 x 4 1/4, has very small print and obscure black and white illustrations at the beginning of each chapter. In the same order I received James Herriot's "Treasury for Children" which, for the same price, is ABSOLUTELY BEAUTIFUL, and what I also expected from this book!
James Herriot's Dog Stories is written by a man who loves both people and animals. The descriptions of people, dogs, and his humble view of himself are an irresistable combination. The accuracy and wit with which he presents people's relationships with their dogs is priceless. When I read this book, I laugh at the eternal goofiness of dogs and also dog people! The sadder stories are written with a balanced view. This book is an amazing collection of short stories. Highly recommended.
It is hard to believe that this is no longer available new on Amazon. I think this is a great CD with jazz and bluegrass all mixed together. If you want to call it progressive, that works too. Anyway, it is great music. Buy it!!
It is simply not worth wasting your money even on songs of the sixties so fine as these, since the sound qualities of this disc are so poor as to completely ruin the listening experience. I used to have this on vinyl lp and should have kept it. The sound was great back then. The CD is nothing but scratches and hisses. Disgraceful.
This shirt is great by itself, under an cotton shirt, under sholder pads, and even under a coldgear shirt. The coldgear feels almost like crushed velvet and i like it usually but everyonce in a while It gets to me and I have to put on my turf gear underneath it. This a must have for your under armour wardrobe.
I tried this product when they used to sell it at Walgreens, as soon as I fell in love with it they stopped selling it. I can't seem to find a place anywhere who sells it. Its pain free and works really really well for something that looks like a sticker. I don't even get my eyebrows professionally done. I use these shapers above my brow and tweeze underneath. They make my eyebrows look perfect!
Short remains steadfast w/this release. Production varies, even E. Sermon drops by w/a dope beat for Short to spit to. If you're a fan you will not be dissapointed. His lyrical pimp hand remains strong throughout the duration of the record. Add it to your collection! PEACE
My 5 year old son wanted this so bad, but when we got it for him, there were so many pieces to put together that didn't fit together well, he never played with it. It just sits on our floor in many pieces taking up toy space! What a waste!
Remember " Don`t play your Rock`n Roll to me " from Smokie? No? The Gallaghers gave a f... on that. They did what they can give but this one was not to the hand of God... The Following Album after this was going on Jesus Christ Ways; only 4 Albums on the World have the right beeing 6 points on Amazon. Defintiley Maybe this is not 6 points but a full 5.00000 ....
"Nebula Awards Showcase 2006" is another collection of stories that you read and don't forget immediately. Another great-deal-treasure through Amazon.
This book was suggested reading as if " THE GREAT SECRET to PERSONAL FREEDOM" was going to be revealed. It spoke of a self-centered mindset that seemed to suggest that I was to live my life how I wanted and not consider how my actions would affect others around me. A very simplistic and selfish point of view.
I have had the case for a month now and I am very happy with it so far. The case holds my TX nicely. No problems with the belt clip either. Very good product for the price.
I love this case. It is very hard to keep my palm protected. I carry my palm in my pocket everyday at work. Befor this case sometimes my lab jacket would get caught in the car door and the door would get slamed on my palm. This case prevents any damage. I LOVE IT!
I liked Soulbait alittle better than this. But Blaze is still good. I like the futuristic effects on the songs and how they designed the album cover.
This is truthfully worthless books. I had counted at least 20 typos on this book. I also do not like the double space to make this book look volumnious which it is not. It is basically a flyer which is printed in the form of a book. The litigation only contains New York, and that is too outmoded. Truthfully, it was a waste of time and money to buy this book. It creates the impression that the doors to a very secretive knowledge would be open to you but the knowledge given in this book is very basic which I am sure any reader worth their salt attempting to venture into this territory might already knows. Truthfully, I was disappointed to read this book.
As a banker, one never wants to have to be in the position of collecting bad debts. Mr. Lewis has done a great job describing the process -- a terrific reference for anyone who needs an experienced perspective on the process!
This budding romance is a bit...slow. I was a bit disappointed with the story line but then again, I find it quite difficult for Asians to do a well coming out or coming of age story. This is my opinion. I would reccomend that you save your money and not view it.
WOW! I was hoping this game wouldn't be as bad as people said. It really sucks! No fun at all. Pretty to look at on my 1080p-but that's it. Fun-factor = 3/10 Glad I only paid 37.00 for it. In a nutshell, if you're under 15 yrs old, you will love this game! If not, spit on it. What a waste.
I tried this cream and now have to go to a dermatologist because of a skin reaction. The only positive feedback comes from a feedback pro. Don't believe me.......read the other "reviews" they have left. Buyer beware....any company that has to pay someone to write their reviews needs to put out a better product so real reviews can be written.
I bought the Drawing & Painting Fantasy Beasts and the Fantasy Figures books for our high school library. The kids really enjoy them and so do I. I just signed on to see what else might be in this series and to order more copies. While these books may not appeal to everyone (not enough step-by-step for true beginners), the layout and abundance of good pictures and ideas will grab most readers and artists.
Barry Corbin ends up with a Korean family that he never knew he had. He is gruff and not accepting of his visitors, not even friendly, but soon mellows during the Christmas season. The usual characters are here - a wonderful series that should have lasted longer. This chapter is just another example of great acting and terrific writing. I enjoyed the old VHS and it arrived in perfect shape. Wonderful, family entertainment.
Normally I am the kind of person who goes for books with adventure and fantasy in them. But hey, I tried this one out and loved it. It's not as fast paced as some of the books I've read, but that suprisingly didn't matter. I suggest anyone read it.
I am in college now and i had to take a teST on this book when i was i the seventh grade. At that time i hated the book. i thought it was even more naST than Jhonny Tremain. i just wanted to make a mast on that book. it was so boring i just fell asleep. i would not reccomend this book to anyone and i would tell someone to read The Future of Us instead. i just fealt like making a naST in this book and putting it away so when the next person like juSTice reads it they would see my naST and think the book was naST. what a disappointment
This book is about some girl from Barbados named Kit Tyler who has to move to Wethersfield, Connecticut. First of all, the characters are the most boring people in the world. The plot stinks. There barely is a plot. I like books where there is a lot of action and the story mountain has bumps along the way. This book, there is no mountain and they just go on flat ground (just to let you know I'm being metaphoric here) and then go up a little hill. The only reason I actually gave this book a star is because the witch trials and where Kit is running away is kind of suspenseful. Just don't read this book it isn't good.
This book was ok to me. It dragged on quite a bit but I really liked the ending. I didn't like how it would talk about the same thing for over 3 chapters. It just felt like it wasn't my kind of book. However, I liked the last part. The last 5 chapters were probably that only part I liked.
After purchasing this for our home library, I couldn't wait to read it before my children did. I was bored and unenthused throughout the reading. The author made great attempts at historical accuracy, just not enough with character or plot development. The story must have been born of facts first, as the characters just seemed thrown about and inconsistent. Along with the lack of plot, those inconsistencies are what make this a brutal read. I can't imagine either of my young avid readers enjoying this book and all its predictabilities.
I think this book was boring. The only exciting part is the witch hunt. Most of the time they talked about polatics. If they wern't the were cring over petty grevences such as love. This is why this story was boring. The characters were annoying and obtuse, it was hard reading such a disgusting piece of lititure. Kit was such an unintelligent and snooty creature it was infurating to read about. The women were either self-centered or meek, the thought about love all the time. The men disscussed politics like a change would end the world and the men thought women were dirt. Nat and the cat were the only intellegent creatures. The characthers are just lacking perwsonality and intellegence.
I have read this book several times since I was a pre-teen. It's like visiting an old friend each time. I love it. One of my all time favorites.
The Witch of Blackbird Pond is a good book. It is about the early American settlers, the Puritans and their witch trials. Kit has recently moved to America from a Barbadoes after her father's death. What she finds there are strict religious rules, pious settlers, and bad fashion. But she takes refuge in the company of Hannah, who is called evil because she is a Quaker. When Hannah is acused of casting sickness on the town and escapes, the town acuses Kit. In the end, Kit must learn to change her attitude and the town must learn to conquer religious differences.
This book was semi interesting. I liked certain parts, but compared to other books, this one was too predictible. I prefered the book, Beyond the Burning Time. Not only was it better, it was less predictable and more interesting! But read the two books for yourself and you can decide!
This book was an overall 1 star book. The quality of the dialogue was horrible because it was very unrealistic. This book was also very boring and drawn out because it did not have a lot of action. The characters, however were very interesting and original. The events were very boring and predictable.
This book was a wonderfully light and entertaining read. Kit is a young girl who is forced to leave her island home of Barbados in the late 1600's and live with a strict Puritan community in Connecticut. She has many new relationships some good and some bad in this land where life seems so harsh. One of her special relationships is with an elderly Quaker woman, the Witch of Blackbird Pond. The author is detailed in showing early New England life. The characters are a charming and I will always remember Hannah Tupper. A fabulous book for adults, young and old.
When we purchased a new sofa that has a recliner on each end, we needed a table to sit in front of the middle seat when it's just the two of us. One that we could reach items from either recliner. This table has beautiful smooth wood; it's the right size & serves as the perfect companion when we settle down to a night of TV.
This book gives some good advice on the essay, but an awful lot of the book is not related how to put together your best essay. I bought this after the book "A is For Admission" recommended it. I had much higher expectations for it because of that.
They have that unmistakable beet like their fathers. Which is always good to hear. But they have managed to do create a new style, whch is what makes this one "mortal". As soon as I saw them do one of their songs on TV, I went out to buy it. I wasn't disappointed. It is extremely danceable. I also love the name and what it means.
one of the best albums....................ever. any genre, any era. my god, what a knock out. this is the latest musical persona of will oldham (whose illustrious career began as "palace/palace music/palace brothers") and many say it's his greatest achievement yet. i knew within ten seconds of first hearing this record that it had to be true. every song reaches in and squeezes the heart, gets all tangled up in your insides. you know what's great about this record? every single haunting track is memorable and affecting. every one. there isn't a single track that fades into the background...and that is a rare treat these days. and the fact that a tune as staggeringly vibrant as "a minor place" can co-exist so easily with smothering odes like "i see a darkness" is just amazing. it is, in many ways, like life.
I am trying to be frugal with my five star reviews but this album deserves full marks without question. Judging by my screen name, one can safely assume that I am a Will Oldham fan. I, myself not being much of a writer, will avoid trying to pin this album down with my words but direct those interested to reviews at both pitchforkmedia.com and nme.com.
It is my girls first year in ballet so I just wanted an inexpensive bag. If you want a really nice bag don't waste your money here. The entire bag is made of urethane and has a cheap feel. The biggest positives are the cute graphics and the straps work well.
My cousin got this the second it came out, and the amazing action and friendship as well as the "Who do you trust?" undertone continue greatly in this DVD with the introduction of new animation for the theme, "True", as well as the introduction of the character Hideaki. Whose side is he really on, and is he even human? This DVD will keep you on the end of your seat. Dragon Drive fans, you're in for a treat as the final battle is being prepared for!
If you like good music don't waste 12 bucks. May the record stand, I didn't want this CD. My Sister bought it for me. Their anoying voices and pathetic melodies are, well, annoying and pathetic. No good will come of buying this. Spend your money on a good CD like EVERCLEAR or FASTBALL.
i could hardly stand to listen to this cd for more than five minutes.......it was so depressing and all the songs practically sounded the same.....get What's the story morning glory....it rocks
I am a Oasis fan and to be honest Be Here Now isn't very good . The only good songs are d'you know what i mean , magic pie , stand by me and all around the world {which is too long } . Its no where near as good as the others and isn't worth the money
this is a poor attempt at a follow up to morning glory. I wouldn't say its terrible, but I wouldn't buy it again if given the choice, which is a shame really, because their first two were quite good
I don't have to hear only new music all the time, but I must say that Oasis' "Be Here Now" is one album I'd just as soon forget forever. If "What's the Story Morning Glory" defined and popularized Brit-pop, "Be Here Now" sounded its death knell! I will admit that the sound is much like older Oasis recordings, but that's just the problem. It's TOO much like the older stuff and sounds suspiciously like the Gallaghers were in a hurry to turn out something - anything - a.s.a.p. What makes this album so bad is that it was hyped SO much, which left this Oasis fan with a sharp sense of being taken for a ride. Oasis may be the most popular British band, but they aren't the best. Much British talent goes unnoticed overseas (i.e. Silver Sun, the Dandys, Shed Seven, Catatonia, Northern Uproar), and that's a shame! Save your money for something more original than "Be Here Now."
I loved Oasis' first US album, What's The Story Morning Glory?, and this was a wonderful follow-up. The music is crisp, fresh, and has catchy melodies that keep you listening. I love Oasis and I love this CD!
"Be Here Now" does have its moments ("D'You Know What I Mean", "My Big Mouth", "Stand By Me", and "Don't Go Away") along with a few lesser tracks ("All Around The World" and "It's Getting Better Man") and a true dog ("Magic Pie"), but it's just another example of what happens when you're worth $40,000,000, the cocaine supply is never-ending (Noel Gallagher has admitted this and stopped using), and you ask how long a CD is (74 minutes) and you say, "Well, let's fill the <expletive> up".The production is awful. Knobs-up, full stop. Layers and layers of squalling guitars. All hints of subtleness are gone except for the end part of "Don't Go Away". The band still rocks out, but the sound is harsh.I almost gave it three stars because of the decent songs on here, but I've got to deduct one star for the "Phil Spector with hearing damage" style of production. Sorry guys. Find a better producer next time out.
The songs in this album are quite boring, only a few good ones. I wouldn't recommend it, get their previous albums instead...
I like Oasis because their songs are rhythmic and I like the lead singer's voice. All of their songs have a different rhythmic and all songs are really good. There are 12 songs on this album. I like the 4th song " STAND BY ME " because it's really nice when they say ` stand by me, nobody knows the way it's gonna be ` I like these parts!!! And the 8th song " DON'T GO AWAY " is good , too. I found this song is for when something sad has happened to you; It's one of the best song in this album!! So I think this album is fantastic!!!!! I want Oasis to sing many songs.
These album is their best work yet, the songs are an interesting conbination of the songs from the albums they did before. The songs has the basic things from the first record, and the elegancy and sofistication of "What the story morning glory" as well, you will hear more details in these one.These is the band of the 90's...and they will be the band of the 2000's of course, so buy it now. Noel is a tired and true music god.
Why do Yankees always put Oasis down eh? They are the Greatest band ever. I live in the same City as they did and I'm listening to their music 24/7 People just get jealous of their success. If anyone agrees or disagrees e-mail me instantly!!!!
This plane takes alot to get off the ground you really have to throw this thing but once its up there your good to go i would recommend to stand on top of hill and throw it so it has more of a chance getting airborne.
When I purchased this cd I did not know what to expect. I have been a Billy Joel fan for my whole life. I was very surprised during the first listen. Even though it sounded something like Frank Sinatra would write it still has the Billy Joel feel. Both with the music and timing. As this fan grows older this is a welcome sound. I hope there is more to come. Joseph Leonardi
Like Eragon...I first watched the movie and really enjoyed it. Afterwards I read the book and realized that the movie was horribly done when compared to the book.I liked all of the character building in the book and thought it had plenty of humor and action. There was no sex and cussing (that I remember) in the book for those that don't like to read that sort of stuff.On a side note...my inner immaturity laughed when the words 'fagged' and 'ejaculated' were used to describe feelings and expressions.Five stars!
This book was really fun. It was action-packed. The beginning was a little odd, at least to me, but the rest of the story kept me interested.Since it's an older story, it's really great for adults like me who love "old-school" sci-fi. My son wasn't grabbed by it, by the way. So not sure if it's great for kids.
The Gadget by Paul Zindel is about a thirteen year old Stephen Orr. His Father is a scientist that works for the Goverment in the time period of the 1940's. If you are person who likes history and science this book is perfect. Stephen is a person who i can relate to becasue i know a person just like him. Matt Hadsell. They both like to explore the unknow and discover the undiceded. As my title says "Too Good" thats exactly what this book is, so if you like reading or just want an intersting read, the Gadget is right for you.
We were trying to get winter of the world by Ken Follet. So when thats avialble I will order it corretly this time. Dave
Received the item and it is just like advertised. Purchased it to replace a small frothing pitcher so I can foam milk for more than one cup of coffee.Nice quality pitcher.
perfect for frothing. well built product. would buyanother in a heartbeat.no more dribbles from a roundedged vessel i was using previously.
I've been using the carafe for 3 months, and generally speaking a pleasure to use. it's decently constructed (though by no means heavy duty), and it's lasted so far, even though I'm not gentle on things.My only real complain is that because the carafe narrows at the top, and it's rather tall, it's hard to clean the bottom without a brush.
Given as a gift today to go with recipients coffee maker.They used it for their guests same day (!) and really likedappreciated the size and quality of the pitcher. It's a perfectsize to give you the option of quantity to make.
This book is very good. The story line is fantastic and I cannot put it down. There is one problem, however. This book was very poorly proofread if proofread at all. There are many grammatical mistakes and other errors that middle school students could eliminate if they had read their work. Nonetheless, I highly recommend The Fall of reach and the rest of the series as long as you are able to overlook certain imperfections.
Growing up in a military family makes me like the style of these books all the more. They pull you into the Halo universe and you immediately become attached to the characters. Great stories and insight into the award winning game, Halo. After reading it I wanted to play some Halo and kick some Covenant rear!
I'm almost finished with The Fall of Reach and while I love the story, the editors need to be shot. Wherever there is a word that has the letters "f" and "i" together, they're missing; ie: file is le, and officer is of cer. I think there's a date typo too where it's supposed to be the day after and they didn't change it. It's a little confusing and takes from the read when you have to pause and figure out what's being said. I'll update or comment when I finish the other 2 books, hopefully they're not as bad.
Now, I am a HUGE fan of Jack Off Jill, My Ruin, Otep ect... And those chicks can scream. However, the vocalist of Sugarcoma fails to make the music enjoyable with her weak screaming. The singers oj JOJ, MR, Otep ect... Put power behing their music and make it enjoyable. Sugarcoma just makes it annoying. She does have a nice singing voice, and the band is very talented. I think Sugarcoma would be better off if she didnt scream...
When you are at a loss to communicate, much less comfort a friend who has experienced a death, this book can speak for you! Consider giving it as a gift, more personal and more everlasting than flowers. If you have lost a loved one, take this book as your own companion to help you move through your grief. Someone who understands is waiting in this book to support your journey. It will help.
This book was not what I expected. The author spends much valuable time describing his personal trials and tribulations with the Russian "system" rather than explaining the what, how, where, and gory details of biological warfare. If you are looking for an exciting read, pass on this one...I did read the whole thing and I can guarantee it will put you to sleep every time you pick it up!
If you can get past the cover and inside photos --- a Humper who looks suspiciously surgically streamlined --- you will be for a warm, fuzzy surprise. The Humper still has it: smooth vocals with a blend of country and pop and the softest of rock possible, all showcased with his three-and-a-half octave range. There are covers --- "Volare," "Penny Lane" (perhaps an homage to The Beatles, the group whom he knocked off the charts with his No. 1 hit, "Release Me"), "If Tomorrow Never Comes," "This Guy's in Love With You" and the underrated Aznavour anthem "She." There's an infectious taste of calypso with "Brazil," and a truly likable country-flavored " How Slow We Go," co-written by the Humper's daughter, Louise. The best track is the title track, "Definition of Love" --- proof, indeed, that the man still defines love. Now a bad way to celebrate 35 years in the business of making love on the record.
I enjoyed the book for the most part and learned some things. However, he seemed to repeat the information a lot (guess repetition is the key to memory). It was to a point that annoyed me though, then again repetition annoys me period. lol. Also, somethings kinda contradicted themselves, but for the most part it was a pretty decent book and I did learn some things and def recommend this vs regular running relying on super thick soles praying the shoe will protect you. Which will! give you more injuries later down the road.
I read ChiRunning in Sep 09. It took me 2-3 wks to get the form right while running. I've been ChiRunning since.It's not effortless - my heart rate meter tells me so - though it does feel effortless for a whole minute or two doing medium sprints. I now run 4x a week, an hour or two each time. This is something I'd never been able to do in the past because my knees always started giving problems and I'd have to train on an elliptical afterwards. The knees are fine now. I'm sure Danny wouldn't recommend it, but you can even run on a bad knee with this technique - I ran 10k on a poor knee without much loss of speed.My timing has also improved, though not as much as I'd hoped or expected (hence 4 stars).Enjoy running? You should give it a go.
I checked this book out from my local La Leche League. I'm surprised they still have this book available. Being nearly twenty years old, maybe some of my problems are with it being outdated. However, my main gripe is that it is very condescending and judgmental. Instead of just informing you on different options (none of which would work for me and only one or so that would apply well to a full time job) this book presents a certain ideal and if the job arrangements do not fit that ideal, they're not good arrangements and you aren't a good mother. If you want helpful, non-opinionated advice, this is not the book for you. Currently I'm reading "The Working Mother's Guide to Life" which seems much more friendly and helpful.
I don't get this CD. I listened to it, listened to it again, chased my cat, cheeseyfranks, with a Salisbury steak TV dinner, listened to it again and nope, nothing. It's more average rock by bands that Mark Knopfler should put over his knee and whoop with a copy of Procol Harum's Las Vegas comeback effort. It's junk. Kroll was all about Sparta about 6 months ago before a telemarketer talked him into some psychic network. He now tells me that my oatmeal may jump up and start singing showtunes if my aura is not in line. Anyway, Sparta is a waste of time only Saved by the Bell, the pre school years, can compete with.
A fast read, has some helpful teaching points and very general commentary on japanese society. Seems a bit outdated too, at least my 1992 edition does. A lot of time spent covering things you could easily look up on the web. If you are going to Japan through JET, you will have heard a lot of this stuff by the time you get to Japan. Definitely check this out in a bookstore before buying, probably give it a pass.
Mariah and Whitney are (together with Celine Dion and Aretha Franklin) the greatest singers alive! They really show their voices power in this song, and they made a wonderful job together! Well done, girls! Well done!
I agree with most of what the previous reviewer said. What I dislike most is the are extremely narrow viewing angle and the lack of antireflective coating. Otherwise, it is a generally good device.My wish list for the next version includes built-in Wi-Fi and the ability to browse the network neighborhood and pull media files from any machine on the local wireless network, and an internet browser :-)
For all the famous names in this movie, soomething better should have come out of it. It was predictable from the first, and the twists and turns were just silly. They couldn't leave the estate, although one of them managed to arrive from the outside. Just about every one was involved in something illicit, or at least in something strange. Lovers were talked about but not really discussed. The biggest bombshell involving supposed incest was discussed by just two of the eight and nothing was made of it. This movie was just an unrelated bunch of snippets that just doesn't work.
During a snowstorm, eight women are stranded in a French country home with the corpse of the murdered family patriarch. Slightly bizarre, low-key French film pokes fun at the comedy murder mystery genre while heralding the feminine mystique of domesticity and dominance. It has the added distinction of breaking into song from each of the eight principal players, a strangely satisfying technique that often delivers touching portraits of womankind. This is as intoxicating as a glass of fine French wine.
Zorba the greek is a novel that has inspired me since I was a child. Alexis is a man that has this atomic reactor in his body that he cannot control. The coal mine owner, his boss, starts to realize little by little what Zorba is all about. Despite that his worker is not educated he learns a lot about life from him. This kind of novel is the one you do not forget and in my case is present for many situations. Zorba is never let down by failure or tragedy, take your shoes off and dance to the rhytm of life !!
I wouldn't go so far as to call it brilliant. Zorba is a refreshing and likeable character, but at times i felt that he was a bit too preachy, his dialogue a bit overly pedantic. The story to me felt a bit too long and choppy, with not much of a plot. But there are a few interesting and beautiful moments that reminds us to enjoy life to the fullest. Like I said, not a brilliant book, but pretty good nonetheless.
This was the worst pair of headphones I've ever bought, and it was not easy to get the local Bose store to give me a full refund on them despite their advertised "no hassle refund" policy.Terrible sound, poor ergonomics, medicore "noise cancellation"---never again will I buy another Bose product! I should've known better, my husband has a ridiculous Bose Wave radio which he now tells everyone that he "won at a Christmas raffle at the office" because he's too embarassed to confess that he paid half a grand for the thing.My son pointed me towards a pair of Sennheisers which were better in every respect, and at one third of the price.
I use these for blocking out noise at the office, and then take them home for gaming. They are very versatile and the sound quality is very good. They do a great job of blocking out external noise, that dog barking, that guy in the next cubical that has to yell into his phone, or that guy that has to smack his lips when he's chewing gum. Sometimes its just enough to put them on, flip the power switch and relax, without actually hooking them up to listen to something. I am very comfortable wearing them from 8am to 5pm, while it would be nice if my ears had a little more ventilation, but that would defeat the purpose of the noise canceling.
Paid $300.00 for these about 5 years ago. After about 2 years of light use the ear pad vinyl fell apart and the head bar rubber padding became very sticky, comes off on your fingers and gets on everything. The replacement ear pads don't fit into the frame well and come out easily. The overall quality of sound and durability was very disappointing. I found several over-the-ear clip ear phones for under $10.00 to be superior in every way, including comfort, quality stereo, and I can use these cheaper ear phones when I'm sweating/exercising: don't try that with the Bose headphones! The Bose headphones didn't really cancel ambient noise. I don't use them anymore.
I've owned my pair for close to four years now and they are starting to physically deteriorate. The sound quality is excellent, as is the noise canceling. I used these in an office cubicle environment and later in a computer room, and the performance on my iPod is outstanding. But at this point the plastic upright on each earphone has broken and needs to be held together with wire ties, and the rubber cover on one of the ear pieces has worn through. Granted, I use them almost every day, but they don't see rough use - and this isn't the type of endurance I'd expect from a $300 product. The two year warranty isn't long enough to address these issues.UPDATED JANUARY 2009One of the ear pieces finally cracked at the pivot point and simply fell off. When I contacted Boise they did offer to replace them with a new set for $100.
I purchased a new backgammon set and it arrived in perfect condition. The only problem I had was the black pieces. They were somehow discolored on every one. This problem was not present on the white. Everytime I play it the black pieces bother me. I would like instructions on getting another set of black pieces. I feel that I should not have to pay since this set was not cheap. Please advise.Thanks,Gary H.
Would I recommend it? Yes, but try to get it used. Also I would definitely buy their next in hopes that they may "find themselves" with a more well defined sound. You catch a bit of a sense that they are trying to be the Beastie Boys on another level... they need to just try to be Quarashi but they clearly aren't entirely sure who that is. The first track is by far the best on the album in my opinion, it absolutely rocks but the rest of it doesn't have the teeth that track does. If you like this first track don't buy the whole album for it, the entire album is only 41 minutes.
I think it was a very good book, especially if you are interested in Indian crafts or building a bow and arrow.
I'm a professional chef and a big fan of German knives. I like a heavier knife in my hand that I know will do the job all day long that I want it to. This set is amazing and I use it every day. Granted; I have swapped out a few of the garnish instruments for what I prefer to use (hate the zester and the peeler). Turned heads when I first brought it out at work but everyone wants to borrow my knives now due to their superior quality and sharpness. I wanted something other than a tired out knife roll that everyone has and have not regretted a single second of owning this item.
If you are ready for a stark, unrelenting description of life in the ghetto, Auschwitz and Dachau, this book doesn't let up for one sentence. Amazing story and written in a way that is poetic but easy to read. The book is classified as fiction but it is really a memoir, with names changed. There is no way anyone could make this up.
I'm OK with paying for eBooks. I bought this one, but was so distracted by multiple scan-induced typographical artifacts that I requested (and received) a refund about two-thirds of the way through the book. Free eBooks force me to tolerate some typos, as those books are done by volunteers and not for profit. But, an $8 Kindle Book sold by Amazon should be free of such nuisances. This one wasn't, and I'm basing this review solely on the poor quality of the eBook itself, not the content or theme of this book. It's a shame to hype the Kindle format while simultaneously selling a sub-standard version of that very format!
Maybe it was because I didn't know the story of Cupid and Psyche before I read the book- but I was not overly moved by this book. I especially did not enjoy Part II, when I just kept wondering, what the heck is going on??? Thank goodness that Lewis included the summary of the traditional myth at the end- it might be helpful to read this part first.
I love this group's early feel-good canadian rock n' roll, but I stumbled onto this album in a music store in the mall. With excitement, I sampled all the songs and to my disappointment, I still can't figure out what the hit was suppose to be. It's really terrible so don't bother. Just stick to their old stuff. Their 80's stuff rocks!!
If you appreciate the finer aspects of life in rural Southern states, you need to buy this DVD for a good laugh;
I couldn't wait to see this movie because of so many good reviews. But .... Without having read the reviews or other synopsis', I wouldn't have had a clue what was happening in the movie. There were so many flashbacks in the middle of scenes you never knew where you were. I like Christian Bale,but his fine acting was lost in the fancy editing. And as for Katie Holmes, her acting was like a piece of cardboard. Thank goodness someone loaned me the movie and I didn't have to pay for it. What a disappointment. Sorry, because I know the other reviews are great, but you must have been watching another movie.
Christian Bale is great as Bruce Wayne and the rest of the crew(Liam Neeson,Michael Caine,Gary Oldman,Morgan Freeman) make this film the best Batman movie yet.The director takes a different course than previous films,Batman Begins is dark and sinister.We see why Bruce Wayne turned to crime fighting.The film is chock full of suspense,action and high tech gadgets.The HD DVD version is a flawless transfer and a worthy addition to your collection.
Best Batman Series!!! This is a great start to a fantastic story line! This gives great detail to the development of the character who becomes the Dark Knight!! A must see film and must see series!
If you are a batman fan this is the movie to see. We start at Bruce Wayne's beginnings and travel with him as he trains to become the Dark Knight.The script was approved by DC comics and therefore holds more truth to the original story than the "Batman" movies before it. Christian Bale was a really great casting choice as he has the duality to play both the suave Bruce Wayne and the haunted Batman. Micheal Caine, Liam Neeson, and Morgan Freeman played their characters with the great skill that we've come to expect from these legendary actors. Cillian Murphy's portrayal of Dr. Jonathan Crane was amazing and complex. I look forward to the next movie in this remarkable new series.
Muy buena adquisicion, el producto llego a mi oficina 4 dias antes de lo estimado, en excelente estado. Sin duda compraria de nuevo.
I have all the Batman Series of movies and am a comic book fan from way back. I wanted the new take on the character. The movie doesn't disappoint. It goes back and gives a new look at the beginning of the man becoming the character. The cast is well developed as the story progresses and it is a joy to watch the film. This is a more serious Batman than some of the other incarntions. The action is fast and cast is great. I will enjoy this movie over and over.
-1. it took for ever to get started the whole bring the same fear to your enemies was annoying2.there was a classic batman bad guy3.no batmobile+the plot was good except the 1st half and the special were good could have been a lot better
As a long time Batman fan (I do use a Batman Comforter), I think that this Batman movie is the best of the lot. While all are fun this one seemed to capture the dark charm of Batman so much better then the others. You get to see Bruce Wayne before Batman and really see that Batman over any other superhero is really just a man trying to make the world a safer place. Now, that I've got that out of my system let me just say that Christian Bale was great. The whole movie had fantastic casting. Katie Holmes wasn't very believable as a strong district atorney and really didn't hold up that well against Bale on the screen. I believe that the moive is interesting enough that even people who are watching the movie simply because it is Batman will love it too.
I rented this movie because i was catching up on the trilogy preparing for DARK KNIGHT RISES!!! This movie was awesome, was really sets up for the next movies. Along with the other two, this movie is a must. Plus because i didnt own the dvd, Amazon was a fantastic alterative, with superb streaming quality!
I actually enjoyed this movie quite a bit, but it may be a touch overrated. Adequate if not good performances by all members of the cast, especially Christian Bale, who comes across as interesting, charismatic, and likeable. The imagery may have been a bit run of the mill compared to a Tim Burton rendering. Nonetheless, the Batman franchise seems to still be alive and well with this latest edition. Author ofAdjust Your Brain: A Practical Theory for Maximizing Mental Health.
I know you recent movie goers have just come out of the theatre recently. I did too. We're charged up but don't get out of control. Get a Bat-grip on yourself. The BEST Batman movie was the 1989 Tim Burton original. Batman Returns comes next and Batman Begins is somewhere around there. The Schumacher ones,while not being superb, still have their moments.The Batsuit did make Bale look sometimes like FATman. The Batarangs were rusty looking and not cool enough. I like the action sequences and how the story circled on fear. The early training stuff seemed to go a little too fast.All in all, Batman Begins is a good movie. I just think people need to think twice before they label Bale better than Keaton. HEEEELLL NOO!!! :O
batman begins is the best movie of 2005!christine bale stares in this movie and hedid a wonderful job doing it!this movie is about how bruce wayne turns to batman.he trains to be a ninja in asia and then founds that gotham city is flooded over with crimanels.so bruce wayne has to turn into batman to kill his very first villan, the scarcrow who could destroy poeples minds into panik!this movie is awsome!
Very entertaining. Good quality Blu-Ray for the theatrical version. HAve not yet explored the special features.
I'm not sure why this movie has gotten good reviews. It was not good. The dialog was awful, the plot ridiculous (we have to destroy it in order to save it). I wish Liam would stop taking on mentor roles.The final scene was physically impossible (swinging under the train as it was moving. just ask yourself how he swung past the pylons that held the rail up)
Batman Begins was such a relief for Batman fans. Finally we have a movie that is worth braggin about and has taken the franchise in a great new direction. This one is definitely the 2nd best Batman movie to date.. and I say that because The Dark Knight was just so damn good. Even if you're not a "superhero" movie fan, you'll like this one. This takes away the "supernatural/superhero" aspects of other comic movies, and turns it more realistic. Highly Recommend.
It contains a lot of action. However, it does not appeal to me. The acting is not engaging. I don't feel related to the plot. I prefer Spiderman 2.
i saw this movie this past summer it,s a good movie it,s better than other two batman movies batman forever and batman and robin. this movie got something right as far the comic goes theJoker did n,t kill bruce pranets keaton did a better job as batman mr bale played a good batman this movie. Has Minor actor in it a good saga review 7/10
I also do not know why they bothered with this limited edition gift set. The extra disk does nothing except waste your time.
It was a gift for my nephew for Christmas. It came in great shape and even included a comic book!
Christan Bale as a young Bruce Wayne/Batman is a much needed reinvention of the Batman movie franchise. He has amazing screen presence and makes you believe that he is the Dark Knight. I was impressed how naturally he jumped into the role and made it his own.The story is tight and easy to follow. The cinematography is beautiful, especially the parts filmed in Iceland. Big sweeping shots of snow covered mountains and raggedy buildings lining the slopes. Just fabulous.The 2 disc DVD set is spectacular. The video transfer is almost perfect and there are plenty of extras for the rabid Batman fan. The compilation comic book is a very nice addition. I would recommend this set to anybody.
My 2 year old son received this toy as a gift. Although he somewhat enjoys playing with it, I was seriously disappointed with the functionality of the click bricks.First, the click bricks don't 'stick' together well. If you pick up two joined sections or try to reposition them they fall apart -- very frustrating for a 2 year old!! I think the magnets are way too weak. Some of the magnets don't work at all!Second, you can't really build much of anything with the pieces in this set. They have some neat pictures of built projects on the box, but good luck recreating them!I would absolutely not recommend this toy. My son has MUCH more fun playing with his Mega Blocks and with his basic wooden alphabet blocks. Hope this review is helpful to you!
I bought this toy for my son for Christmas. I had bought some of the "trucks" and wanted him to have Bob and Wendy too. I found this set and thought it would be great. They ONLY good thing about this set is that he has Bob and Wendy.The clicking blocks sound like a great concept, but they don't work. If you can get them to click you are lucky. You can not build anything with this set. The box shows a house, buildings, etc., but you can't build these thing because the magnets are in the wrong places and the roofs make the whole thing top heavy!I would avoid this set unless you just really need Bob and Wendy (like us).
I've had this windshield mount for a few months now, and while it works, I can't really say that I would recommend it to anyone else.As the other review said, it shakes quite a bit while driving. However, that is bearable compared to the real problem--the pivot head is just not very sturdy. Hitting the smallest bumps on the road, or even just turning, could cause the pivot head to swivel, leaving your PSP in a slanted position.The pivot head swivels while driving whether or not I have the PSP docked in the windshield mount, so it's not an issue of weight. I end up having to adjust its position every few minutes, which is not exactly the safest thing to have to do while driving.
Firstly, I found this cream to have an odd smell to it. Secondly, it moisturizes well but not as well as I had anticipated and hoped.This product was disappointing and I do not plan on repurchasing. There are other products from NeoStrata that I love but this definitely is not one of them!
I really like this album and I think the intent of the musician is somewhat more involved than the lyrics would have you believe. I think he is railing against the church and how it has distorted and destroyed whatever purity there was about the early Christian movement.Musically, the horror film samples work well next to the distorted vocals. The synths sound fantastic and the percussion has a nice amount of grainy distortion added so that the tracks are rarely boring, if at all - they pound, scream and soar through the average sonic boundary.I agree with Virus mag's review in that this album is not the most original thing out there, but the concept of the album is interesting and keeps it all pieced together. There's nothing bad about this album per se, but nothing really grabs my attention as being too exciting in terms of originality.Nevertheless, a good album for fans of dark electro/industrial/terror EBM.
GoFit Vest great to work with regarding ease of putting it on and especially the velco straps to hold it together. We use it in spiking and agility drills for volleyball. It still allows the arm and shoulder to be used effectively and we really like the weight distributed in the front rather than on the shoulders or back. Highly recommend!!
I really like this product..i've been using it for walking the bridges and the parks and have just started using it for jogging...and i have seen results already...it's funny too when you take it off it feels like you instantly lost 10 lbs...the only thing is that its kinda bulky so you really can't wear it under clothes, you just have to grin and WEAR it...at first i felt silly but, who cares i'm doing this for me and i feel better already!!
This was a really good investment. I use it during some of my aerobic exercise dvds and I walk/jog/run with it on. The only negative is that you can't wear it on the outside of your clothing, because it looks like a bulletproof vest and then there are a lot of eyes staring at you. So, I decided to wear it under my clothing, it is a little bulky but it isn't so bad. I highly recommend it for someone who is new to to the vest. It is economical and it will serve the purpose of helping toGoFit 10-Pound Walking Vest with Removable Water Bottle Holdershed those pounds.
This vest was just as described and the fit was great. It has wide shoulders so the comfort is good. Since I had never used a walking vest, I wanted to start out as recommended with lighter than 10 pounds so removed some of the weights. These were not so easy to get out of the pouches but that means they are securely held in place. I am well pleased with this GoFit walking vest.
These are very pretty but I did not use them on my tree since they look more hot pink than red. In a few years as I add more colors to my tree I will have them.
I love Bodysense products.They stay hot for a long time. I use them in my massage practice as hot packs. The smell is great and it lasts quite awhile. The only thing is as large as it is you need a big microwave to heat it. I wind up folding it then it stops roatating so I have to stop and adjust it. UGH it is a pain. Haven't figured out how to arrange so it heats evenly. Otherwise I love it.
I was hesitant to buy this for my new MacBook Pro, but I'm glad I did. I took a little getting used to, but it fits very well over the keys with minimal typing interference. It's not completely transparent so it does cloud the key symbols a little bit, but not enough to make them unreadable in normal light or when the backlighting is on. I don't have any problems with it sticking to the screen (I have the regular, not glossy screen) when the cover is closed. This is cheap insurance for your computer. Liquid spills into the keyboard of a laptop computer are a disaster. The repair will be very expensive and will not be covered under warranty.
This little slipcover for my keyboard has saved the day for our family! I feel safe leaving my 3 year old alone with his drinks watching my laptop now that he understands to keep the keyboard protector on. Really frees me up and helps me not worry about him ruining my computer so much anymore. It would be even better if the edges were sticky enough to hold the cover on more securely, but as is gives me much peace of mind. I think everyone should have one of these!
Yes my friends of this great indstry, this is one of theworld's finest albums of the decade 1990. For so long metalhas been classified in a devilish class of its own. But to bringlight in this world of maddness, this group does indeed bring"spiritual healing" in there heavenly "dark" sound! this groupdoes not exist anymore, so anything that you buy of this bandis a collector's piece! Don't delay on the purchase of this foryou will miss out on a treat. If you are in to dark and evilsounds, but do go to church, you need to get this gift fromGOD, for this is your album filled with the truth. If you arethe other guy, still don't miss out on some good music!!Big Nutt
Got these to put in my camper, great for a low watt system. I am surprised at the bass response in these little speakers. I wouldn't put them in a high power system (they are rated at 75 watt) but for a low watt system they sound very good and look great too.
I was disappointed in this book. I am searching for a book that is equally as awesome as 'A Virtuous Woman', but it looks like Kaye Gibbons isn't going to give it to us. In this book the women are survivors because they have to be. I was disappointed in the cold, compassionless character of Charlie Kate. Her character shined through her words and actions: beneath that arrogant surface lay a very insecure, unsatisfied, unfulfilled, and angry person. I can understand why she didn't have a man: who would want her? Her hatred of men, I think, was more of a jealousy. She had no compassion, so she tried to make up for it in her 'intelligence' and 'literacy'. She tried to hide behind those midwife skills. Although the book was long, it was shallow and I expected a deeper plot.
gibbons weaves a compelling, influencial novel about three generations of women and the lives they lived and their impact on one another. detailed first person through Margaret birch's eye, this story tells of margarget's coming of age during world war 2. the book tells of margaret's mother (who constantly strives to be young and stylish and concequently is quite irresponsible)and her grandmother (a self-proclaimed doctor who always seems to have the right answer as well as unconditoinal love for her grand daughter) with whom she lives. in a dramatic ending, margaret realized that she has to move on from her sheltered home-life and must learn to face the world on her own two feet.
I couldn't help comparing this novel to The Book of Ruth. Like Ruth, it is an intriguing look at the life of a girl growing up, and the influence of family members on this growth. But, unlike Ruth, this book is positive. This book is uplifting. This book is a joy to read. This book is about intelligence, wit and love. This is a book I'd like to write! Pick this one up-then pass it along
Dean -- Love the book -- especially the pictures of Gavin and me -- but you know that. To anyone else who reads this: Dean knows whereof he speaks: He's a good hiker and builds a good, environmentally sensitive campfire. Hope you don't mind my using this avenue to try to get your e-mail address.
****MAJOR SPOILER****DON'T READ IF YOU DON'T WANT TO KNOW****Before I invested time watching this, I wish I had found a review saying there was a death of a major character at the end. I wouldn't have bothered, it wasn't that good anyway. Maybe this review will save someone. Giving it 2 stars because I've seen abyssal films that only deserve 1-star, and this is not that bad.
this was a random movie I picked out on Netflix to watch and I am so glad I did. I laughed, I cried, I know it sounds cliche, but what an amazing love story. Such a great message.
I caught this movie today on LMN, when I was channel surfing. Unfortunately I missed the first 25 minutes. I tried not to let Kent Moran distract me from the plot, but he's gorgeous. He's a screenwriter, musician and actor huh? Not just a pretty face. Anyways, back to the movie... It was a movie about real people, that I could relate to. I'm buying this so I can see what I missed.
Great movie filmed in New York, directed by Matt Thompson and written by Kent Moran. Scenes were filmed with the 'Red Cam' so it feels like you're right there with the actors. It's a great story about a high society deaf girl (controlled by her mother) and an ordinary 'Joe' (who works for a living) who fall in love. His dream is music and so is hers, even though she can't hear. Make sure to have your tissue ready for it will tug at your heart and the tears will come.It has won many awards in the film festivals throughout the US, one which was 'Best Director' at the Beverly Hills Film Festival.It's another Love Story movie worth watching.
This is an ok book. It is action packed and holds your attention. I think that the main charecter, Dick Shelton, is a lot like many people today even though the book takes place in Medieval times. Dick did not know that he was fighting for his enemy Sir Daniel, the man who had killed his father. I think this is one of the best historical fiction books that I have ever read. I hope that you will like it as much as I did.
When comparing Stevenson's major works, this book just doesn't compare. It's wooden, stilted and written in the voice of Northern UK's speech.
I am an avid fan of DM, and will do the best job at being objective about their work. Although, I think this album is great and it has many quintessential DM songs, there are some songs that I often skip over. These songs are definitely not my favorites, but I think mostly that they just don't appeal to me in the context of this album. This is why I label this "transitions". I love all periods of DM, but I notice this one seems to be one that incorporates the earlier "new wave" feeling of previous albums but also ushers in the darker era of DM. I tend to prefer the darker DM, but appreciate the earlier work especially if not simultaneously. If you are even a slight fan of their work, you will enjoy this album.
This cd blows nothing worth listening to. Really sucks the big unit. One of there worst cds.thank you very muchyour welcome
Very disappointed with this amp. It has an auto shut off, which is a cool feature. However it randomly shuts off while in use. VERY frustrating.
This amp does what it is supposed to do. Only thing I wasn't aware of was that the AB speaker switches don't allow output to go to both speakers at the same time. Maybe this was in the write up but if so I missed it.
An annoying amount of hum and hiss comes from my speakers. The noise is still there without any inputs to the amplifier and it increases as I turn up the volume knob.
Great AMP for the speakers in my garage and Lanai.....Sounds great and easy to useSimple is good...plus the price is right!
I have a whole-house sound entertainment system, which includes a pair of speakers in the dining room, a pair of speakers in the living room, and a pair of speakers in the bedroom. I have a AirportExpress connected directly to this unit, and it has no problem powering all six pairs of in-ceiling speakers. In fact, this unit is so powerful, I cannot turn the volume up beyond the midpoint because I fear that my windows will break. An excellent product for the price.Note: This unit has a single RCA output, so make sure you use a splitter if you intend to connect multiple pairs of speakers to this amplifier.
These other reviewers are kidding you.There are significant problems with this dvd.1. The audio on this dvd is horrible. It sounds like they are talking and singing through a tube. I could have done better in my garage.2. The tracks are: all the singing and stories in english, or the same program in Mandarin. There is no teaching whatsoever.I realize there are not many dvd's for teaching children Mandarin, however there are a few better than this.
I'm not a math cripple but I will admit that I have not always been that great when it comes to math. I have recently grown a hunger for science in general, ( including mathematics of course) and thought I should look for a book to help me grasp math from another perspective. I actually read many of the pages in the book and while I did understand the first couple pages , I found myself lost as I continue reading. As another reviewer mentioned , this is not a book for the layman. I wouldn't recommend this book to anyone who is not that good at math. I guess I'll just keep looking elsewhere to find books on the subject that will help me on my journey to become better at math.
3 or 4 college buds all court the same row captain and then she becomes pregnant///focuses all around the bar and their goofiness...when word comes out she has a kid, they all rush, not knowing who is the dad and they all step up - but it is pretty playful and not realistic.
I have bought about 6 pairs of this short. They are very confortable and wear very well. I'm pretty hard on them because I wear them for work. The hold up very well, good purchase.
This Biblical fiction is a great introduction to the story of King Hezekiah. The characters have depth and I am eager to read the next book in the series.
Chronicles of the Kings # was a great introduction to the series. I gained a different insight into the History
This was a great book to read. I had a hard time putting it down! Can not wait to read the next one!
I love history - especially Biblical history and this book uses the information in the Bible and then builds on that information with researched information to make it come alive. It seemed like a long book at the start but it ended too soon.
Loved the connection not only with history and the Bible but also with Lynn's interpretation of the characters. Made me want to seek out the Word in the Kings and Chronicles. Anything that leads us to the Lord has to be great.
I have no idea what all these reviews for this brand of dieters tea are talking about. I followed the directions nothing happened. Brewed a stronger cup-still nothing.Even measured out the water to 6oz and let the tea bag seep for five minutes-nothing just stronger tasting tea. On the box it tells you not to drink more than 1 cup in a 24 hour period- I drank three the other day not even thinking about it and nothing happened! Just tasted like cranberry tea and nothing else. Strange.
I got the tea fast, and followed the instructions, only drinking 1/2 cup, which had no effect on my system, it taste pretty good though.
Sometimes one forgets the great singers of but a few years ago. This 1971 performance recording, made in Tokyo, though visually a bit dark, is acoustically sparkling with the singers' joy with Donizetti's music. He would surely loudly applaud this effort. Both Fiorenza Cossotto and Alfredo Kraus are at their peak. To say nothing of Sesto Bruscantini and Ruggero Raimondi in supporting roles. This opera, unfortunately, is often overlooked for the better known Donizetti works. Well worth enjoying as the music is grand, the arias are among his finest and the ballet a treat to see.
The first and second Robocop films were great. I loved the over-the-top action and humor elements in both films.Robocop 3 is a pure, unadulterated disaster. First off, it is way too tame (a PG-13 rating??!!). Second, the "plot" is completely ruined by the introduction of the "cute little kid who is a computer whiz" character, what a travesty! Third, the movie is actually boring; a boring Robocop movie! I could go on and on, but why bother.They dare to put this garbage on DVD?
When a movie has dialogue like, "I thought your ninja was supposed to take care of RoboCop!", it ain't gonna be Citizen Kane. It won't even be a good RoboCop movie. But if you must indulge, look for the strings holding up RoboCop when he flies. Yes, I said look for the strings holding up RoboCop when he flies.
I enjoyed all but one of the 11 stories in this book from 1927 to 2002. Even though I didn't enjoy Pamela Zoline's "The Heat Death of the Universe" I can see why it is an important story to include in this collection of some of the science fiction that can be seen as feminist. "seen as feminist" here is the key I think especially when you look at the essays paired with each story. A few of the essays were spot on -- looked at the author and the story in their historical context. Others rambled between sharing previous scholarship and trying to find multiple readings of the material one of which was a feminist interpretation. The 11 stories are intense and moving, challenging the reader while entertaining. I loved that they were organized chronologically because I could see a flow and development of the feminist voice. I wish a concluding essay had tied them all together to bring this out more.
EVERYTHING ABOUT ALBUM MAKES ME WANNA GRAB A GUN AND SHOOT MYSELF. THAT'S HOW BAD IT IS. IT'S LACKS EMOTION, AND IT SOUNDS FORCED. LIKE THEY ARE TRYING TO HARD TO SPREAD THE WORD INSTEAD OF TRYING TO MAKE GOOD MUSIC. EVERYTHING ABOUT THIS CD IS SO GENERIC, SO DULL, SO PREDICTABLE. ONLY A MORON WOULD THINK THIS IS A WORTH WHILE CD TO LISTEN TOO.
This book is so mesmerizing! Try "Perla at the Mexican Border..." (p. 41):Her job was to sort through the eyes/ of dolls. Snapping hollow limbs/ into plastic torsos had been a soothing task/ for Perla, like arranging the peas into the pod/Beautiful imagery in very simple moments. Gonzalez doesn't take anything for granted. Small moments become big ones. This is exemplary poetry. I recommend this to everyone I know!!! The NPS made a great choice!
Originally I purchased this book because my Granddaughter's name is Sophia and I know how little ones enjoy stories that include their name. But I would purchase this book for a little one just because it is a good book. The pictures are bright and bold, the text right at the level of a preschooler AND it opens up to display a long train! A fun book to read together!
I must say that, even for Troma, this one was pretty bad. A plane crash leaves tourists stranded on a tropical island that happens to be the home base of a group of nasty terrorists. Now, think Troma: how would YOU work with this plot? Needless to say, there are MANY dead before it ends. I thought there was a limit to the amount of blood and guts one could put into a movie (and smear on a woman's breasts) untill I saw "War". The movie is rather low quality, not like some of the newer Troma releases, but if you like classic Troma, it dosn't get any more classic than this. Not one for the kiddies!
There is a little detective in all of us, but in most cases one wouldn't know where to begin. If you are curious about possible existence of paranormal phenomenon this book gives you that place to start. Whether a skeptic,a believer,this book gives the information needed to begin simple investigations in a manner that is easy to understand. For someone who hasn't had years of experience in the paranormal, or criminal investigation some of the books available can be intimidating. Mr Southalls book however makes you feel that doing your own investigation is within abilities. This book is not perfect, but it give an excellent starting point for the novice to begin investigating from.
A very basic book, seems to be a promotional tool for certain tours, if this type of book is your first read it will serve a purpose.
Absolutely one of the most beautiful little necklaces around. Get it and you will get lots of compliments on how nice it is. I was so happy that I purchased it.I had been looking for over three years for the perfect heart and key set, and this is it. Very nice weight and size and very expensive looking.Trust me if you get it or give it, you'll be pleased.
The print is so incredibly small that I couldn't even finish reading it (I am in my early 30's with perfect vision and do not use glasses). Seemed like a cute story if only the format was better.
Date: 11/28/2008 (I bought this for Christmas 2008)My brother-in-law had wanted a Clint Eastwood Poncho for a long time but the ones I saw were pretty expensive. Then I saw this one on Amazon. Not only was the price right, but the look and quality are great! The seller notified me immediately that the item was on backorder, but it ended up arriving sooner than expected. Superb seller and wonderful product!
I really liked the cards. I teach a class in creativity and I was able to give them to individual students to encourage their creative growth.
Tittle the "ethicist" (more like elitist) puts her faith in Eugenics. Welcome to Nazi Germany for the 21st century.She proposes the development of a contraceptive vaccination universally administered to children at puberty, the antidote only given following an individual's licensing by the government. Now logically, the inevitable illegal pregnancies would have to be halted by abortion. Forced government abortions. China, anyone? Or at the very least, ripping babies from the arms of "unsuitable" mothers and awarding them to more correct ones. Fascist Argentina in the 1970s?Wonder why so many copies of her book are available for sale used? Hmmm. Remainder table. Should have aborted the book.
I remember being about 10 or 11 years old and being frightened out of my mind by the scary Bjork lady dancing around on a truck on MTV. Sufficet to say, I couldn't understand why she was getting rave reviews. A coupla years later I saw her on Jay Leno singing a big-band song and loved it. The screaming was a little odd for me, but I recanted and bought the single to "It's Oh So Quiet." Can you say, "Excellent"? I immediately went out and purchased this CD, "Post" and was blown away at how awesome it is! There are so many good songs on here, it is definitley a CD everyone should own. Don't miss it! And by the way, Bjork being scary just makes her oh so much more appealing, wouldn't you say?
I'm a big bjork fan - I'm also a big fan of the higher fidelity DVD Audio format and remastered CD sound (although some remasters are atrocious) - so I thought this disc was a great buy.However I wasn't pleased to find that the CD Audio side won't play in the car or on the computer as it's not recognized as a CD Audio disc (apparently not uncommon with Dual Discs) - just as frustrating is the lack of true DVD-Audio using MLP (Meridian Lossless) which is superior to the Dolby and DTS surround sound provided here. Interestingly my computer was happy to read the DVD side but reports the surround sound as 48/24 for both Dolby and DTS not the 96/24 claimed. If you are looking for the superior audio you thought this disc offered - then you'll need to be happy playing it on your DVD player only. Disappointing. I already own the videos on DVD - so I haven't taken that into consideration in this review.
This version of the play is MISSING Acts III and IV.Act IV, Scene ii contains some of the most famous lines of Shakespeare: "Fear no more the heat of the sun ..." So, if you need this play, are crunched for time, and need it to supplement a research paper on stream-of-consciousness and Mrs. Dalloway ... I would definitely GET ANOTHER VERSION!Thanks a lot for the complete rip off.
This is the same dvd that I had previously purchased with a different cover. I will keep it because I like the workout and the previous dvd skips in places.
This cd was alot different than waiter. The first track is the next eight put together. Long ambiant phases between dark synth driven songs, much more digital than the pervious album. his vice is possibly better in this cd, definatly worth the ep price
I have been buying these before (from Microcenter). They are very cheap and I thought it was a very good deal. Particularly their 2600mAh for 5 bucks! But...Cons:-Of all the NiMh batteries I tried. This has the most number of failures. Some just dies. Some would hold very low charges after just a few cycles.-It is bigger in circumference compared to other batteries. Which will not fit some of my cameras and gadgets.-Exterior is made of paper and gets easily smashed, deformed.Pros:-Price. but for this kind of quality... not worth it.Also: With all the new low discharge batteries flooding the market (Eneloops, Rayovacs, Duracell, Kodak, etc.) There is no longer any reason to buy this kind of batteries. Even this company is now manufacturing their own Hybrio.
I picked this book up thinking it would be good (yes, I judge books by the covers). It was awful...I am not sure why I even kept reading it all the way through. There is no action or anything. He and his brother are poor, his brother gets girls (he doesn't)...boring..boring. I don't even know what the author was trying to communicate with the audience. If you don't want to waste your time, don't read this book.
If you want to shoot bbs at your room mate indoors, this is definitely the way to go. Has a ridiculous rate of fire, which is faster than the Pulse M74, but it is also weaker than the Pulse M74. The hopper doesn't hold as many bbs as it should, however (~70).
Every recipe I have tried thus far has been either 1) bland or 2) outright disgusting. I need to throw this book away before I waste more time and money on disastrous recipes.Silken Chocolate pie: NastyBlack Bean Dip: TastelessSkinny Dip: I cant believe this is considered food.One plus is that it inspired some great dishes. Since I don't eat eggs, high protein breakfasts are hard to come by. I made a tofu veggie casserole (not following the book's recipe, but rather the general concept) and it came out wonderful...but all in all this book has been a waste of money- beyond the purchase and shipping costs.
This looked great at first... but then I started looking at the calorie counts for most of the dishes. Most of the Main Dishes have less than 200 calories, some have less than 100. I don't have time to cook and eat 8-10 meals per day.
These guys really are great. Too bad they broke up before they could really big. they're big but i mean REALLY big. I'm planning on buying this album once i'm not broke. I've litened to thier free mp3s on mp3.com and they are really good. I look forward to the purchasing of this album.
I didn't think anger was a real problem for me until I got married and some things I thought to be essential needs weren't being met by my spouse. This book has shown me some powerful principles on how to understand and deal with my anger constructively rather than destructively.
It's a trick ! unless you have a religious outlook don't buy this book ! Just got it today and it sneaks in all sorts of nonsense.
this book is for christians and i am not a christian. i cannot use this in my work as it is illegal for me to foster christian beliefs on my residential clients. i was very disappointed in it as it was noted nowhere it was christian based. i feel ripped off.
This back brush is what I have been looking for for a long time. others I have tried were too soft or were of sponge material that deteriorated quickly or fell off the handle. This one is a good, stiff, scrubbing brush that can get to all those places on my back that I cannot reach.I recommend this to anyone who wants to feel clean and scrubbed.
This item is too short besides being too small. It doesn't fit well at all. At least it didn't cost too much.
I found this novel to be cumbersome and uninspiring. There was not one likable character. I wanted to take Frances by the shoulders and shake some sense into her.
The book pretty much presents itself the opposite of what it claims to be about. How can you just expect teenagers to avoid the dangers if you don't allow them to be well educated about it. Remember the "Just say no" program that was supposed to bring down drug addiction? Well, telling teenagers simply not to do it only encouraged more of the same and it's certainly no different when it comes to sex. No wonder the Bible belt has higher cases of teen pregnancy for following Dobson's pathetic advice whereas the West coast and the Northeast have far lower numbers and percentages of teen pregnancy by providing sex education to students. If you're going to read this book, be warned that the author is just another rightwing special interest hack.
It was so true! And definitely helpful. Teenagers will find encouragement because someone took the time to explain all those confusing changes they go through.
Islamic Mysticism: A Secular Perspective by Ibn Al-Rawandi (Prometheus Books) Any believer needs to fairly read some debunking views of one's beliefs. First it is always important to know other points of view, even if they do not persuade or even tend to subvert the truth of the positions one holds as true and life-saving. This book offers a critique of the Sufi path of transformation by a former seeker who feels there is serious deception and self-deception on the spiritual path and it is better to be rational and consistent in one's views than to seek fantastical delusions. Now such a position is unlikely to appeal to the mystic but if one wants to mature in one's mysticism one should give such nay-sayers a careful hearing, concede their good points and carefully critique the limitations of their point of view. Otherwise perhaps such rationalists are correct and such pursuits are bunk.
Rawandi contends that reliable sources undermine the classical account of Islam and Sufism, and his study seeks to rectify this imbalance through studying the philosophy of religion and traditionalists to provide a new, critical analysis of Islam. Readers already well versed in Islamic religion and history will find this a scholarly, detailed probe.
What a piece of derivative garbage. 311 already made this album and made it better years ago. Give up now and focus on the homework, kids. This music is taking to straight to the unemployment line.
The music is too loud for me but I will send to to friend like that type of stuff
This is an amazing little pot. It brews fast, no leaking and the coffee tastes great!! I have been using it for 3 months now and no problems so I got my mom one and she loves it!! Great for those days when you only want a little coffee.
Two years ago, I brought it and like it. I drink coffee in the morning, so only used it only once a day. Few month after I brought it, its heat plate started growing rusty. I continuely used it for additional six month when the 50% heat plate was rusted. I thought it was an incidence, so I threw it away and brought the same model again. Nine month late, 20% heat plate is rusted.... This time I don't think it is a incidence again.
I bought this product for the girlfriend, who happens to be be a smoker. Her car always smelled really bad, abviously. I purchased this to try and curb the smell and surprisingly, despite the small size of this product it works very well. Keeps the car smelling fresh even after being smoked in.
These guys are really a good match together. So funny and fun to watch with the family. I wish it had the Thin man, which for some reason I thought this had. But I ended up getting the Thin man collection later anyways.
This is a beautifully presented box set of Powell & Loy which gives youan insight to films they made together other than the "Thin Man" seriesthe clarity of the discs and the sound quality surprised me consideringthe films age.As for the actors I would buy a film of Powell and Loy shopping inWal-Mart i'm that easily pleased, but if you want to see the golden ageof Hollywood and a mixture of drama and screwball comedy at its bestthen look no further
While this book didn't scare me, I found it laughable and largely useless for the majority of twin-carrying women who like and trust their obgyns, believe that pain is generally to be avoided, and are actually comforted by the fact that institutions such as hospitals exist. Also, I found the book highly offensive in that it strongly suggested that miscarriage in twin pregnancies is caused by a mother's doubts about carrying twins. Gee, what a wonderful guilt trip to impose on a grieving mother...
I read this book while I was pregnant with my twin daughters and found it incredibly depressing and scary. It was filled with morbid quotes from parents who had a bad outcome, along the lines of, "when not even one of the triplets lived, I went out and got drunk," and seemed to dwell on every possible problem and complication to the point that I was quite stressed and anxious when in fact, my twins were born naturally, five days before the predicted due date, had none of the complications this horrible book made me worry about, and were in excellent health. In fact, I so dislike the book that I go out of my way to warn expectant parents of twins to avoid it. In addition, the dietary advice is ridiculous and it's impossible for even a hearty eater to consume the massive amounts of food this writer claims are necessary to having a healthy baby. So, unless you like being scared, I recommend against buying this book.
Writer uses the war as filler while trying to pass off child molesting as romance. Couple doesn't get together until the end of the book. Big disappointment and some mistakes with Civil War history.
After having numerous store-bought scales, always thinking, Geez, I don't weigh that much or WOW,I lost a few,only to find out the scale was the culprit. The adjusting wheel would only "Zero" the dial, and not correct the problem. The Detecto "physicians scale"Detecto 437 Balance Beam Doctor/Physician Scale, 400 lbs, Made in the USAis just what I was looking for. After an easy assembly and adjustment I checked the accuracy by putting various weights on the platform, from 25#s to 250#s and it was "right on". I wish I would have bought this sooner, and it's "Made in the USA" !!!!
Passion Street is a cracking single from former Dr Hook vocalist Dennis Locorriere. The close harmony backing vocals & Dennis's spoken intro instantly remind you of the "old band" while retaining a fresh, crisp sound. Well wort checking out (as is the album).
Queen loved to experiment. Every time they released a new song, I would hear it and say (in delight), "Is that Queen?" However, this album abandoned all that was Rock and Roll and gave into the pop craze of disco that can only be classified as the dark ages in pop music. The only bright spot from this album was "Under Pressure." Thankfully, they pulled out of it to cement themselves as one of the greatest rock bands of all time.
Queen played in 1982 with new sounds; The result was an entertaining record, however much called die hard fans criticized it.
I had enough of a balance on a gift card for one CD. After listening to samples of selections from Liona Boyd, Ana Vidovic, Susan Isbin and Martha Masters, I came across this one. I listed to the samples over and over and finally ordered it, largely because I liked the sounds of the duet. Once I received the CD and played the selections all the way through, I think I made the right choice. This is a superb collection. These two ladies brilliantly blend melodies and harmonies, with a little dissonance thrown in here and there.I've had it for a few months now and it's still as fresh as when I first listened to it. You know sometimes when you get a new CD, you're hyped up on it and listen to it over and over, but then after a while it takes its place amongst the rest of your collection? Not this one for me. Whenever I need to wind down, this is the one I listen to and I haven't grown tired of it yet.
Saw them at an outdoor concert and they were great. This is a good cd even if you do not care that much for bluegrass you will like this.
As a huge fan of Buffy-only the original novels, though, this whole 'series' was actually pretty good. I may still like the gatekeepers trilogy better, but hey, each of these 4 books were only 2.99 or so, and they don't take long to read. Worth a look .
My poor son was so eager to play with this toy after receiving it for his birthday. But he was quickly disappointed. The tank was too heavy when filled with water and the straps would not adjust enough to fit on him (we had to rig the straps). The tube would come out of the tank when i tried to pump the tank. Which I had to pump repeatedly. Was not a toy that he could play with on his own, someone had to be present to constantly pump it. Was just as disappointed with another spiderman blaster. They need to change the age range on these toys to 18 and up!
I don't remember ever seeing my nephews play with this toy.I'm sure I didn't pay much for it but the excitement for this toy didn't last too long after the initial opening on Christmas eve.
See the reviews for the AUA-1422 - a similar item with one extra 1394 port. Adaptec has some crazy requirements for a power supply (12V, 2.1A), and used to offer one that fit them through their store, but apparently no longer do! Without the adapter, this unit is only usable for items that draw almost no power through the USB or 1394 connection - which is a shame, because the Adaptec 1394 implementation was always the most stable on my machines. Look for one that includes an AC adapter or some other way of bringing power to the unit instead.
Grab a teen and watch it with them if you've got one around.Saw it awhile ago, wasn't that impressed. Teenaged Daughter wanted to watch it, so I sat with her and enjoyed it more this time.Thought provoking, and a conversation starter.
Keir Gilchrist, an impressive kid actor of kid movies, had grown up as well as his character-a sixteen year old sex-experimenting pupil who had checked himself into psycho ward to cure from depression with a single pill only.It is surely a deep-meaningful work for viewers M15+, of a kind of such a medicine and a world in and outside the nut house screened.
Great story of a teenager who spends a week in a mental health ward makes new friends and changes his life.
I could not finish this mess...everyone in it should be embarrassed kind of a very poor production , story and cast!
Slow paced and dragging this story could have been told in a better way. Even those with mental illness are not so lackluster. I was grateful for fast forward.
Fun if you have a young male child that isnt into the music... it fart and burps and makes annoying noises during the music. not the toy for me but i think little boys would find it funny (but i do see it getting old quick)
I give this collection of sonatas only two stars because the way they were recorded only allows two fifths of them to play on my Bose. I returned them once, received a quick replacement - the same. Most of them have to be played in the car. Also, I believe Barenboim plays some of the sonatas too fast - just because he can.
I first heard of these guys in a short article of Guitar World and later found this CD at a music show for pretty cheap and decided to pick it up. While the songs are very heavy complete with loud vocals, humorous lyrics, heavy fast power chords, and screaming solos, what do you expect from a 90's punk band? NP proves to the world, that they play what they want to and not what the public wants to hear. Their live shows sound very interesting complete with a fire-breathing bassist and crazy stage antics. If you like it loud and fast, give this one a try! You gotta love the cover too, heh.
I love this sauce whisk. It's comfortable to hold while whisking and easy to clean. I highly reccomend getting one for yourself.
R. Kelly is still on top! TP-2.com consists of 19 blazin tracks, some of my favorite tracks are Fiesta, Just Like A Real Freak, I Wish, I Wish (remix), Strip For You, Greatest Sex, Feelin on Yo Booty, I Mean, I Don't Mean it, All I Want, Just Like That The Storm is Over Now, this track is no doubt the best song on the album, this song is tight! and many other tracks are good too. If don't have this album, get out there and get it. If you don't like slow R&B don't get this but if u do I would recommend this for you. I saw R. Kelly in concert and he is awesome, he keeps droppin those platinum hits for his fans. Get this album right now! ... peace
r kelly goes back to his freaky roots on this one, if you wanna hear kelly talk about oral sex for the millionith time please get this, if you love bump-n-grind, 12 play and classic kelly then this is especially for you. fellas, ladies you better protection on this.
R kelly's carrer is full of contradictions. On one song he's singing about how good GOD is, then the next song he's Feeling on ya Boody. R kelly has so much potential to be a respectful artist. But if he continues on the corse he is now, the qualtiy of his character will continue to be decline along with his music.
I was never much of an r and b fan till i heard this album. R. Kelly is an amazing artist and this is his best work yet. There are very few album where i can listen to every song from start to finish but this is one of them. If you have any doubts about getting this album BUY IT. you wont regret it.
this will help you to under stand life and your own self needs and how to listen to your inter soul if you follow your owen heart. it has helped me to see thing a little different.
Love this book, it's the first time in my life that I am meditating daily! The exercises are great, the pace that you work through the book is excellent. Sonia really knows what she's talking about, very real and grounded, practical and useful advice. I am getting this book for a few close friends for gifts!
I'm naturally a huge fan of Jeff Corwin and his work to help nature and its inhabitants is very much needed these days. He does a wonderful job in putting you in the locale that he is in. Vivid descriptions and his natural mix of humor makes this an excellent book for any reading enthusiast. Great photos included. Definetely worth adding to your collection. You'll have lots of fun reading it!
Jeff Corwin is an amazing man who has many adventures to share. His love for animals shines in every word he writes.
The Precious Moments Stories are great.We like to keep them in our home to share with childrenthat come to visit ~ we enjoy watching them over and over again as well.
An oft time time spooky alternative history of a world where the Cuban Missile Crisis ended in war.The story of a newpaper reporter while in the process of reporting on just another murder stumbles across clues to the biggest secret known. There are those that will pay any price to keep him from unraveling the truth.
How many of other readers purchased this book and got to page 277 and found the pages blank to 477? The store it was purchased at was going to just exchange it however in review of the 5 they had in stock, all had the same blank pages. The store then refunded my money. The book was great up until then.
These shoes are a little high price wise, but you can't beat the convenience. Right at your doorstep and back into childhood for just a few extra dollars. No brainer. Will be back for more.
These are good shoes. They have a classic look and the monochrome look adds a nice little something something. A good, safe buy.
Converse Unisex Chuck Taylor All Star Plaid Hi SneakerGreat shoes at a great price! My daughter loves them :)
I love these shoes and have owned many Chuck Taylor Converse shoes for 30 years. I did forget that when getting this shoe I must order a size smaller than my regular shoe size. This can be frustrating when ordering shoes online, so don't forget to order 1size down :)
I'm accustomed to Dansko, Sanita, and Allegria shoes, which are all very comfortable, but require a break in period. I'm ok with that. But these never seemed to get broken in. Maybe my feet are just used to soles on my regular brands. I'm on my feet 9 hours a day, on concrete, walking around and up and down stairs, for several miles a day, sometimes with long periods standing (I'm an adult-education instructor). I have heard so many great things about chucks and really wanted a different shoe I could wear from time to time, and was hoping these would be it. I wear a 10 (40) in women's and the 8.5 chucks fit my foot well (thankful I read the other reviews and knew what size to order) but they just aren't the shoe for me.
awesome shoes. what can i say. look great with pants, jeans, khakis. whatever. versatile, durable, sylish. you won't regret this purchase. maybe run a half size bigger than my size. but it's iffy.
This chef coat is very, very large (I ordered a med.) if you are a ladies size 16 or larger this may fit you -- but the coat has no shaping whatsoever -- so you will look like a big marshmallow (mine is white) -- also, where the collar meets at the neck has a very large space -- which is not traditional and looks very odd. The fabric quality is OK, which for the price is not so great. Perhaps this was cut for men, but the buttons and fabric would make it too girly. This coat design needs to be amended and shaped and the overlap (where the buttons cross over) needs to be re-thought as the fabric hangs down and bunches under the coat -- so the bottom hem is not 'clean' -- it needs a button underneeth or something to stop that from happening.
I have read this play and also performed the part of Joan on stage many times. Shaw's play brings the soul of Joan to life. A girl with no formal education - defeated the English, won a crown for a king, and was tried and burned as a witch - dead at or under the age of 23. No wonder she was made a saint. The story would almost be a horrible fairy tale, if it wasn't true.
I will not usually recommend a mono CD unless there is no other version of the work in question or the performance is superlative. Well, there are many recent CDs filled with "the antique music," but none bear up so well as the Amadeus reissue of the 1961 <Instrumental Music of 1600> (AMD 7007) as performed by the Concentus Musicus Wien under Nikolaus Harnoncourt, the man who was one of the pioneers of "period instruments" in recordings. Here we have 23 cuts of music from France (du Tertre, du Caurroy), England (Holborne, Morley, Tomkins, Cooper, Bevin), Germany (Sommer, Posch, Scheidt), and Italy (Cabrielli, Gumai, Massaino), all of which is available elsewhere and perhaps some of which is played as well and in better sound. I will deduct a rating-point, however, for its short running time of 46 minutes. But all in all, this is gorgeous music gorgeously played.
This well-written book examines virtually all arguments regarding the death penalty. In addition to exposing current practices, Just Revenge also puts the death penalty in an historical context. Its inevitable conclusion, as it demolishes every well-cherished but incorrect justification for the death penalty (with the exception of a clause in the 5th Amendment) , is that the only thing proponents have left on their side is indeed just revenge. Mark Costanzo's own opinion is clear virtually from the start, but he backs it up with fact after devastating fact. If you want to learn more about the death penalty, this is an excellent place to begin. It is also a useful reference book as it is chock-full of statistics and anecdotes.
These caps are hard to find. Being a deputy sheriff it is a necessary item to have. I have put it to good. Use and found it to be recognizable and protective. Best yet, the price was reasonable for a quality product.
Thank you, this item was exactly what I wanted it to be. It is a good purchase on my part. thanks!
I have been reading this book in my intro to native american studies.. and I hate it... I feel it give the wrong image towards northwest native history...
Be careful scrapbookers!!! This is NOT like the original Cropper Hopper! It is not deep enought to fit 12X12 paper. Don't make the same mistake I did!
Ordered two, and billed for two, as Christmas presents. Received one, which was a misassembled plastic piece of garbage. Oh well, my fault for buying jewelry over the net. Should, at least, receive what I ordered, however. So I wrote the dealer to either send the second one or issue a refund. Never could get a reply. Threw the one that had arrived in the trash. Would have given this a negative rating, if "1" were not the lowest number available.
I read this book two years ago and had the opportunity to participate in an interview with the author on National Public Radio. Ms. Gibbons was gracious, of course, but she could not answer the obvious difficulties in this book. The chronology is confused, and while the book reaches for important issues, ie the need for a young girl to have a mother, the treatment of the characters is shallow. The longing is there, and it is expressed well, but ultimately, the miraculous "healing" of the mother and her immediate death after her restoration--undermine whatever strength was in the novel.The one character that the reader has no trouble believing is Pearl, the caring maternal housekeeper. She is a jewel of characterization, much needed and appreciated in this novel.
Maybe it's because I've been listening to the energetic and inspired electronic music of german industrial/EBM for the past few years. Or perhaps it's just Prodigy did not put enough effort into this release. Whatever the reason, I can't recommend this single...Baby's Got A Temper just does not catch the attention of my ears. In ways it does mimic the style of a few of Prodigy's past songs with the break beats and repeating synth lines, but it just can't match the magic of their former hits like Breathe and Firestarter. The remixes of Baby's Got A Temper are not really that much to look forward to on this single either. Even die-hard Prodigy fans should find somewhere to listen to this single first before buying it. Hopefully Prodigy's upcoming album will incorporate some more inspired songs for redemption from this lackluster single.
The Prodigy are back!"Baby's Got A Temper" is a fantastic record - just whatwe need right now in an age where all the music industryhas to offer is endless, dire amounts of pop-garbage.The only bad thing I have to say about this great CD isthat the other mixes don't vary too much from the originaltrack, being a dub and instrumental (respectively). I wouldhave preferred a couple of new tracks.That said, "Baby's Got A Temper" is such a great,catchy song, that I still enjoy the other versions and Ijust can't get enough of the tune itself anyway!:) Great video too!!Absolutely recommended!
The first song I heard on this album was "Bounce," and to be quite honest, I wasn't impressed. But I saw the CD at Best Buy, and thought, "Why not." I must say it has not been something I've regretted. This is nu-metal years ahead of any other band you will find out there, with insightful underlying political protest all the way through. But if you want an album to just rock out to... well this is actually an amazing choice anyway. There is some amazing stuff here. Like "Chop Suey!" a deeply touching/disturbing song about the unpleasant topic of suicide and "Toxicity" a song about the terrible disorder in the world. With the split of Rage Against the Machine, there is little possible competition for System on their way to the nu-metal top.
As much as I enjoyed System of A down's first effort, it took me a long time to get into this one. But I guess i'm like that with every new cd a band comes out with. Anyway. I think that on this cd Serj shows more of his vocal ability to go really high than down to a near death metal scream in prison song, but I was disapointed that the drummer, did not do any crazy drum solos as he did on the band's self-titled debut. All in all i really enjoyed this cd and I would highly recommend for anyone who is starting to get into metal or into System of a down. The single "Chop Suey!" is definitely one of the songs where the bands demonstrates the most musical talent in my opininon. Although the sound of the song is a bit more radio-friendly than the rest of the cd, it is still a great song. Another song with great talent is the song "Toxicity" which has proven to become my favorite on this multi-faceted album.
Awsome cd...almost evry song is worth listening to...prison song,pogo,and chop suey are all realy good.
I'm going to make this short and sweet: it's not the greatest album in the world because I still can't listen to the whole thing straight through, but I just have to say that "Toxicity" is one of my most favorite songs in the world, you just can't beat the guitars in this song, and the drums are amazing! "Chop Suey!" is also great, it's got interesting allusions to God and Jesus, "Psycho" is good headbanging fun (and warns you to stay away from cocaine too!), and "Aerials" is nice and meaningful. Oh, and "Bounce" is hilarious... but I'll leave it up to you to buy the album and figure out what they're really talking about.
Listin to The velvet underground's Murder Mystery and then listen to chop suey. You can not tell me they didn't rip that intro from the velvets.I Dont care about this CD I just felt like saying that they ripped the velvet underground's murder mystery off.
I may have enjoyed this album, had i been 14 years old or deaf. Strangely enough i listen to new and old metal but there is somethin about this band i dont like, #1 his voice is very annoying from the get go, where are they going with this garbage.Its been awhile since weve seen some fresh new metal/music that is decent and i have a feeling something is coming cause if it isnt,i dont think this genre will be pop much longer.
This CD is really , really awesome. It's not that i only like this heavy metal/rock genre. Quite frankly, i like every type of music, besides country, that is.(heh) This is a review coming a person who likes everything from Dido to Disturbed. rap, rock, whatever, i like it all. This is just a really good CD for anyone who likes any music at all and also has very good taste. Very great work from SOAD that should be enjoyed by everyone
Along with their self titled album, these two are the best albums I have heard ever by any group.
This is one bad [rear] group! I have both of their albums and the only problem is that I listen to them so much that I can't get the songs out of my head.Killer lyrics and wonderful beats. You won't be disappointed.
There is only 2 good songs on this cd and you here them on the radio all the time. This is depressing dreadful music I wanted to slash my wrist after listening to it but instead I broke it and toss it in the trash can were it belongs.
Upon hearing the song Toxicity on MTV I had absolutely no hesitation in buying this album knowing that it would contain at least one gem. What I didn't expect was such consistency.Initially tracks like X and Forest do not stand out as much as MTV hits Chop Suey! and Toxicity, however on further listens you will discover that it is the lesser known tracks that hold your interest and ensure this album stays in your cd player for a while. I now hope to see these guys live at some stage to see if the energy displayed on this album translates as well in live performance.
This is a great cd.I have listened to this cd probably 20 times and it never gets old.All the songs are good.
This music is sooo old and tired. These punks are your typical angry Californians...you know the ones..."Lets all Riot, and then cry discrimination when the Police arrest us for commiting crimes, lets overthrow the corupt government, the government puts too many people in jail" etc, etc. Blah Blah. (...) Anyway, musically the CD is average, and lirically the CD is terrible. Only a cute video and MTV's air play (...) have brought commercial success to these sad sacks. (...)
Ok..... Chop suey is the only good song on this cd.. if u expect that this cd will be like there Last LP that's where your wrong.. they seem to have a christian\gospel touch...insted more of a heavy metal\rock touch... if u want some real metal\rock try Slipknot,Static-x,Disturbed,Slayer,pentara and more artists like that.
NICE CASE. GOOD QUALITY. PHONE FIT A BIT SNUG TO START BUT LOOSENING UPAND FITTING BETTER WITH TIME.
If you want one book to do it all, get this one.At least it provides you with a vision of most of the issues surrounding infertility.It provides excellent information on female infertility issues.It provides cursory information about male infertility issues.We have recommended and loaned out this book to several friends, and they all were happy with the details provided.
I love this series! It's funny, inspirational, and adventerous! We started this series in a small church group and all of us are loving it!
I would recommend this book to law students in both pre-law and law school. Well written and covers important cases.
poor Adam Crall, reviewer. Cameroon is its own, French-speaking nation in Africa. It is NOT in South Africa, which is also an independent nation.
We are really enjoying this puzzle, and learning a lot. The information written on the oceans makes the puzzle more interesting and manageable.The pieces are necessarily very small to match the size of the countries. The bigger problem is that they curl up just a bit, so the pieces don't lie flat as you make the puzzle. This is frustrating, and you don't get that satisfying feeling as you put a piece in, as you have to press it down a few times and it still doesn't quite flatten down. I'm trying covering the finished puzzle with heavy books, but I suspect it's just a problem of cheap glue.Still, I give it four stars since a good world puzzle is very hard to find, and the content is good.
Bought 2 of these with the idea of keeping one and giving the other to my mother. Neither worked well and failed soon after using. The seller was magnificent and refunded our money.
I thought that this was a positive development in the series bringing in new characters and expanding on the plot world's development. The first part is devoted to developing new characters and expanding threads while the last third is action with the characters. This has a lot of foreshadowing and will fit in with follow books and new series. Overall worthwhile. Reads best when in conjunction with the other books in the series.
Victoria Hamilton seems to pop up everywhere, whether in lesser parts as in Pride and Prejudice, in "bad girl" parts such as in Mansfield Park, or in this delightful version of the complex relationship between Victoria and Albert. This one needs to be compared with a somewhat different interpretation of the relationship in "The Young Victoria." Victoria's handling of her long period of grief over Albert's death is also well done in "Mrs Brown." For English history lovers, all of these are worth viewing, interesting, and nicely filmed.
Electronic power pop that sounds fresh to this day. The beats are more bubblegum punk than straight-up dance music. The songs have hooks the Archies would kill for: Catchy, and completely addictive. You can bet your modern day synthpop bands like Ladytron, Freezepop, Hyperbubble, and Bis listened to this stuff in their sleep. Many say it's Depeche Mode at their best, many disagree. Whatever the case, there's no other DM album like it, and every song is great. If you eat this electrocandy up and want more, there are a few more Speak and Spell moments on DM's second album.Comment | Why no voting buttons? We don't let customers vote on their own reviews, so the voting buttons appear only when you look at reviews submitted by others.
If you like battles against ultimate evil, religious overtones, and special effects - with a twist, rent Constantine. Yes, you have to suspend disbelief. Yes, you have to accept somewhat two-dimensional personalities. But if you get past that, you get a nicely shot, tense, supernatural crime saga with a couple of interesting characters. Most folks will have never heard of Constantine or Hellblazer, on which the movie is loosely based, but it's fine if you haven't. The movie is good enough on its own for an enjoyable night.
Lamebrain film that not only rips off a much better film out there (The prophecy) but also lacks the thrills that movie had in spades. Keanu Reeves is still his same self here, which means that he gives another boring acting turn. His fellow co-stars do far more in their parts with Rachel Weisz being the stand out, giving a great performance that has resonance and guts. Djimon Hounsou is good as well but he's barley in the film plus Peter Stormare and Tilda Swinton have great cameos that really should have been bigger roles. Weisz, Hounsou Stormare and Swinton give far more acting weight to this lame brain horror movie than it deserved and for that, they are worthy of the praise (Especially Rachel Weisz, who does lift this movie above the mediocre garbage it's really is.) but regardless of their worthy acting turns, the movie is plague by a script that really does not make any sense and a director who does no know how to direct a movie.
This is bad. Really. Perhaps it is one of those movies which can only be fully understood or enjoyed if familiar with the comic that originated it. It does not even have the redeeming quality of being a decent action film. Guilty of the worst capital sin of the kingdom of entertainment: boring, boring and boring. For that alone, it will burn in cinematic hell.
Extremely awful Keanu Reeves stinker that not only lives up to the word of mouth but surpasses it in spades. Keanu proves once and for all on how bad an actor he is with a groundbreaking bad performance and a script that helps him out a lot in proving that. Only his co-stars come out of this film with their heads held up high with great performances by Rachel Weisz, Djimon Hounsou, and Peter Stormare but not even their great performances can salvage this disaster. This is fresh material for the show " Mystery Science Theater 3000" and I hope they can get a print of this movie and tear it apart for the garbage it really is.
Dumb Keanu Reeves horror epic that is not only the actors worse film by far but a bad film in it's own right. Keanu is just wrong for the role and the script is joke in many ways. Most of the performances are not very good. (Shia LaBeouf was horrible and made Keanu look like an Oscar winner by comparison) The only performance of merit is that of Rachel Weisz and she literally keeps you glued to your seat with her powerful and emotional performance. Unfortunately, while she gives her all, the rest of the movie is in self destruction mold all around her with bad special effects, very bad dialog and a story that makes no sense what so ever.I stand with the majority, Rachel Weisz is the only good thing about this film, so wait for Dvd to see this film and in the mean time rent Runaway Jury or the Shape of things. Two very good movies that compliment Weisz's performance unlike this one does.
Terrible adaptation of the great comic book "Hellblazer" is nothing short of a spit in the eye of the fans of the comic book with a terrible and down right crude performance by Keanu Reeves, who makes a joke out of one of the most beloved cult comic book characters made in the last twenty years. His performance is bad to the point of wanting to throw something at the screen just out of sheer rage. The screenplay is a joke and the dialog rages from bad to much worse as the movie progresses and the special effects are so badly done that the monsters would have been better off if they were puppets instead. Some of the actors in the film are better than the film itself with great performances by Rachel Weisz, who is the only ray of light this movie really has and Djimon Hounsou, who is the only actor who does his comic book character any justice. Despite Rachel Weisz, the movie is bad and not even her talent could have saved it.
I haven't been able to get this movie out of my head. I love it, it was such a brilliant take on the comic book adaption. Sure, I was disappointed at first about the casting choice to play constantine, but it turned out so much better than I expected and I grew to love it. I can't wait for a sequel!Reeves did an outstanding job capturing the spirit of John Constantine, and Rachel Weisz gave her all. The two had such great chemistry and I am thankful they didn't overplay the relationship thing by not overfluffing the movie. It's a great flick you should consider adding this to your collection.Kudos to Francis Lawrence for doing such an outstanding job as a first time movie director.
Constantine has accepted his fate and made peace with it. He knows that death and a hellish afterlife are imminent. Flawed and fatalistic, cigarette between his fingers, he plods along throwing himself into one horrific situation after another, in an effort to help a woman he doesn't even know. It's creepy and powerful. Angels, devils and friends. The guilty and innocent. Keanu Reeves is perfect in this role and it's a movie to watch again and again. Liked it a lot. Reminds me of Sandman Slim stories.
This movie is garbage, stay home and save your money. My friendsand I were trying to stay awake through the entire film, although I don't know why. Sleeping would have been a more productive use of our time, rather than wasting time trying to figure out this film. When the old tired plot finally starts to unravel, we didn't care what was going on. I felt that the actors are an insignificant part of this movie, they don't matter. In other words, this film is so bad, it doesn't matter who was in front of the camera, no one could save this trash. The film is very dark, shot like a low budget film, with a few special effects.My friends and I can honestly say that we did not like anything about this film.
Some wear and tear on the case, but other than that the DVD itself works great, thanks so much :)
this is a decent movie to get a good fright to lol just as good as when i saw it in theaters. i have the dvd and blu-ray now, time to ditch the dvd lol 4 Stars!
Horrible adaptation of the vertigo comic book is not only a smack in the face of the followers of the book with a flat out moronic screenplay that takes all the good out of the comic but also has the worse actor to play the title role of John Constantine. Keanu Reeves not only makes the role into a joke with his lack of talent but makes everyone around him look bad as well. The cinematography is ugly, making the movie a real eye sour and the special effects lack a certain feel to it. Out of the entire cast, only Rachel Weisz comes out with her dignity intact with a very good performance that the movie squanders in order to let Keanu act like a darker version of his NEO character towards the latter half of the film. They should have taken the material seriously and made a great horror movie out of it but instead, we have a children's movie that geared to Matrix heads.Avoid this film like the plague.
My goodness. I rented this movie expecting a scary thriller and it almost put me to sleep. This is Keanu Reeves' Sorriest performance to date...... not that he has had many good ones. His acting was horrible in this movie and the whole movie did not make sense and was just plain Boring to watch. I was very disappointed for this film is just plain awful!!!!!!!
What do you get when you have an actor who can't act, a director who can't direct and a script that is so badly written that you will be laughing your head off at the same time you are throwing up at the pure stupidity of it? You get one of the worse movies ever made. Keanu Reeves performance in this film is so bad, it makes his Bill and Ted movies look Oscar worthy. The direction from first time Director Frances Lawrence is flat out horrible with lousy direction and murky cinematography and the script is so badly written that you are really surprise by what you are hearing from the actors' mouths from time to time. Of all the actors involved only Rachel Weisz and are able to come out of this horrible film with their dignity intact with good performance that this movie really did not deserved. Other than them, almost everybody involved should hang their heads in shame for making such a bad movie.
Horrible and down right stupid Keanu Reeves action/horror movie not only makes the people who pay to see it look stupid but it solidify him as one of the worse actors of our generation with a horrible performance that makes everything about this film into a joke. I feel sorry for his fellow actors which Includes Rachel Weisz, (who give the movie's only real performance) for even being on the same screen with him because despite their good work and effort, he manages to make the movie into a real choir to watch.The word of mouth is justified for this piece of garbage.
Very bad Keanu Reeves film that could be one of the worse films ever made. Keanu sinks it up so badly that he should be thrown out of Hollywood all together and they should include the director and the screenwriters as well because the movie is as bad as Keanu's performance. Out of the entire cast only Rachel Weisz gives a real performance in this movie and she is so good in fact that she does almost redeems the entire film but not even her great talent could save it from the script, which is excruciatingly bad and the direction, which is as bad as the script and lacks focus for what its trying to accomplish. The story makes no sense and manages to go against itself in certain scenes and the climax literally destroys the narrative that the movie was trying to build up.Maybe asking for a competed director and a lead actor who can act was a tall order for the producers of this film.
Dimwitted supernatural thriller that is a major bore for the most part with a dimwitted performance by Keanu Reeves, who is miscast in the main role and a screenplay that is as stupid as it can be. A lot has been said about Rachel Weisz being the only good thing that this movie has to offer and I will agree with that assessment because she does make you care about what is going on with the movie while you are trying to figure out a way to care about the dumb story that is being told. Weisz's performance is much too rich and powerful for a movie like this and she gives you a reason to stick around while in essence there is no reason to even stay till the end. Hellboy was a masterpiece compared to this and that was marginal decent for what it was at the very best.For Weisz's rich and powerful performance, I give the movie two stars. If she were not in the movie, my rating would be in negative numbers. -0.
Truly a pathetic film.The only few minutes of the film that was interesting was the very beginning after this it raced downhill.The Demons and characters were all unbelievable except for the female lead. I can not fathom the audience for this film except for the blind, deaf and dumb. I have never been a fan of Keanu Reeves but some of his films have been exciting. He brought nothing to this nothing. It is hard to tell whether the fault is the script the director or the actor. In short the film was a total waste of time. More than that it was a total theft of time.
I did not like the movie as the dialogue was whispered and it was difficult to understand what was being said, and to make it even more objectionable, the audio level would overwhelm when the scene cut to an action event. The audio level had to be constantly adjusted and the picture was not very sharp even with a Hi-Def monitor. It is suggested Amazon get a limiting amplifier or one of the old CBS Audiomax units like TV broadcasters used in the 60's to prevent the commercials' audio levels from annoying the viewers. Run ALL movies through an audio processor and get this under control.Jim
Horrible can't describe this movie in a right light. This was the worse film I have seen in years and this should prove once and for all on how bad Keanu Reeves is as an actor because he's at his worse in this film. He's so bad that he has the uncanny ability to make you feel stupid once the movie is over, that's how bad he is. The script is a huge mess and most of it does not make sense what so ever and the picture is way too dark in certain areas of the film. Rachel Weisz is great in the movie but she's basically carrying Keanu on her shoulders during most of the film while he over acts in horrific ways and she is stranded with a story that really should have had a good rewrite before it became a shooting script. Other than her, the movie is just a huge help of crap that should not have been made.
Not very good horror action movie that has the right stuff but lacks a certain amount of credibility to mix. Keanu Reeves is semi-fine but miscast and he lacks a character the audience can root for and the rest of the movie is hit or miss in terms of the script which is badly written and the special effects which are not up to par in terms of what has been accomplish recently. I have to agree with what has been said about Rachel Weisz, who is the heart and soul of this movie and she does lift it over the mediocre script and funny dialog. Her performance is golden and worthy of a much better movie.See it for her alone but you will end up feeling sorry for her for being the only good thing about the whole movie.
Didn't see this listed but if you put the supplimental disc in an X-box you can play the Constantine video game.
I brought this tires for a friend in 26 x 1.75 she hasn't had a problem nor has she had a flat and she loves them....
I bought this tire for asphalt and cement roads, like it's name [ city ride ], but after using them for some monthsI noticed that if you have them with too much pressure the on bumps the bike can hit pretty hard and you can lose the control if you are not prepared; better to use low pressure.But the most problematic situation is the grip. I got into an emergency brake, a car show up in front of me, the driver was distracted, then the tire was completely stopped but slipping because it has zero grip because the center part which that is smooth is too wide.I am planning to create some groove to them just to using some more time.If you want your life don't buy this tire. I trust Continental but this was a failure. I can't imagine this tire in rainy conditions.
I FOUND THIS BOOK VERY USEFUL Being a practicing Christan and not being into WICCA or Witchcraft I have never had the occassion to purchase a book on candle burning before now. I had always associated such practices and being associated with Satan worship. Boy was I dead wrong. The author says that candle burning is a positive force in the universe...and not at all negative like I had thought. I got out my Bible and did one or two of the candle burning spells and found that the room was immediately energized with white light all around. I felt very peaceful . . . I had wanted to help someone in my family overcome a bad situation in their life (its somewhat of a personal matter so I wont go into it here), and a few days later I received a phone call from the family member and it turned out what I had prayed for using this book came about.I have given this book to others to use and they also report very positive benefits so I would recommend it to anyone who asked.
All I reall have to say is this book is a complete waste of time and money. DONT BOTHER!
Yellow plastic not matched to metal portions perfectly, but okay. It was good for the price. Still don't know what the reference to gerber was.
I made this gum with my 8 and 4 year old daughters. I ended up making 99.9% of the recipe myself. The gum is impossible to stir and never had a smooth consistancy. The food coloring (red and blue) stain everything and is impossible to get off of your hands...you HAVE to use you hands to knead the gum. The worst part is that even after all of that, the gum tasted terrible! I highly doubt that the manufacturer truely tested this process with parents and children. Frustrating and a waste of time.
From the time of order to receipt, the book took longer than any vendor I've ordered from previously. There were no courtesy notification of when the item was sent to gauge the time of delivery. The condition of the book was as promised. Overall, I wouldn't order from the same vendor again.
One of the last great southern rock bands is back, and in a big way! By Your Side is a great cd which conveys the southern rock and roll styles that has been sorely missed for the past few years. This is true rock and roll at it's finest. If you enjoy Aerosmith or the Rolling Stones, I recommend this cd. The first single "Kickin My Heart Around" sums up what the Crowes are about. They might not have the most talent in the world, but they are great at what they do, rock hard! A must hear!
This book taught: That we can master more than one trade, That we should invest in ourselves and be our own bosses, That organization begins at home, and more.
This is a marvelous book and an easy read. Even though Ben Franklin seemed to be just an average guy, as you read about him accomplishing one thing after another, you get a sense of his magnificence as a man.I wish I had read this book when I was a kid, perhaps a little of the diligence that is portrayed on every page would have rubbed off on me.The autobiography is amazing in a low key, Ben Franklin sort of way.
I had heard many different things about Ben Franklin, one of the historical figures in the establishment of the United States. This book confirmed some things I had heard and debunked some others. Good book.
This book was written to instruct and encourage young people (men, in those days--but it can apply to anyone) to live a simple and productive life. Franklin learned early the unpleasantness of being in debt and in trouble with others, and made for himself a rule of life, which he strove daily to adhere to. He quickly learned that advice from others can be mistaken and the necessity of evaluating what others prescribed. He gives a good account of a prudent life, but does not spare himself, clearly declaring when he was at fault or mistaken. I wish I had read this when I was young--I might have been more consistent and productive.
dont believe we received this book ...could you verify where it was sent and whenwas this a kindle fire book
I was hoping to really get in to this but it was to boring for me. So that is why it is one star.
Quite a well thought out book to take around with you.BUT... limited use to me as there are no Southern Hemisphere maps or details (even the Southern Cross is absent).Would not have purchased it had I realised. At least it was cheap!
The magic just isn't here anymore. I think that every cramps fiend's affection comes from the fact that these guys struggled through pretty much every kind of hardship a band can face (except for a lack of purpose, drive, and motivation) throughout the wild and wooly days of the early punk scene. even the punks didn't get these guys. This album is just too artificial sounding to be a real cramp's album. it sounds like a novelty album for kids. I loved "sinners", though. and for that I gave it another star.
You cannot search terms.. every time you try using kindle search it brings up on average over 40 pages.This is not worth almost 10dollars for kindle version. Your better off with print. The kindle is not designed to scroll pages quickly say like when your with friends.
This was one of the worst Sci Fi movies ever! You have to turn the car off or the EM pulse will fry it? Pretty sure it will still fry the electronics when it's off, probably won't kill you though. The big Army truck gets fried as do the guys in it and the good Dr says it fried the the battery and starter. He whips out his cute little red tool box and swaps the battery and alternator from their Jeep Liberty and the big diesel starts! Yeah, right. Apparently the biggest nuclear bombs ever made are pretty light, it only took four guys to load them into the truck, how did they get them into the Russian sub that just happened to be on the west coast? An old Russian Diesel sub can make it to the bottom of the Marianas Trench? 36,000 feet down? Really? And the guy with the pacemaker, why didn't the earlier EM pulses fry his pacemaker? These are just some of the gross abuses of reality, there are many more, don't bother unless you want something to laugh at, in disbelief.
1 star because it is messy but this is AMAZING. I've used the freeze away crap and it doesn't work and is too expensive. This is cheap and will work within two uses. Make sure you wrap the area tight though!
Like many others, I struggled for MONTHS with an inconveniently located wart on my finger. I tried three (3) other kinds of retail removal products, and I was thinking that perhaps I was just out of luck. Then, I read through the reviews for this PediFix Wart STICK and was encouraged enough to try one more time. The product arrived quickly, AND MY WART FRIEND IS ALMOST GONE! Excellent.
After reading all the great reviews I was thinking that this stuff was really strong and going to work. I was expecting to feel a light burning sensation so I could tell that it was working. I tried using this several times and it did nothing. I don't know if I just got a bad one because it looked like it was somewhat melted when I opened it. Too me, I felt like I was putting chapstick on a wart and hoping it would work.
I purchased this product due to all the great reviews. I have used this on my daughters leg for several weeks and still nothing. My daughters leg looks to be rubbed raw but there has been no progress with her warts. I am very disapointed with this medicine!!!
Bought this to remove a wart. Weeks later of apply several times a day...minimal results.I threw it away. What a joke. I did then buy trichloroacetic acid 50% and boom...the wart was gone.More expensive, but cheaper than buying the "freeze away" over and over.
I had a bunch of plantars warts on my heel that had been there for a while and just kept multiplying. I was under the impression that they had to be removed by a doctor, until I saw this product. I immediately ordered it and began using it religiously. A couple weeks passed and I didn't see a change in the warts. The skin around them wasn't looking so good, but the warts were still thriving. I read online that a lot of people have luck with apple cider vinegar, so I tried that. MUCH better results. Forget this product, just go to the store and get some ACV, cotton balls and duct tape.
Purchased this product a few weeks ago for my tween son. He started with one wart on his foot but soon others developed. Previously we were using Dr. Sch**** for several weeks and it just had a minor effect on the warts. So, after some research I decided to give Pedifix a shot. It is working very effectively so far! No pain at all when he applies it. This is my 1st review written on Amazon, but not my 1st reading of reviews. I glean a lot of info from reading and analyzing reviews. I am glad I chose this product.
I think this item worked excellent compared to the other liquid based removers which seem to take forever to work. My foot doctor recommended this to me and it's hard to find in local stores. It is stronger so watch you don't use too much because your skin will get irritated around the wart site. One tip my dr. gave me was to use a Q-Tip to scoop some out and then apply to the wart. That way you don't re-infect yourself! I would definately purchase this again.
I got the wart stick for my grand daughter (11 yrs old) she has a wart on her hand and foot! but i was afraid to give it to her or my daughter because it looks just like chap stick! and my Grand daughter has a lot of little friends.so the stick is at the dump.there for i don't know if it works or not.
This product was delivered promptly and efficiently within three days of ordering it.Don't like the scent anymore however, I don't know if I have changed or if it is an old batch.
I thought it's a score book, just like "The Corrs / The Corrs", but I am totally wrong.
Thefirst volume of Gasarakireally surprised me. It was well written and thoughtful, trying to tell a deep story that was more about behind the scenes power plays than robot brawls.This second disc continues to add new wrinkles and complications. The war with Belgistan comes to a close (which surprised me as I thought it was going to run through the entire series) and the JSSDF forces prepare to pull out. We learn about a secret organization calling itself Symbol that was assisting Belgistan, though their motivations for doing so are still clouded.Yushiro causes some commotion when he heads off base and winds up in the middle of a kidnapping. We also see more of the mysterious girl from the first disc that seems to share Yushiro's powers.Very little seems to happen episode by episode. If the disc is watched straight through it is very satisfying viewing, but I can see that if I were watching this half an hour at a time as it was broadcast it would have been tough to follow.
This film deserves the excellent reputation it has earned. However the version I purchased (International Film Series) has white subtitles against white backgrounds. Only about 60% are fully readable. Other releases may have the same problem. Do not buy this unless you speak French.
I am an avid ps2 gamer. I purchased this from a local store because of its apparent convenience. Was I ever wrong. The device has a battery indicator on it with 4 bars. When the batteries go down to 3 bars, I have a very sporadic connection to my ps2 (my ps2 is only 10ft away). After a while of playing Everquest Online, this became very annoying and inconvenient. After a month, I ditched this and bought a cable extender. Another expensive lesson. :(
We live in AK and so we thought we needed to find something to keep our toddler active while being cooped up during the winter. Our son loves it...WE HATE IT! It takes up almost the whole living room...that's not the bad part! There is only a bottom in the Large section. The two medium section are open on the bottom so there are always balls everywhere! We bought extra balls (which you need) but our house turns into a ball pit! But we make it a game with our toddler to pick up the balls...but WARNING you will be finding balls for days!
Santa bought this for my then 11 month old for his first Christmas. He and his little friends just love playing in the tents and tunnells. (The cats do too.) I don't think you need to wait for age 3 as recommended. I do wish it were a bit sturdier as a couple of the ties have torn already. I highly recommend this product, especially over the winter when it is wet and dreary here--it sits in our living room for oodles of fun.
I bought this for my youngest son's third birthday. It is a great product! Both of my boys, (ages 3 and 6) love to play with it. It is a good outside or inside toy but to use it outside there can not be much wind because it is very light and will blow around easily. To use inside you do need lots of room. It can be put together or taken apart in less than 5 minutes so it is a toy you can buy even if you don't have room to always leave it up. I would recommend this toy to anyone. It would be a great toy for a baby just learning to craw.
I think it is a hit or miss on this product. I have a friend that has a Playhut and it is fine. We just opened ours and at least 6 seams are coming undone (not sewn correctly), there are a couple holes in the material, 2 forgotten attachment loops, and it is rather flimsy. Kids still like it, though it isn't going to last too long.
I don't get what people like about this book. Lindsey is a fluid writer, good describer, but his characters spend way too much time in their own heads and the action, in this book at least, is predictable and rendered downright boring. All the lurid details that are supposed to add to the "psychoerotic" nature of the book come off as crude and off-putting instead, like a geek at a sideshow biting the head off a chicken. And anyone who can't guess the "surprise twist" by page 25 wasn't reading very closely.
Although David Lindsey has a talent for descriptive prose, this book overall was a big disappointment to me. He did not seem to have a clear idea how the plot would unravel, and left too many loose ends. Each time I expected a new wrinkle to develop from a piece of evidence, he didn't bother to tie it in. I think it's possible that he didn't even know how it would end until it did, and at that point he was just tired of writing. If you decide to read this book, be prepared to see very ugly things with no redeeming human value, and be prepared to be left wondering . . . "what ever happened with the ______ ?"
My girls love this. It looks great in their little play kitchen and it is educational as well. I tried to reduce the poor quality plastic kitchen toys and use good quality products instead. The shapes are easy to put together & they look realistic.
Nice book, not quite as good as I expected but had some really awesome photos! AC
pro's :great fun, portable.con's: hard to read LED except in darkness ,no off button.As soon as I got this toy I started playing it.but then ,I found out that in bright light I could not see the LED so I went in some shade.Now thats just fine except theres no shade indoors!so I found a dull light and used it.But then I brushed the yesbutton and no button would turn it off so I had to play it though.But overall if you have a dull reading light and you are patient, buy this product.
Instead of being a better product, this one is made cheaper and seems flimsy and doesn't respond like the "older" versions. Aren't things supposed to get better? This one is made in China--where all the leaded paint and computer things are being messed with/sabatoged?Wish I'd gone into a store and looked at it, held it (this one is lighter & not good quality) and the color is dark (not the bright red or blue I've always used/seen) and hard to read the text, too.Would have sent it back, but for the shipping costs (which ran up the price).
My 7 & 9 year olds love this game - and we have gotten it for all of their friend's birthdays, too. They love trying to come up with items to stump the computer... it keeps them busy and gets them thinking.
My wife and son play the game almost everyday after dinner or at breakfast on weekends. It's fun to think of an object (20Q is not very accurate at guessing abstract things) and answer it's astute questions and it usually gets it right. Sometimes it has to go on to 25 questions though. Kind of spooky that a decent database and algorithm can fit in such a small device. Highly recommended.
This is where it all started for many Kelly fans. It's wonderful stuff--Paul's lyrics on this album are pure working class poetry. The musical style is unashamedly lusty-boy pub-band, unsynthesised (I remember when music was real....) and relentlessly cheerful. Every tune on this album is catchy, and even the dark ones are uplifting. "Dumb Things" was the anthem for pre-gen-X, post-baby-boom lost souls. Kelly has honed his lyrical ability since those early days, but his story telling has always been strong.Under the Sun is unmistakably Australian, more so than on later albums. This is particularly obvious on "Forty Miles to Saturday Night" and "To Her Door". When Kelly writes about things Australian, he gets it right. There is emotional truth in the detail here, and the music is damn good. Kelly deserves his status as an Australian working-class (anti-)hero. CB
The music on this set is fine, as Ms Day always is. However it has a quirk I find distasteful. On the third cd is a hidden track, track 13 to be exact that throws all the songs out of sequence if you rip it. I wouldn't recommend buying this for that reason alone. All the songs are available on other cd's so it's no problem skipping over this one. It seems if they want to mess with people and keep it a secret until after the money is spent then my money will be spent elsewhere.
The book is not bad. The most valuable sections of this book include topics of Structure-Process-Outcome (sometimes), cognitive learning, values, culture, goals, working with tools, and communication. The diagrams and tables in this book are almost not helpful at all; sometimes you wonder if diagrams like figure 1-3 on page 23 is downright necessary to have there. I felt like parts four and five of the book really dragged on unnecessarily, especially the chapter on organizational engineering. It seemed as if the book completely broke down and lost it after page 300. I think that Hoemann had a lot of potential in this book when I first saw it, and I was let down. Another nice thing would be for him to drop the plethora of coined-terms. Overall, there is some really nice thoughts in here, but there is a lot of unnecessary things that you have to thumb through.
This antenna may work for some people, but for me it was another regrettable purchase. The assembly is fairly easy, but the results proved a letdown. I bought the Terk in hopes it would work perfectly with the Samsung DTB-H260F set top box I am using to bring in free OTA digital and HD stations. But I tried two different positions with the Terk and its 10db amp was only able to bring in three or four local DT stations at best. Analog reception proved even worse. When I took off the Terk and replaced it with a coventionally-designed, less expensive indoor antenna with a 45db amp in those same positions, the difference in performance was amazing...I could get between 12 and 15 DT channels. In conclusion, my advice is to avoid the hype about unusual antenna design and go for maximum decibel amplification. It's that extra power that made the difference for me. Sorry Terk...
This is far and away the best book I've found on VB.NET. It is well written, and offers excellent perspective on VB.NET and .NET Framework, with enough detail so that the reader (together with some hands-on experience) will have a good depth of knowledge when he's finished. Highly recommended!
Bought the book over a month ago and totally disagree with a lot of the reviews online; book is almost totally unreadable as it takes even the most simple pieces of code and over complicates them to the point where you just end up closing the cover and say what a waste of money.
I purchased this book for my husband who worked for a couple of weeks in Trinidad. He was not able to buy a cookbook while there.I searched Amazon and bought the one and only Trindad cookbook, and it was a winner! He was very pleased that the recipes were for a lot of the food that he experienced.
This book is an amazing story of a young girl growing up in poverty in New York City. The vividness of the images, the developing of the characters, Betty Smith is a master at her art. Francie and her family come alive in this book. I've read it over and over and I still love it. I would recommend it for anyone from high level 4th grade readers to elderly people. What an amazing story!
A Tree Grows in Brooklyn , is a very touching novel. It takes place in the 1920's and tells what life is like growing up back then , with all of the obstacles that come along the way. Francis is the main character of the book who grows up along with the trees in Brooklyn.She grows up in a poor family and struggles to fit in and find friends however, that does not bring her down. Francis is still a very happy and cheerful person regardless of what other people may try to tell her. She loves to read and since she doesn't have many friends, she feels and makes her books her friends. When Betty Smith wrote this book, she looked back on her life and the experiences she had, and put some of them in her book. It is written not only for teenagers or adults, but anyone who wants to read about the thrill of growing up. If you miss A Tree Grows In Brooklyn you are missing a truly great novel.
Francie is a girl who is dirt poor, and living in Brooklyn during harsh times. Francie is strong through the horrible things that happen to her during the course of her life. I cried, I laughed, and I felt the pain that Francie felt. Francie also deals with the tradgedy of her fathers death. Not to mention almost being raped. This book also deals with a girl becoming a woman. A must read book!!!!!
I give this book three thumbs up! It is poinent, funny, sad, romantic, and scary all at the same time! It is a classic that will keep readers on their toes for a million years!
I have read " A Tree Grows In Brooklyn" over and over again.When things in my own life seem too difficult,I read about the life of Francie Nolan and realize I can overcome any problem with the same determination that Francie and her family had. All the characters were good,from the strong-willed mother,the weak dreamer of a father, to the loving but promiscuous aunt. Francie was my favorite character of all,she was able to overcome the adversity in her life through sheer dtermination and the gift of learning. She learned from everyone around her and the harsh enviroment in which she lived. I would recommend this book anyone who likes coming of age stories.I have read "A Tree GrowsI have read "A Tree GrowsI have read "A Tree Growsin
This book has so many pearls of wisdom. It's very simply written, so do not expect this to be a typical NYT bestseller like the one you read last week. I believe this book was written in the '40s, and although much of the vernacular in the book is obviously of a different period in time, it has a timeless and universal appeal. I haven't even finished it yet, but have already decided, enough with the library version, I want my own copy so that I can use the advice it offers later on in life. Don't miss this one, and make sure you tell your friends about it, so that they can come and thank you later, and you can say "I told you so".
I recently read this book for my English class at school. I have enjoyed every other book we have been required to read; however, I strongly disliked this book. From the first chapter I lost interest in the ornate, seemingly endless details. On several occasions I noted incorrect grammar in the book, and even misspellings! Never before have I seen such a poorly written book. I do not recommend this book. I would not call this book a classic.
movie MANY years ago. Loved it then and loved the story as I read it. Times were tough by our standards but attitudes were good and mostly positive. Good read.
I honestly don't know how this novel has become a classic. As an avid reader I had to practically force myself to get through this book and only did so because my book club was reading it. I wasn't the only person in our club who was disappointed. It was a miserable story and pointless. It was a great discription of life in Brooklyn during that time period but Betty Smith never made me care about the characters enough to care about what happened to them. This novel needs more character development to be a classic. I only give it 2 stars instead of 1 because it really is a great description of life in Brooklyn.
My Mom gave me this book to read when I was very young. Actually I have one of the first publications of it. I have read this book a number of times over the years and never get tired of the characters and the story. Reminds us that recycling actually did begin a long time ago when during the depression kids would take wagons full of things to recycle to get pennies for bread. A beautiful story I will read again and again. So happy to have it on my Kindle now.
Loved the book! Read it in 5 days. The condition was as advertised by the seller. Would recommend it to other people.
All the credit card slots are to small for credit cards. I had to cut each side of the slots to get the cards to fit.
This has been my favorite book now for a couple of months, and I finally had to write a review that disagrees with the previous negative ones. There's no nice way to say this, but maybe there is a new money-old money difference in perception here. What I see in the book is one gorgeous and highly livable room after another. Lively, vibrant, personal and comfortable homes obviously used by real people. What I didn't expect was that I would pick up as many decorating ideas for my own home as I did.
The book does not live up to Traditional Home's reputation of quality work. Frankly, I can find better photos and design insite from magazines than what I found in this book. It's easy to understand why there are so many people wanting to sell the copies they have. It is honestly a disppointment if you are used to truly inspiring design publications. If you decide to buy this book, do yourself a favor and purchase a used copy. Even at Amazon's reduced price it's still over priced for what you get.
Secret of the Wild Child tells the compelling story of Susan Wiley, a young girl who was rescued from a dysfunctional home during the 1970s by a system that ultimately failed her. Nova explores her journey from Hell to Limbo in an unforgettable documentary that shows the darkest sides of humanity and the captivating innocence of a child. You too will be haunted by this beautiful girl whom everybody simply referred to as Genie.I would so love to own a copy of this DVD!
Pianist John Hicks has long been a master of the modern mainstream without necessarily blazing any new paths of his own. On this CD he is featured on a pair of solo numbers, a duet with flutist Elise Wood (a sensitive version of Duke Ellington's "Star Crossed Lovers"), a trio rendition (with bassist Curtis Lundy and drummer Cecil Brooks III.) of "Mood Swings," with a quintet (a blazing version of "My Shining Hour" that has both Bobby Watson and Vincent Herring on altos) and five selections with the full sextet. Four standards follow six obscurities (including Charles Mingus' "Diane"). Hicks, who often shows off the influence of McCoy Tyner's voicings, has never recorded an uninspired record and this one is better than average for him. Due to the variety of moods, instrumental colors and settings, the music is continually interesting and well worth acquiring.
I bought this video for the "Conversation" video where Waylon Jennings and Hank Williams Jr. are playing their guitars, singing, and sharing whisky. I like when they raise their whisky glasses to each other. This is a comical, well put together video with Robert Duvall. I like the 3 videos that tied together like a mini-movie... EVERY WALON JENNINGS FAN SHOULD OWN THIS GREAT VIDEO!...
I looked forward to this celebration CD very eagerly. However, the disappointment was great other than Gretchen Davis. I've been a fan of Kristofferson for 35-40 years and that could be the problem. There are very few people who can sing his songs - Johnny, Waylon, Willie, and Kris. I far preferred and really love the "This Old Road" CD.Donna
I couldnt wait to hear this CD cause i love Kris Kristofferson and his work. many of the names on the CD were great and some great singers came out to do triButes to Kristofferson. Shooter Jenning's "Silver Tongue Devil and I" is amazing. Willie Nelson's "The Legend" is as great or if not better then the Highwaymen version. The version on "Why Me" is also a worthy tribute. The problem i had with the CD was when i heard Russell Crowe's "Darby's Castle" cause it was a horrible redition where Russell Crowe tries and fails at doing the talking blues that was done so well by Kristofferson and Dylan. Then i heard the awful Brian Mcknight atrocity "Me and Bobby Magee" which was just Mcknight turning a country and rock classic into his horrible R&B redition. I had never heard a bad version of "Me and Bobby Magee" until this CD. I don't know how those two got on this CD but fans of Kristofferson should be enraged.
These two albums have been (thankfully) put on one CD. Doris is at her best here, particularly with sassy renditions of "Cheek to Cheek" and "Easy to Love." The title song, with its slow beginning to its jazzy ending, is sung by Doris in an ironic and humorous manner; even the composer admits that her rendition of "Horray for Hollywood" is the best version by any singer. On Volume 2, she sings wistfully of "It Might As Well Be Spring" and "Three Coins in the Fountain" as well sings coyly "Nice Work If You Can Get It" and "I've Got My Love to Keep Me Warm." Also, "Over the Rainbow" and "Blues in the Night" are stand-outs.
I gave this book two stars because of its original approach to an old idea. The zombies in this book (called "bodies." The z word is never used.) were different enough to draw my attention.Unfortunately, that is really all this book had going for it. The author failed to show me any reason to be afraid of these bodies. I was told over and over that the survivors were afraid, but I saw no compelling reason for that.If you do decide to try this book, because of all the (wtf) 4+ reviews everywhere, I recommend you (a) get it from the library and (b) stop at book one.
I bought this dryer on October 15, received it on October 23 and on November 9 the plug started to overheat and burn after 5 minutes of use. The settings at which the plug started to smoke were: medium speed and hot temperature. Also, I did not use it daily... as you can see nothing too harsh or unexpected for a hair dryer. I am returning it to Amazon ASAP and hope I can get my money back. I don't want a replacement... one bad experience is enough for me. Just as a hint if you are thinking of buying a Vidal Sassoon dryer: If their products have so many negative reviews and unsatisfied costumers it is not a coincidence, obviously the Vidal Sasson brand has serious quality management issues. I thought about this, but went an bought this dryer any way. I was a sucker for the price and free shipping I should have just gone with my initial mistrust and bought something else. I hope this does not happen to you.
I bought this from Amazon in July. Unfortunately, I only opened it last week to find out it was a defective on the first disk. It played the first and third episodes perfectly but the second episode had 20 minutes of skipping. Amazon has absolutely no way of reporting this after your window of return has expired. So buyer beware. If you are slow to view your DVD's you can be screwed. I have always had good luck with Amazon until now.The series is excellent and quite intriguing until the end. I enjoyed it despite the skipping in the middle.
Rating this one is difficult. The rich symbolism of Tarot was forever impacted by the Order of the Golden Dawn, and A.E. Waite's "Pictorial Key" is a glimpse into that symbolism. Readers with a serious interest in occult Tarot will find this an essential text. Waite, though, considered himself bound by vows of secrecy, and mixes misinformation and blinds in his work to lead the "uninitiated" astray, so reading critically is a must. To make matters worse, his prose style is ponderous and leaden, deliberately overcomplicated and abstruse, less animated than Al Gore. However, modern tarot decks borrow and adapt from the Waite-Smith deck design; to understand the symbolism that underlies almost every deck on the market today (frequently symbolism the deck designers had no awareness of), this book is absolutely necessary. It won't be a fun read, but it *is* necessary
This is the second time I bought the same book from Stamatis.The first one I gave to one friend. He push me do give it as a gift.This second edition is far better.
every since i have seen on on tv i been scared.it's sounds wierd too.i don't like the music maker.get an idog
I've used the Voice Alert System for about a month now. It works good but does false trigger some. I've tried moving the sensor and adjusting the sensivitity and it has helped. I may just need to tweak it a little more. It has never failed to trigger when someone has entered the area, which is the important part. I don't know that I would hook it to a siren but I'm very happy with the system. Instructions that come with the unit are very good but where a little unclear about how to hook up the external devices to be trigged. I plan to add a light to be activialed in the warehouse for night. I did buy an extra sensor for the driveway and some of the false alerts there are casued by birds flying in front of the sensor. It's a good 120' away and the base unit is inside a brick building in an interior room (2 walls). It picks up all traffic in the drive. Good system for the money.
I am sorry that I ever bought this thing, it is the most annoying "toy" I have ever bought. No matter where I put it or how I adjust it, it goes off all night long. This would be a great gadget in theory if we lived in an animal free (No squirrels) and bug free (no flying beetles, moths & etc.) world but seeing how that is not the case, it's really not good for anyone. Even the shadows of people and cars set this thing off. I thank god that I didn't buy two alert systems as I originally planned.
Although it took a long time to receive this puzzle, it was worth the wait. My kids love trying to figure out how to maneuver the vehicles to get them to a building. I would recommend this for children over 2. It takes a lot of fine motor coordination to move the vehicles.
Have read all the books published to date. Loved the plots and story lines. Finally through them all out (Yep, tossed one paperback and two hardcopy) as I realized as I was re-reading them, that the somewhat graphic sex (Dominance and Submission, and Harem Girls, etc) didn't really add to the story but sure promoted things I just don't like. The March Upcountry series with David Weber had boys and girls, and talked about sex, but was what I consider more normal for SciFi, and was not graphic, did not promote "alternative" sex. So while I enjoy the James Bond nature of the novels, I really can't recommend them to any of my friends, and wouldn't recommend them to anyone younger.
This book has found a permanent spot in my home, namely, on my desk, where I do all my hobbies. It has loads of great ideas that I've already used. Can't wait for the author's next book --apparantly its a sourcebook on animal designs.
This item did not work and it just irritates your skin. You think it works because you see your skin being irritated and think that it's the product doing its job but it doesn't work. Not only was this way more expensive than the other corn sticks but it also was a waste of my money.
If you already own "Music has the right to children" and you are itching for more BoC like I was then just take a deep breath and be content with "Music.." becasue this cd is a money making scheme just about. All the songs on it are the same ones, there is no re-mixing at all. But, there is one exception at the end they play a 2 minute bit that gets you excited but then ends. This is hardly worth 12.99 so looks like you and me are gonna have to wait until BoC makes a new album. Awwwwwwwww hurry up guys!
How many graphically described violently mutilated corpses do they think it takes to sell a book? Having rather enjoyed Deja Dead (the genre of lady pathologists seems to be the flavour of the month), I just couldn't finish Death du Jour. I found it a rehash of the other with more blood and gore added and even some sex - wowee! It made me long for a good old romantic historical novel - where have they gone?
Forensic pathologist Temp Brennan spends part of each year in North Carolina and part of it in Quebec -- investigating death. Usually her investigations find her examining bodies and bones of historical deaths or of recent deaths where normal means of pathological investigation aren't effective. Author Kathy Reichs clearly knows her pathology. Herself a practitioner, she makes her field exciting for the reader to learn about. In addition her character Temp Brennan finds herself in the midst of people who's deaths have been quite mysterious. Death Du Jour travels from uncovering the hundred year old remains of a nun who is believed to be a Saint to the sleaziness of a cult who might just be killing people as part of their worship. Temp Brennan isn't just a laboratory investigator. She is indeed one solid pathologist who is not particularly willing to let a case close without getting to the bottom of it. A fascinating world and a well told mystery.
Gore yes, lots of information about autopsies and assorted other matters, rather too-clearly-fictitious characters ... It all adds up to a rather flat, dispiriting formula effort. If you just HAVE to know who's responsible every time you read of a fictitious killing, then you'll get through this, otherwise it becomes rather a drag.
This book was boring and poorly written. The plot was weak and obvious, but worse than that, the writing was simplistic and choppy- very hard to read. I always finish books that I start and this one I almost put down. I only finished it, by skimming because the reading was so choppy, because I had already bought it and couldn't return it. No character development, no characterization of the characters at all, and the dialogue is flat and boring and only serves to advance plot. Descriptions don't describe-they tell in short sentances, or they lecture. I'm a scientist and I found this book boring and annoying!This is my second Reichs novel. The other was better, but I won't be coming back. Save your money and your time!
Readable and missing no pages? Wow! I was in the book business a long time and this paperback I received was not in "good condition:" it was dog-eared, had water damage and cover damage. Good thing it was only a paperback and quite cheap. Paperbacks were essentially intended to be like the newspaper, read and discarded. This one, perhaps not discard in this day and age, but definitely not resold. Like I said, good thing a paperback and my "Author Du Jour," because otherwise I would have been p*****. However, it did arrive in record time: 2 days, I think.
I really liked this book and I love the main character of Tempe Brennan. The characters are well drawn and multi-dimensional and I loved all of the tidbits about forensics and anthropology. The locations were rich in detail and I felt like I was there. My only complaint about this book was that I had every single plot point figured out a good 30-50 pages before Tempe did. There wasn't a single thing in this book that surprised me. But it was still an enjoyable read and even if I knew that going in, I would still read it.
I've been after the vinyl for these two albums for 10+ years....it is considered the holy grail of west coast (USA) psychedelia. I gave up and bought the CDs through Amazon. Better than I thought. An absolute classic and equal to the reputation. Years ahead of its time but yet perfect for the summer of love generation. Everyone I have played it to are equally high in praise.
My boys, ages 5 and 7, can't get their fill of this colorful, wacky book. The love indulging their imaginations with it each night before bed and "sweet thirds and fourths" of it in a single sitting would not be enough if they had their way!
I 've always liked this release for the following tracks: Ghosts of Cape Horn and Make Way for The Lady. The others are fine too with the sole clunker being the wretched The Auctioneer which is so out of place here. If I want to hear that nonsense, I'll go to a cattle auction. Originally a digital recording, it suffered from tape hiss which is odd for digital(the early days of)recording. The hiss is gone but the recording still doesn't sound right to my ears particularly the vocals. Suprisingly, this is a very short disc clocking in at a paltry 33.50. Another entire release could have easiliy fit on the remainder of the disc. I hate when labels cheat the consumer in that fashion. So be it, still worthwhile for some very good tracks. 10 tracks/full lyrics/33.50.
Gordon didn't have a 'good experience' while recording this one...yet, it's classic Lightfoot...Dream Street should have been one of his biggest sellers.
Although it has been some time since I read this story, its vivid descriptions have stayed with me. The author does a marvelous job of describing the Southern California beach city setting, so much so that while driving on Sepulvida two months ago, I saw a drab three-story stucco commercial building and simply knew that it must be the building that houses the call-center. Also typically Southern Californian, the car chase contained endless minutes at a jam-packed intersection with the driver cursing himself for chosing the wrong route.Overall, Hotline is an entertaining story that keeps the pages turning.
I have never entered a review before, but this book was so bad I had to stop you from wasting your time. I tried to enter a 0 rating but I guess 1star is as low as you can go. The reviews were mixed, but I bought this book anyway because I run a call center and I thought perhaps that would make it more interesting for me. Total waste of time, can't believe that the type A in me wouldn't just let me quit half way through. I kept thinking the "real" storyline was yet to be introduced, or maybe some interesting plot twist was coming. Boring characters, unrealistic scenarios. I will never read another book by this author.
This book is ultra-rare, so if you can get a copy, keep it. I stole mine from the public library. The book visits some of the old Spacer worlds from the Robot novels, and it is interesting to see how time has treated them. This book also provides incite into the WHOLE Foundation series! THIS IS A MUST!!!!!
This book has too much of everything... except action.There isn't much of a story and it's way too long.There's a lot of endless talk about the same subjectsand lots more sex than any other Asimov book. Theother Foundation books were fine for all ages. This onehas way too much adult content. I think that 300 pagescould easily have been cut out. In fact, to get to thereal story, just skip to the last 40 pages. Boring.Long. It dishonors the enitre series.
Anyone who hasn't read about Hari Seldon and Psychohistory needs to. Though it's a fictional science in the book, I wouldn't be suprised if someone wasn't studying it today. Asimov's writing is compelling ... not too full of sci-fi babble which often sounds odd to readers 40 years later, and that makes it pretty timeless. Many older books constantly irritate me in this manner.
...of those bands whose latest work disappoints me. If like me, you were expecting more 'sorry about tomorrow' then steer clear. This just wasn't *ahem* 'rocking' enough for my tastes - and felt like a real step backwards (contrary to the other reviews) I don't think they will return to their higher energy material, which for me is a shame, as I was a fan.
If you like comic book deities even a slight bit, or even modern or ancient human deities, then this book is for you. Struggles are all of cosmic proportion. I love the reference to all Earth's ancient religion gods as gods who are but a drop in the bucket compared to some of the forces at work here. Even though its a comic book, it tells it like it is. Us, as human beings, can lay no claim to even comprehend the magnitude and sheer myriad of benevolent and malevolent forces that constantly struggle on planes of existence much higher than ours or any of our perceived gods. Religious zealots would do good to read this book and give them a better understanding of how small their religious texts are in the grand scheme of things.
I have always been intriqued with guys like Thanos, Apocalypse, Galactus and so on. These is a great story about the mad power hungry thanos and the super heroes who have to stop him. I learn alot of things I did not know of Thanos. I have yet to finish reading the book, I am halfway there but I have to say I have loved it. I am not that big of a comics collector but I decided to buy this and I must say its a great read.
I had already read this story before I got the compilation version. Thanos is by far one of the best villians I have ever read about. He appears to be a villian but from his point of view, he doesnt really see a good or bad in anything. The action is great and does make sense in the marvel universe. This story is meant for animation and would easily be on a higher level then the previous cartoon movies that have been released. The story of thanos getting the infinity gems is just as much fun as seeing him use them to mess with everyone including the cosmic beings.
An Awesome book because it is full of many heroes and many villians in the marvel universe.
The authors have taken the opportunity to publish a book of which they wrote only a small portion. The plot progresses through the snippets of first-time writers. This book is not a part of the series but an attempt to milk the series for all it's worth. (See also Grantville Gazette I,II, III).Instead of a cogent style, the book is pieced together from snippets available elsewhere. As a result the book fails to tell a cogent story, forcing the reader to parse disparate language and editorial differences from section to section.
By far this is the worst book in the series. Maybe five pages worth of rebellion or plot development, 200 pages of dry political education, and 100 pages on ballet recitals. Dry and pointless reading.
I discovered Eric Flint's work when a friend loaned me 1632. I had not read much speculative fiction other than some Harry Turtledove and I have to say I loved it. Then I went out and bought 1633, it was another gem. Things skipped a bit with The Galileo Affair, just a little too much sermonizing. But this latest, The Ram Rebellion, just stinks. Most of the stories were written by obvious amateurs fascinated with sheep, cooking, agriculture and whatnot. Now those are all fine things, but I bought the other books to be entertained with action+fantasy+history, in that order, not history+agribusiness+feminism. I am going to read one more book in this series and if it does not improve I will swear it off for good.
I was very disappointed with this ring. I plan on returning it. Looks nothing like the picture. I would have been better off buying something similar at the teen jewelry store at the local mall. Totally over priced not worth it at all.
This ring looks nothing like the picture. the diamonds are small and not very noticeable; I will be sending this back
I was looking for a small silver ring and this one was perfect. It exceeded my expections because the ring was not expensive at all. It is true to size and if you want a ring that sparkles quite a bit this one is it.Mrs. Mayville
I wanted a pretty band with sparkle cause I hate to have a raised up stone with little ones for the scratching. But this ring is perfect. Smooth and shiny.
After having a lot of trouble finding a wedding band for my small ring finger, I decided on this one. This is the 4th ring I've tried. It fits nicely and looks fine with my small diamond solitaire. Has a good amount of sparkle but definitely doesn't look expensive. Don't let anyone look too closely!
This product was handled and packaged fast, easy to open. Was very happy to fined this old movie to enjoy over and over again.
This stuff is a ripoff. I found some at a local store and bought it just to see if it amounted to anything. It does not. Go to the store and buy a 24oz bottle of cheap body wash and a 2oz vial of tea tree oil. Empty 2oz from body wash and then pour tea tree oil in. Shake well. Same thing only MUCH stronger and a fraction of the cost.
Be prudent. It is a dangerous concoction. The fumes can give a soar throat, swollen glands, and you might not get the smell out of your nose for a few days. It needs warning labels, and testing.
I developed white spots on my legs after using a tanning bed. This product had GREAT reviews eliminating the appearance of these white spots. Unfortunately it did nothing for me.
i just picked up the dvd of the first 5 episodes and must say that the vhs version {by jupiter} was much smoother and cleaner than this {dvd} version. however this is better than nothing as stated by others and my wife who has been a fan for nigh on 25 years now. so if you must have your starblazers as my wife does then definitely pick this up.AND SEND IN YOUR CARDS.
I find it very hard to understand how anyone could listen to this music, as a vivd music listener and an open minded one at that, this music was the most horrid bit of sound I have ever heard. People need to stop and remember what real talent is, not this uncoordinated, bad singing group. Their music is as is they are making up the guitar riffs as they go, and I don't find it difficult to scream. So Glassjaw if your ever in need of a new screamer, I'm your man.
I've seen this band 2 times and believe me both times I wish they wernt on the bill. They are by far the worst band ever and if you like them you should be kicked in the head until theres nothing left of you. Seeing them live is like being kicked in the head anyway.
at first listen, i was only impressed by cosmopolitan blood loss. but after listening to the whole cd a few times in my friends car i realized that this album had a lot more depth than i gave it credit for. in my opinion some of the stand out songs on this record are ape dos mil and cosmo blood loss. but each song has something to offer. you're not just going to get an annoying flow of screams throughout each song. there's a nice variance between the deep screaming and the switch to passionate singing which makes each song stand out. i would definately grab this album if you're fans of finch and the used. its worth your time.
I seldom *ever* find a book in my school library that is worth reading. This book was impossible to put down and kept me going back for more. I'm hoping the door is open for a sequel, which I'd buy right away.
The Transall SagaBy George MickcloudMark is a normal teenager who lives to be out in the wilderness. Mark goes on a solo camping trip through the desert when finds a strange blue light that when he touched it. It transported him to another planet and time. Now he must us every nature skill he ever learned to survive. Two years past and is now a strong dark colored man. One day he fined s a village under attack by an evil ruler he joins the fight and saves the king of the village and is made second in command for his bravery he is now part of this village and is starting to think that he wants to give up looking for the blue light a stay with his new family. But some people don't like Mark and want him to leave. Mark now has a price on his head for his death. Mark and his new family will fight for his freedom or die trying. Will Mark survive the war to go on to find the light or die defending his new life and family?
This is a great book about a thirteen-year-old boy named Mark. Mark is hiking across the desert where he stumbles upon a mysterious light. As Mark touches it he ends up in a whole new world. Grass and plants are red and animals are different. Also there are new types of humans. Now Mark must use everything he knows to survive and to find the mysterious light to get back home.This book has a lot of action in it and it keeps you wandering the whole time. That is one of the reasons I like this book. The only thing I didn't like is the book just kind of stops at the end. It is a great book though. I can compare this book to a lot of books Will Hobbs writes because they both have a lot of action. I could also compare this book to any survival books because Mark has to survive. I would recommend this book to anyone who likes Will Hobbs or loves action and adventure!
I was assigned to review this book in class for my literature final. I am not a big reader so I was upset about haveing to read. The day after I got the book I got sick and had to stay home from school. To pass the time I sat out in the sun and read the whole book in two hours. This book was exciting and although it was slow at first, when the story got going, I couldn't stop reading. The key character is Mark a young boy who is into hiking. His parents let him go on a hike in a desert and he promises to meet them at the other end of the desert. While Mark is setting up camp one night he sees a wierd blue light. He climes closer to it and falls into it. When Mark wakes up he is in a red jungle. He goes through a sieries of troubles such as quick sand and finding food before he finds other humans. Mark finds some great compainions and a great adventure!
This is a blanket review of all 17 books in this series, the first being The Neon Rain. JLB is the definitive of Mystery/Crime writers when he developed the character Dave Robichaeux, a Cajun Homicide detective who started his career in New Orleans and eventually semi retired in New Iberia, LA. The stories are strong, sensitive, moral and above that hypnotic in a sense where you are in the story literally (if your hooked on it). Highly recommended along with his other series of books.
I expected this to be a large book like the other Good Old Days books that I bought. It is only 16 pages. I do not blame the seller. I was stupid for not checking it out before I bought it.
1977 - Polydor RecordsSongs Include :Life In LondonGettin' BettaRunnin' From The FutureIt Ain't What It SeemsOff Beat RideLovin' YouDedicationSpeakeasy
These are the romantic songs I grew up with and that is why I bought this CD. If you need a "shot" in the romance department, one or more of these songs should do it.
The title says it all! This is hands down the best face wash I've ever encountered. Light, mildly fragrant, and deep cleansing. It leaves your skin feeling smooth and moisturized.
A classic mystery with plot twists throughout to keep you guessing. Watch for a spell-binding cameo by Stephen Herbster, virtually buried in the credits but more than worthy of praise.
Although Desjardins' book contains a number of interesting revelations, his arguments are often compromised by sloppy research. For example, his key claim that "Little Round Top" was not known by that name until "years" after the battle was proven false nearly a decade ago. Desjardin is especially weak when he tries to play photo-detective. He mentions with praise the research of photo historian William Frassanito, but doesn't seem to have actually read Frassanito's books very carefully. Desjardin's arguments also suffer from the obvious omission of pertinent, but contrary information
It's one of the best books I've ever read. Was forced to read it for school so my expektations were the lowest ever... She's a very strong women and I like the way she gets what she wants. She's not afraid to make a sacrifice or two to have things her way, though I don't like the way she abandonnes her children all the time...
Okay, the title says it all - these diapers just don't leak for larger babies. I love them and use them exclusively for our child at night (he's trained during the day) and have no problems whatsoever. They're a snap to put on and just are wonderful to use. I can't recommend these enough - I've tried so many brands and these definitely work the best. I have broken too many fingernails changing crib sheets from the results of cheap leaky diapers and so therefore, I highly recommend these diapers, and so do my nails!
This is an okay book in terms of the man's life (most info is culled from other sources) but when it comes to Denzel Washington's career the author commits an unpardonable sin. He writes way too much about each individual film the actor's made up to the time of the book's publication and then gives away the ending to each and every one of them!UNACCEPTABLE!!!!
If I were stranded on a deserted island and could have one book with me, I would choose this one. It angers me, saddens me, offends me, and elates me. But most of all it inspires me. Each time I read it I uncover something precious and unique. It never grows old. If you truly love all that is convenient and commercialized, if you revel in the gifts technology brings you, don't read it. It's too good for you. If you truly love and are capable of appreciating the serene beauty of the wilderness buy it, read it, then cry. For it's all gone. When you read, read beneath the text. Read deeply into the subtext of this book. It's all about surfaces. Abbey proves that we cannot truly see, experience or appreciate anything unless we can look below the surface as he did.
Mr. Abbey has filled this book with many thoughtful observations of the desert, and life in general. This book should be mandatory reading for any present day backpacker or outdoorsman.
I can't rave about this book enough, It was required reading for a literature of the outdoors class I took in college a decade ago and I've probably read it 20+ times since then. My copy is tattered, highlighted and written all over. Growing up in rural Utah I feel Abbey's pain towards the paving and developing of these beautiful areas. I crave the solitude that he writes about, understand the attachment towards random small creatures and can't help but laugh and nod my head in agreement at his rants. Anyone who spends time in pristine wilderness, redrock desert or not, will appreciate this read.
For what it is (an inexpensive tp holder), it performs great. Have had other brands, and it is built as good as any.
At least with the old type you could hook a water hose to the outlet side and attach a sprinkler to it and not have to drag a hose up and down your garden roes knocking plants
I am an old lady who doesn't throw anything away, thinking I might need it some day. Over the years, I've purchased three of Stern's sprayers, with high hopes that the newest one will finally work. Forget it. I'm finally dumping my hope and throwing them out. It's hard to believe that a functional one hasn't been designed.
Maybe this book is out of copyright or something... but this printing is a grossly lazy reproduction of the original printing. It's actually a copy of the pages - not even fit right to the book's size. They didn't bother to transcribe and properly typeset the text using a modern system, so you're basically paying for a very rough, poorly scaled photocopy of the old printing. No wonder it's not available on Kindle.
I have read every Elric novel. I own 500 kilos of fantasy paperbacks. This book brought me as much joy, inspiration and satisfaction as any book I have ever read. Elric was the first "evil" hero. Every fantasy writer has taken a peice of elric to produce their characters. Drizt Do'urden is a shadow of Elric. Raistlen is almost an exact copy of Elric. Darth vader's sinister life, dependence on technology/sorcery and eventual noble self sacrifice are in mimicry of Elric. In this book so many authors who wanted to write Elric stories, some who had made great fame and fortune copying Moorcock, were given licence to write as they pleased. Every short story in the book is its authors best work because as they write about their own dark heros in their own novels they are thinking about Elric. My highest praise: I want a sequel.. or two... or ten... a series published monthly untill I am old and grey.
Beautiful pictures... excellent photographs If you want ton see Texas this book is it......
I am sorry but this album was not what I was hoping it would be. I purchased it as a child and own it now as an adult. However, the only reason I do own it was because they attached their videos on DVD. We like it (Wild & Loose) and Juicy Gothca Krazy are great songs but only in there video forms. If you are looking for those sames songs as released on video on CD you aren't going to find it. Sad to say but I feel the only reason this album really sold was because many saw the videos first and then purchased the album hoping to hear the same thing.
We have trouble with the electric anchor, The cord tends to backlash and ties itself all around the wheel. so far it has been a battle. Nothing like we expected. If I could I would return it. Great idea not such a great thing.
The pedals fell off, the seats broke off. The bikes looked great and we we're psyched about them, easy to put together, nice fat tires for our play yard, but in a matter of weeks they were unuseable and off to the bike repair shop. Not a good deal at all!
The problem with this book, is that you cannot argue for copyrights on one hand, and against them on the other. Either there is intellectual property or there is not. If there is not, then it is a government granted monopoly, and government granted monopolies can be shown to be less efficient then the market. As such, this means that copyrights would not do a better job at encouraging ingenuity. The thing is the book seems to talk about the philosophy of it a lot more then the reality of it.
This is with out a doubt the most beatifuly written & illustrated book on Unicorns ever published. Every page is a visual & mystical treasure.I reccomend it to any & all seekers of light on the subject of Unicorns.
I had bought all the DVDs up to season 4 and was dissapointed that they stopped issuing the seasons. All in al, the features are the same as the other seasons and the dvd's are a must have for any fresh prince fan!
I absolutely love the Fresh Prince, and buying this season was a great investment! I personally think Season 4 is the best, but this one is a close second. Also, Season 3 has bloopers at the end of every episode that I love, but I don't believe any of the others do...which is a little disappointing. Regardless, I will be buying Season 6 soon!
If I had opened the box before I gave the Club Champ Putt 'n Return Putting Mat as a gift, I would have returned it. Disappointed in the quality and durabiity. Would not recommend.
Clear, simple, easy-to-read style. Many of the steps are obvious in retrospect. The book merely raises your awareness of the steps so you're more likely to use them
Although the subject matter was interesting, the lack of pictures and overall layout of the book made it tedious to read. I saw so many opportunities for this book to be better. For example, there were many instances where an accompanying picture would have clarified a description or put it into a better context. A specific example of this is where she mentions a nail belt. It would have been illuminating to see a picture of one on that page. The writing style to me seemed dry, almost "textbook".
This is a fascinating subject, but Kuhns makes too many mistakes in areas I'm familiar with for me to trust there are none in areas I'm not. Her discussion of pagan culture is muddled; she collapses together customs of different centuries as if all pagans of all places and times were interchangeable. The book also shows signs of having been spell-checked by computer.
Bought this to replace a very expensive crystal set I'd given away and like it a lot for the money. It's pretty and functional. Comes nicely packaged too. Would not hesitate to give as a gift.
I've been studying Arabic from a variety of sources, and this book has clarified much of the grammar I was confused about. I wouldn't recommend it for beginners, but for those who need to clarify Arabic's overwhelming grammar rules and review and organize what you may have learned in your courses, it's tremendously helpful. Its layout is simple and straightforward, and the exercises are helpful too.
How did this piece of junk ever get made? Granted, I'm not a teenager, but I hope that even teenagers have brains enough to recognize a dog when they see one! The only reason I viewed this film is because of the previews, they were pretty comical. But three or four scenes don't make a movie. What's wrong with screen writers these days? Whoever wrote this must have been related to some one in upper management, otherwise it would have never been produced. The writer should have smoked the script, it would have saved us all some money.
This movie starts out funny but towards the movie the storyline gets pretty old. Its definitaly not a classic or a good movie. And its super boring and not funny. My favorite part was when it was over.
what a hot film. so intelligent, so provocative. buy it. now.
Fox has provided Dude, Where's My Car? with a great DVD package that consists of excellent picture and sound quality, along with a handful of cool extras that are sure to please fans. For those who have never seen the film, I recommend a rental if you're a fan of "stupid" comedies, as it is a fairly funny and entertaining flick. 2 stars.
This movie was just dumb, but some parts were funny that why it got 2 stars. It seems like the move was trying too hard to be the next Bill & Ted...but you know that's not gonna happen.
I was very dissapointed by this movie. It did not do well at the box office, and everyone else I know who saw it, did not like this movie. The story and all the characters are quite stupid.Everyone has a different sense of humor so I won't tell you what is and isn't funny, but due to popular opinion you may want to borrow or rent this movie if you intend to buy it.I am not in the bussiness of giving poor ratings, but I hope I can save you a few bucks.
I borrowed this movie from my brother (thank goodness I didn't pay anything, even to rent it) and found it to be quite stupid. I love movies like Ace Ventura, Dumb & Dumber and Bill & Ted, and this is no where close to any of these. Contrary to other reviews, the only funny parts I found were the tatto scene (saw it 100 times in the commercials, but still laughed at it, when he draws it out--"Suuuuuweeeet! What does mine say?") and the bubble wrap parts. The Chinese restaurant scene was so not funny it actually made me mad.It gets two stars from me because I saw it for free after a long day with a sick child where I jsut wanted to get away from reality for a hour or two--it did accomplish that, but only minimally.
This movie is SOOO funny!!! It's about these 2 party dudes trying to find their car in order to get their girlfriend's anniversery gifts in order to recieve 'special treats.' But along the way things don't go as planed. It's a comedy starring Ashton Kutcher and Sean Scott. YOU HAVE TO SEE IT!!!
I was REEEEALLY excited when I received my copy of this album. I took it to my car and started listening with the system blasting. I found myself pressing "next track" more than loving the music.It's definitely unique. Some of the songs are REEEALLY good, but the rest make up for it. Ugglor|Mossen might be one of the best songs I've ever heard. The rest of the cd can't compete though. The reason this album earned 2 stars is because this song is on it.I've reviewed a number of cds and box sets... if it's great GOA you're looking for you get you movin and groovin, go other places. It may be a great album for some of you looking for a unique sound that unmatchable (like I thought it would be), but I can't say I'm satisfied.
This was not what I was expecting. It wasn't as funny as any of the westerns. Nobody is my name for example. Very disappointed, not with deliver or anything just the content of the video itself.
"Infamous Scribblers" was a fantastic read. Newspapers haven't changed much since colonial times. the best part of the book was the historical facts brought up, and the infighting of politicians and printers, among themselves and with each other. It brought out things about our founding fathers that aren't in your regular history books. There is a very great likeness of events and people then and now, The one big difference today is newspapers don't attack like they did then. They didn't hold back much at all and would keep it up and not backdown. Give it a try I think you will enjoy it....Ken
Roadsters is one of those games that plays like an arcade racer but has real licensed cars. Both the graphics and the play control are very good and the cars are definetly cool. My only complaint was that there wasnt enough tracks. There are only 6 of them and after a while you just want more.
This book was a great follow up to David Moody's first book in his Autumn series. The virus that has taken over the world has hit The City - plenty of new characters and twists and turns. Even though most zombie books are predictable, David Moody gives an exciting and new experience for zombie lovers. You almost feel like you are there... This book is hard to put down - when you get to the last 20 pages, you just want it to go on, and on, and on... Shame that David's Autumn series is not able to be purchased at book stores in Australia though, which means you have to pay a LOT OF MONEY for one book - BUT the books are Totally Worth It!!!! I LOVE the Autumn series, and cannot wait to purchase the next books in his Autumn series!
I bought this book thinking it was an adition to the autumn book line, it says first printing. I guess i need to pay closer attention because it is a reprint of the first book by a new publisher. Ripped off. I will not buy anything by this publisher again.
I can't believe people really enjoyed this book. It was tedious and dull. Nothing new happened once the stage was set. Of all the "zombie" reanimated-body books and movies, this has to take the cake as the worst, bar none. No character development at all. Nothing to make you care about any of the characters. No explanation or even conjecture about what the f_ _ _ has taken place. Just rotting flesh and shuffling bodies.
We had a Moen kitchen faucet with a "lifetime warranty." It is junk. It started dripping after 5 years, and the exterior actually started rusting.When I tried to replace the cartridge, the screw was so cheap the head partly disintigrated and required an extractor. I could go on...Don't be fooled into thinking you are getting quality when they advertise "lifetime warranty."In fairness, they sent a new cartridge, but what I want is quality in the first place.It will last a lifetime --as long as you don't live more than five years!
Moby is more than a genius of techno, he is a genius of music. What he does in this album is so joyful and depressing simultaneously, I just want to listen to it over and over again. The best tracks are Porcelain, Why does my heart feel so bad?, Southside, Natural Blues, and Run On. And the rest are still amazing songs.
This is truly a electronic masterpiece and will never been forgotten. I have been a big fan of Moby for quite some time now, but I have found myself skipping a song here or their on some of his other albums. This CD is one of those CD's you want to leave on repeat all day, and listen to it through and through. On this album Moby remixes a lot of old blues songs, and briliantly brings them to life. He takes electronic music to a whole new level with this album. If you don't own any Moby, start here. And if you love the smash hit "Porcelain" or "Everloving" you'll want to check out his album "I Like to Score" as another great Moby CD to own. If you haven't started listening to Electronic music at all START HERE!
Moby's latest album touches on many genres of music, and it sounds fantasctic. Instantly recognisable tunes hit you, and no wonder companies are queueing up to have his music play on their adverts. One of the best things about play is the number of songs on the album, a massive 18! It is guarenteed that everyone will like most of the tunes, because of the contrast in styles. If you buy one album this year, MAKE IT THIS ONE
Very good CD, it makes me think about everything and its good when your working or when your sleeping. It have one or two "bad" songs but the rest are top quality. "My Weekness" always makes me think and put me in good mud. And if you enjoy the essays of Moby, then you'll love it! I advice you to buy it...
The first song I ever heard of Moby was his techno remix of James Bond. Since then I've been hooked on his music, and he certainly doesn't disapoint on this great album. One thing that Moby has, is a unique sound. He will never sound old, or his style of music will never be used by others, because no one could copy Moby. It isn't Rock, nor techno. it's something in between On this album, all the songs are strong, but in particular I think the song "why does my heart feel so bad" is the best. It pours out the most emotion without a doubt. It was used in the trailers of Black Hawk Down, and was used perfectly. Overall, if you are a fan of Moby, Buy this album!!
Why is this album held in such high regard? It sounds like some middle class white kid messing with his parents gospel records. The gritty heart-felt gospel recordings juxtaposed with the cold, synthetic, superficial beats, create an unsettling tension that sounds unintended. He should be made to leave his room and go out and get some exercise.
You can dance, groove, bob your head and be touched emotionally all in one sitting. This CD simply rocks!
Your ears will thank you for buying this album. You can really chill out to it with all the musical styles covered - pop, techno, rock but where it really shines is the bluesy gospel/electronic fusion with the awesome tracks Natural Blues & Run On, yes I love the blues but you don't have to be biased towards any particular type of music to enjoy this album as it cleverly mixes most genres. Easily 5 stars as I can't think of any weak points on this.
People are saying that moby is like a god, that he is one of the world best producer, people say that his this record, Play, is the album of the year, ??. I have heard this is the best techno album ever. I cannot understand this things. Please forgive me, but in my view, Play is simply a bad album. The only thing moby has made, is sample some old soul vinyls, and put music behind. And believe me, that the only good things of this album are these voices, which are the only things moby has not made. The drums are simply bad produced, the music is simply, and his voice is, oh my god!, why anybody has say to moby that he cannot sign?. You could say me you like some of the album songs, but please, DON'T SAY ME THAT MOBY IS A GOOD PRODUCER AND DON'T SAY THAT PLAY IS ONE OF THE BEST 90's ALBUM!!!
I purchased this CD because everyone is raving about it. I mean I ever heard about it on a night time sitcom...but whatever the case, I found this CD a utter disappointment. granted there are a couple tracks that I thought were okay, but the rest of the CD was a waste. I mean what is going on with the chanting. The bottom line here is people loved this CD becasue it was new, not that it was great.
I am not even done listening to every track yet, yet I know this is the one. Moby pretty much pulls off the album of the year. Artists of the likes of Madonna and Beck will be calling this guy for some of his expertise. He has broken ground by creating a beautiful unexpected hybrid: Gospel/Blues and Electronic music. Forget Fatboy Slim, or Slim Shady or Will Smith, get with Moby, and get with him now. "Play" not only rocks your mind, but touches your soul....All without putting you to sleep, being illegal, or selling you out.(Headphones recommended)
This was my first Moby CD and I brought it for my fiance's birthday. We both love it! We have brought the CD Wait for me and Last Night since then. Moby knocks the socks off of Lady G
Why isn't this guy on the Wyndham Hill label? Lightweight music and, in the liner notes, lightweight musings. Not necessarily bad, but I don't own an elevator.
This is a very good cd you should buy it! My favourite songs are Why does my heart feel so bad,Porcelain,guitar flute and stings and 7 although almost all songs on the album are good!
I like the CD. I found a real interesting way to be a part of Moby's music by mixing your own version of body rock at beatnik.com.
A really good CD....I wouldn't classify it techno, but great pop...It has it all dance rock, slow, medium....my favorite cut is "Bodyrock"...gets my butt of the couch and rock...I was surprised to see it as the theme song now to "Veronica's Closet" on NBC...you should catch the intro on the show, it is pretty rockin!....Any way back to the album, other great songs are the ambient "My Weakness" and the soul full "Run On". Catch this CD soon, it will fit all tastes.
I'm sure if I had received it instead of the cloth map that was sent, I would have loved it. I returned the map and asked that the light be sent as originally ordered. This never happened and I ended up asking for a refund.
I read this book over 13 years ago, and I tell you, it still remains one of my faves. Even though I was barely 13 when I read it, the book gave me hope and made me believe that anyone could become something, no matter their background and especially like Emma's.
Sadly this product performs admirably with supplying power but where it fails is its stealth. Check out OCZs forums for many complaints about it being quite loud. Apparently they've kind of messed with all their customers and created an extremely loud product that is difficult to return to most e-tailers.FYI some retailers have newer revisions of these units that are much quieter but the UPCs are exactly the same so good luck finding one. Buy it amazon or B&M; or better yet, just stay away.
This phone was fantastic for about 8 months. I could go about 100 yards from my house while talking without any interference. However in the last month the handset started "Channel Searching" no matter how close I was to the base and how good the signal. Two days ago the handset went into channel search mode and literally has not stopped searching since. I have done everything I can think of including change the battery and it continues to search and while it searches the answering machine doesn't seem to work. Oh well, no more Sony for me.
We've had this telephone for about one year, and we love the features. However, we've had to replace the battery already (the replacement is very expensive, as batteries go). Also, the phone is constantly muting -- it makes a terrible clicking sound, too -- resulting in having to ask people to repeat themselves over and over. It must be channel surfing, but there is no need for this. I will be buying another phone, but not a Sony.
I have been using Pampers wipes pretty much from the beginning and I really love the pop-up tub and the different fragrances they come in. These sensitive ones are especially good for newborns. My only complaint is they are thin. I usually use 2 at a time, more if my son has a messy diaper. I recently tried Huggies wipes and they are thicker, but they don't pop up. I don't like reaching in the tub as much as a the pop up, so I guess I'll stay with these.
Probably the funniest movie about corporate America that I have EVER seen. From disgruntled employees to annoying co-workers, this movie has it all. A definate buy. If you enjoy movies like Caddy Shack and Princess Bride, you will love this.
I've just started studying an MBA in the U.S.(I am going through my second semester), and I saw this film a couple of weeks ago. The first ten minutes did not tell me anything good, since it seemed one of those low budget, "C" type, uninteresting comedies that invite you to switch channel.I am glad I didn't, because we eventually had a lot of fun with the dialogs and situations, a long discussion after the film was finished, and I saw lots of things that have to do with my management courses...Very recommendable, either to de-stress, or to realize that THAT (all the bad karma and nonsense by people who just want to control you and your life) is what you want to avoid, by all means. On the job, or in everyday life...
The first word that came to mind while thinking of this film was 'odious' but I'll do it a bit of a service and say it's merely *trying.* I watched it on Amazon instant (I like the service but keep in mind I am no hard-core cinephile, my concern is the story alone, not so much the technology) and made it through to the end.I felt rather ragged afterwards. The character of Milton left perhaps the biggest impression on me - he looked and sounded and acted like a Muppet, particularly Beaker. That was a very trying element in this film. I felt like I was watching a strange permutation of James Thurber's The Catbird Seat, told in a backwards way from some unimportant background characters.The protagonist didn't feel like a protagonist. The only really wonderful piece of acting was that of Mr. Lumberg, whose dry, grueling "that would be great," stole the show. It was grotesque and hilarious.Otherwise, this was a legitimately unsatisfying film. I don't plan on watching it again.
I purchased this through Prime as an extra Christmas gift for the household. We haven't had a chance to watch it yet, but I've seen the movie before. It's one of the best movies ever, and I won't even say what I paid for it on here because I don't know what they're asking for it now. I just know that I got an exceptional deal, I think it was a gold box or something. I'm looking forward to watching this version to see what the special flair is all about, but I did get a great price on this, shipping was fast through prime and I'm happy with my purchase.
We recently organised a pot luck for our team an I selected this as gift. I sticked yellow note sticker all over the dvd case and left the words "WORK SUCKS" visible out side. when one of my co worker picked this gift and read read the sentence there was a big laugh in the room. and when he opened (removed the stickers) every one said it was the perfect gift with perfect packing for the occasion.Anyway movie is one of my favourite and must watch.
Ok, a few years ago, I worked for a major HMO last year. I was also confined to a small gray cubicle for 8 hours a day. And after watching Office Space, I quit a month later. Coincidence? Maybe. But it was like watching my life unfold on screen! Like having 4 bosses "remind" you about a tiny mistake that doesn't really matter, the doggone fax machine that is your sworn enemy, and of course the office FREAK, who you know is gonna someday show up to the work place armed! This movie has it all, and it's hilarious! So, if you ever get a case of the "mondays", call in sick,blow off those dang TPS reports, and watch this movie!
I bought this for a friend who had never seen it. I was going to let them borrow mine, but decided to just get them their own since it was so reasonable. Gotta love it!
aaahhhh this movie sticks with you and is total classic comedy. from basic humor of just wierd names to the eternal red stapler this is an amazingly hilarious movie. i have never even been inside a cubicle (thank god) and i think this movie may have influenced that. milton certainly steals the show and then i see the same actor on a csi episode and realize he can talk normally and HAS NO RED STAPLER??? *GASP* but anyway...anyone can enjoy this movie whether they are a cubie with a tyrant boss or standing in the unemployment line. this is a new CLASSIC in my book.
I ordered the movie Office Space, but when I received it I had Happy Gilmore in an "Office Space" package. It was sealed and everything. I was very disappointed in Amazon's service, in sending me the wrong movie! Will not do that again!
I love this movie. It has so many individual scenes that are hilarious. The overall plot and story aren't the greatest, but I've found most people can over look this.This movie is rated R, and I think its one of the tamest R movies I've seen. There is brief nudity and a fair amount of swearing (mainly in rap music). However, the R rating may be for the best since I don't think anyone under the driving age will think this movie is all that funny. It's mainly work related and relationship comedy. I am thrilled to say there is no "bodily fluid" humor that has been in so many movies lately.The DVD features are almost nonexistant.
Rather than comment on the film, I'll comment in the disc itself. Worthwhile set of extra features, but it's not an action film so the widescreen doesn't add much. A note on the 'Digital Locker' content: 1.you may not be able to view it. 2.it may lock up your browser. 3.the deleted scene is on the disc anyway. Summary: Buy it if you like Office Space, not because of the widescreen and Digital Locker content. BTW although it's zone 1 NTSC it played just fine on my zone 4 PAL DVD player.
This one makes me laugh everytime, if you've ever worked in a cubicle you will appreciate the humor and the office politics.
If you have ever worked in an office environment, you have to see this movie.I've watched this movie over 100 times and I still can't stop laughing.I still use quotes from this movie on a daily basis.
Yeah... I'm going to have to "go ahead" and rent this movie again because I missed most of it due to the fact that I was laughing too hard to keep up with the story line.Seriously though, this movie was simply the best movie I've ever seen. Other than the types of people the movie was being critical of, (mindless corporate suits and drones), I can't imagine anybody not loving this film.
If you've ever worked in a cubicle farm, spoken "corporatese," or dealt with downsizing, you'll find Office Space to be hilariously relevant. Created by Mike Judge of Beavis and Butthead fame, this movie could easily pass for a live-action version of the Dilbert cartoon. It pokes fun at everything from commuting to office birthday parties to "fast casual" chain restaurants. Watching Office Space, you will vicariously get the satisfaction of "sticking it to the man." Ron Livingston plays the lead role well, but the funniest characters are the supporting cast - Milton, Lundbergh, Drew, et. al. I'm going to need you to go ahead an watch Office Space...yeah...that would be great...
this would have been a good movie but the language ruined it all. will never watch again in fact will probably destroy it. language like that does not make a movie!
I love this whole movie! I is my all time favorite. I am not really a movie goer but this is one that I have played over and over again and never get tired of it."Corprate Account Payable, Nina Speaking ...Just a moment!"I have been in a cube most my life and so much rings true....this is a celebrated movie and a tribute to all of us that work in the corprate world!I happen to like me work, getting there was a struggle...we all have been Peter Gibbons at one point or another in our career!"Hey Peter....Watch you Corn$%#"There are so many lines from the movie that just make me laugh. I know the budject for the movie was 10Mil..and I knowthat opening week it did 4mil...10 mill total...but the DVD is a cult classic...it must be reeling in the bucks!
A must-see for anyone that has ever worked in a cubicle environment, hated work, got pissed-off at a printer, hates the boss, or feels trapped in a deadend job. The deliberate humor slaps you in the face from the get-go and continues to do so throughout the entire film. If you need a good laugh to forget the stress of your crappy job, then you need to see this movie.
... Although this movie has a few moments that will bring a smile to your face (the same kind of smile you get as you pass gas), it is certainly not among the best comedic efforts of all time-.......A much better film in the same vein would be Bruce Robinson's HOW TO GET AHEAD IN ADVERTISING <Criterion Collection>(Executively produced by George Harrison)...Even some episodes of the Drew Carey show, and the old Mary Tyler Moore TV Series are better than this film!
I ordered a widescreen version from this retailer. Not only did I get a fullscreen version in the mail (along with an invoice that confirmed I ordered the widescreen), the DVD would not play in any player I owned (which is 4). Tried to get in touch with customer service, but after a nightmare and a long headache I decided to just give up my ten dollars as lost and buy the film at Best Buy. Don't use this retailer!!!
When I started working in office (and a cubicle), all of my friends told me that I had to watch "Office Space" because it is so much like work and it's hilarious. Finally, I did get a chance to watch it... but I ended up being quite diappointed. Yes, there are some funny parts to the movie, but I was more disgusted with some of the supposed "humor." It could be that I tend to like movies that have some value or even a plot (even if it didn't have either, some HUMOR could have been good). I could have done without this movie, but at least now my friends will quit bugging me to watch it.Word of advice: I wouldn't watch it with kids or with older parents. Actually, I wouldn't watch it at all.
This movie is for anyone who has suffered a printer jam, worked next to someone loud and annoying, had a boss from Hell. This movie will get you to laugh. Especially enjoyable on particularly bad week at work (preferably cubical style).
There are a lot of funny movies out there, but not many can be said to have so perfectly skewered their subject that they become archetypes. "Office Space" fits this latter category, doing for the modern, post-1980 workplace what "Monty Python and the Holy Grail" did for the Arthurian legend. That is to say, "Office Space" has become a part of our common culture, with shared concepts like "pieces of flair" and "Is this good for the COMPANY?" being common to the experience not only of cubicle slaves but all of us.Further, "Office Space", despite its outrageous plot, is just close enough to the truth of modern corporate America to hit home. Companies do promote incompetents and lay off their most skilled workers, all in the name of short-term quarterly profits. They do treat their employees like drones while rewarding upper management for cheating shareholders. To see this all turned against them goes a long way in explaining the success of "Office Space." It's a classic.
The year was 1999. I was working as a customer service representative in an office that looked eerily like the one in this movie. You know, one of those utterly bland suburban campuses. Our company had just hired "efficiency consultants" to "analyze" the business. Then one day a bunch of people get laid off. While there, management introduced a new phone system for tracking how we spent our time. We actually had to enter a code to use the bathroom so they could know how much time we were there.I remember sitting in the movie theater, not sure whether I should laugh or cry. Now 5 years later I can definitely laugh. I love the bit about the TPS report memo and the red stapler. Lots of rough language, but otherwise a real gem.
When I first began speculating about this game with friends way back in 98'. All I heard was it was gonna be another space shooter that could not rate up there with games like X-Wing or TIE fighters. Man, I still will never forget the looks on their faces when I showed them how the game ran and just overall was a masterpiece of graphics and gameplay for it's time anyway. So your saying, yeah well what's the story with this game? Well, you start out as a GTA pilot (Galactic Terran Alliance) fighting a 14 year war against the Vasudans. The AI is impressive as is the combat animations and cutscenes. All I can say to anyone considering buying this is to get it before it is no longer made considering it's age. Enjoy!
I hate the phone charger business, and have gone through piles of third-party chargers over the years. With my A310, phone chargers would just fall out. So far so good with this one, plus the glowing tip (besides just being neat-o) makes it easy to find. I wish there was a way to tell top v. bottom in the dark, but that's not really a problem (and I've never had a charger that did).Highly recommended.
Good shipping but the pages were screwed up! At about 170 it reverts back to 79 and repeats 40 pages leaving 40 pages of the novel out! Terrible! How the hell did this happen! Check the pages.
It's vintage Vonnegut, but doesn't bristle like Slaughterhouse 5, B of Champions, or Galapagos. If you haven't tasted the genius of KV, I'd suggest pushing this one to the edge of your plate until you've chewed on some of his other works.William Olson, author of Right on Time.
Steinbeck's book are often quite earthy and rough. I think he had a macho image he wanted to maintain in part. He was a good writer (Noble prize, Pulitzer) and "Travels With Charley" is a wonderful book. It is not in this collection however. I find it difficult to swallow his profanity and it is never necessary (read Dickens for instance). In comparison, E.B. White had a gracious side to his writing, a wonderful subtle sense of humor and a beauty of economy with the English language. I like them both but prefer White. I mention the two together because they were both writing at the same time. They were both perfectionists and both hated to be in the public spotlight.
This was recommended to be a wonderful movie, not to be missed, in our local small town paper.Indeed it started out to be just that, even with viewing it in-between the English subtitles (German made, German language) Magnificent scenes of Africa, and beautiful people all through out. Then, right in the middle, and totally unnecessary by all standards, very graphic sex scenes between 2 of the characters. I could not believe it! It ruined what could have been a totally beautiful movie in scenery and story. I was so angry I immediately threw it in the biggest trash can I could find. I was so angry I didn't want to talk about it, let alone give time to write a review, until now. Enough said, don't waste time or money on this movie. I still have yet to speak to the man who wrote the recommendation but will the next time I see him. (I live out in the wilds of our Island, not in the town)
a brilliant character study of an upper middle class jewish german family who escape to kenya in the days before world war 2. having to adjust to a different world, having to learn to confront her own racism (irony of ironies), having to face up to a marriage where she is unable to love as much as she is herself loved, star juliane kohler manages to give a broad and poignant performace, as does the rest of the cast, highlighted by sidede onyulo as the african cook who becomes confessor and friend to the family. let us be thankful that others got ahold of the source material before the likes of meryl streep found it. a great film, in my top 100.
A very compelling story about a boy and his colt, awesome heartwelming family adventure horse lovers will most entirely love!!!
Here at last is a book that simply and lucidly teaches you the extraordinary science fo Graphology. With clear, step-by-step directions, Robert Holder's new easy method of handwriting analysis enables you - in virtually no time at all - to make accurate character evaluations, uncover hidden personality traits, and even foretell future actionsWhether you're simply curious or purely practical. the dozens of illustrations, detailed persoality descriptions, Grapho-guides, and valuable tips included provide you with all the information necessary for starting a fascinating hobby which can lead to a profitable career.--- from book's first end page
The Oregon Trail is an undeniable classic -- although overrated compared to other books written about the same time about the same subject. Parkman is a priggish, Boston snob who complains his way across the West. He despises the pioneers crossing the plains and has no interest in them -- a startling lack of consciousness for a historian. The Indians and the mountain men fare little better. A better, more generous book by a young man in the west is Wah-to-Yah and the Taos Trail by Lewis H. Garrard.Smallchief
This book was a disappointment to me and I should have researched it more before purchasing it. It was my hope to read about the settlers moving West on the old Oregon Trail but this book had nothing to do with that. Instead, it was an account of Parkman's experiences as he traveled in some of the Western areas of the U.S. (Wyoming area, Black Hills, etc.) Much of his time was spent with the various Indian tribes as he befriended them and learned much of their culture. He also spent a great deal of time hunting. My real problem with his story is that it was so repetitive. Many of the accounts were similar and it seemed like we were going over and over the same thing. I read almost every thing I can find on Western adventure and exploration but this one is sure not on the top of my list.
This seller claims that if not satisfied with the product, they will issue you a refund as long as you send the product back within 30 days. Well is almost a month since I send the products back and I havent seeing no refund yet. I tried calling and sending the seller messages with no luck they wont return my calls or write. I also think that phone number given is fake, because nobody ever answers the phone.
I purchased this phone for my 90 year old mother who wears two hearing aids. Not only can she finally hear me on the phone, but she can use it while keeping her hearing aid in her ear. She has not heard this well on the phone for over ten years. I highly recommend this product.
With all the great material in the WEA vaults, why Warner Music UK chose to package and release these also-rans is a mystery. The material has a boring sameness to it I am not used to in an Oldies Collection. Dee Dee Warwick, Darrow Fletcher, Barbara Lynn & Mary Wells are all outstanding artists that I normally look forward to listening to, but who you would not normally identify with the disco or pre-disco period of American music. The selections on this CD display these and other artists' work out of their normal areas of expertise. This one is surely going to a back shelf.
This book was terrible, it was an expolitation of his brother, and a shameless way to promote his other books. No matter the situation, the author found a way to make a reference to another book he had wrote. It was poorly written, and jumps around quite a bit. Don't waste your time or money on this book, or any book of this author's.
The songs are third rated ones that do not inspire. Listening to these songs had to be one time only deal.
I bought this for my husband to be for Christmas. He grew up with the F Troop and wanted this. He loves it. I am very happy with my purchase. Great entertainment and it is CHILD SAFE comedy.
Warning, this game does not run on Windows XP or Windows 2000.I bought this yesterday for $2.99 at the local computer store. Took it home, and tried to install it. First, the setup program wanted to install DirectX 7 on my system, whereas I have DirectX 9 already.Next, I start the game, and it crashes almost instantly. Check the box... it says "Windows 95/98". Since I have XP, I assume I'm OK. Then I check the Interplay web site... Aha! This game does not work on Windows XP. Well, for $2.99, it was a small gamble on my part to buy it. It might be a good game, but I can't tell you for sure.
The digital copy of this book is poor with artifacts on almost every other page, makes it difficult to read at points, definitely not worth the price for the effort the publisher put in.
I'm not sure why this book got so many five star reviews. It's not a terrible book, but I found it to be incrediably predictable and dull. I had pretty much figured out everything that was going to happen within the first hundred pages or so. There wasn't much point in finishing it. I love long books, but this one was pointlessly so. Wolfe goes into a lot of useless rambling that has little if nothing to do with the plot. I found myself skimming many of the pages without feeling I has missed out on anything important. Definately the sort of book you read only if there is nothing else around.
The Bonfire of the Vanities clearly made several strong points about racism, sexism and capitalism in America, but I personally enjoyed the attention Wolfe paid to developing the characters and situations each character was in. All the plot lines are just built up by the indepth description of how each character was involved. The reader is never left wondering why the characters are doing what they are doing, but everything is very obviously connected by Wolfe's previous narrative that it gives the reader something to look to for clarification. Specific events such as the mayors obsession with mayonnaise "who in the name of God would bring a half eaten jar of mayonnaise to a public meeting?" or Sherman's confusion in the Bronx "Who on Earth would take the trouble to shove a chair in a chicken wire fence in this neighborhood?" also shows the actual character's detail orientedness, and perhaps shows that focus on detail is an inherent human flaw.
Pretty good. Like the DC version, very well done. But I really hoped to see more of the earlier artwork by the original artists for the older chartacters.
A great gift for Marvel readers and a coffee table book for Marvel Families. This book brings back memories and provides helpful chronology. In the sixties, Iron Man was yellow, the X-Men were blue and yellow, and Daredevil was black and yellow. Marvel sure liked yellow.
MY SON IS GOING TO BE THRILLED WITH THIS BOOK ON CHRISTMAS, THIS BOOK IS TRULY WONDERFUL. I AM VERY HAPPY THAT I RECIEVED IT VERY QUICK, AND THE BOOK IS JUST GREAT. THANK YOU FOR RESPONDING SO QUICKLY.I KNOW HE WILL BE THRILLED TO GET THIS TO ADD TO HIS COLLECTION. THANKS MUCH AGAIN KATHLEEN SERWIN
When i saw the cover i was very exited to see big wave surfing, I was very unhappy with this movie as all the shot of the surfing scene are taken from a helicopter. Its a nice introduction to big wave surfing but nothing compare to riding giants or the billabong odisey. The rock climbing was also so so. The snow board scenes are nice as always but nothing special.Overall this blu ray is good but doesnt show you anything new or that you event seen before.
It has the episode Angel on it w/David Boreanaz...what eles do you want
THERE IS NOTHING BAD TO SAY ABOUT THIS EXCELLENT COLLECTION OF SONGS,NO MATTER HOW MANY TIMES THEY HAVE BEEN RELEASED BEFORE.THE SONGS HAVE STOOD THE TEST OF TIME AND ARE CLASSIC PERFORMANCES BY THE MOST CLASSIC ENTERTAINER OF ANY GENRE OF ALL TIME.IF YOU DO NOT ALREADY HAVE A COLLECTION OF THESE SONGS I WOULD HIGHLY RECOMMEND THAT YOU PURCHASE THIS SET AND ENJOY THE FEEL GOOD MUSIC.THERE IS ONLY ONE ELVIS .
These headphones delivered exactly what I expected from a $41 set, good sound but lacking in the noise-cancellation department. The fabric cord with an extension piece is nice and the design makes it fun to wear. The switch for noise cancelling on/off is well located as it doesn't take up room on a seperate piece or on the cord and the foldable design makes the headphones relatively easy to transport with big pockets. Basicly, everything one can expect from Sony for $41. (Since flying with them I would change this to a 3 review... they just didn't deliver much with the noise cancelling.
I only bought these because my cat chewed on my sony fontopia headphones and I was low on cash, and these were on sale for $25. I figured they hold me over for a week or two. A minute into the first song I regretted buying them. First of all, they're ugly as all hell. The only reason i got them is because they said they were noise cancelling and the original price was $70. The noise cancelling consists of a distracting static frequency, and there is no bass whatsoever. These are honestly terrible headphones. I should have gotten $15 sony earbuds, i would have been much happier.
Once again,McDermott's verbal mastery takes you to the place of which she writes as clearly as if looking through a window on the scenes she describes so vividly. However, compared to "Charming Billy", this piece is disappointing. While very well written descriptively, I found it slow. The opening act caught my attention and I continued to read hoping for more of the same alure...it was not to be found. I actually skipped paragaphs and entire pages and was able to continue as if the skipped parts were of no importance to the story at all. While I would recommend Ms. McDermott's work, I would not recommend this particular book.
I didn't find the music relaxing or energizing. I was too distracted by the fact that it reminded me of bad early 80s music. But on the plus side, it made me want to put on a shiny leotard and leg warmers.
I listened to this book on cd which I have found is a great way to get insirational advice everyday and further myself as a person. I loved C.S Lewis's Mere Christianity. It gives a educated view into why he believes in God and more specifically the Christian God. He is a great writer and the book is very intellegent. I would recommend this book to anyone and everyone.
I have no doubt that C.S. Lewis was a fine man and he certainly set out to achieve a noble goal here. Making the spiritual more understandable through the application of logic has an undeniable appeal. Unfortunately, his assumptions about some of the basic concepts of human nature look positively naive by modern standards. He comes off sounding like, as one of my psych professors was fond of saying, a "park-bench philosopher". Behavioral science just had not developed to the point it has today, so he had no way of knowing that his basic assumptions about some things he viewed as givens were, in fact, not given at all. In the end, trying to make the subject of religion something that one can put to the test of "logic" is an exercise in futility. That's why it's called faith.
I recieved this book as a gift from someone I thought to be an open-minded, good person. This book has nothing new in it. It is worthless. It is just another example of a poor deluded SOB trying to convince himself that he really likes the cage he was tricked into entering.This book is prosylazation. Prosylatizers, I have found, try to convert people because they are insecure about their faith, and think that by converting the world they will be secure in their faith. The truly faithful person does not prosylatize, for if one is secure in one's faith, why preach? If I could give this book a NEGATIVE FIVE, I would.
I bought this book hoping to find an intelligent defense of faith, given that the author is such a well respected fiction writer. Unfortunately, what I found were the kinds of arguments that I used while in grade school and discarded soon thereafter. If you've thought critically about anything at any point in your life, you're not going to get anything out of this book.
For the last week I have been like a little child waiting for a birthday present to come in the mail. I have joyfully anticipated receiving this boxed set of C.S. Lewis treasures. At last, it came today. What a disappointment! If the covers of these books last through more than one reading, I will be surprised. The covers are beautiful, but the quality is poor, and certainly not worth the $47.90 I paid for this set. I was looking forward to something that would last for years to come. Oh well, I won't be sending the set back, because I'm anxious to read these incredible works (the first books I will have read in several years). If this review was about C.S. Lewis, it would be five stars. But, this review is about the shoddy quality of this set, and hence the single star review. Buyer beware.
It has been a while since I last got excited about a book, but this book inspired me. This book gives both rational arguments for Christianity and sound explanations of core Christian doctrines.
The book took a while to get here, and when it did, it was in rough shape for supposedly being brand new. I also discovered I could have bought it for $5 cheaper from another online retailer. Not too impressed with this purchase.
Hundreds of reviews of this book have been written over the years. And no wonder! It's author did not become a Christian til in his 40's when he came, as he tells it, "kicking and screaming into the kingdom!"He's heavy weight intellectual (taught both Oxford and Cambridge) but able to write clearly for us commoners as well. The many copies I have given away over the years have gone to Christians who need a clearer understanding of their faith, as well as to nonChristians who need to understand that Christianity is quite intellectually respectable - and possibly even TRUE!
For those of us that are more logical and analytical in our thinking, CS Lewis illustrates logically the need to not only acknowledge but address the existence of God but make a choice in where we stand and what we consider Truth. Use this as a starting point in a lifelong journey to gain an accurate picture of who God is.
Loved kindle for iPad can't go wrong I buy as many books as possible this way. Quick down load and you get your stuff right away
In all fairness, I wasn't able to finish this novel. The author seems to have a singular obsession with things sexual to the exclusion of most of the important characteristics of a good story.If you like the theme of a woman's sexual liberation, read Chopin's _The Awakening_ or Lawrence's _Lady Chatterley's Lover_ instead. (Besides, the sex is much better in _LCL_.) In addition to tackling this controversial subject, these books are masterfully written and classics for all time.
As someone who has a genuine phobia of flying I thought that this book might provide some useful insights. After about a hundred pages I realized that it was just a lot of lurid filth. It is a total con. I ended up throwing it off the train somewhere in the middle of Manitoba. Probably the biggest rip since the Neverending Story.
The heroine is a bloody racist (which is taken for wit, I guess). What a turn-off.
I wanted to like these pants so bad. I'm 5'8'' 135 Lbs and they were too short for me. I guess I'm a little anal when it comes to my pants being long enough, but regardless, they were way too thin. I have a pair of Adidas and prefer their dry-fit fabric over these. These are for sure a summer pant.
The costumes and sets aren't too bad, but otherwise this looks like a bad TV movie from the 70s usually does. I agree that there is less of the melodrama than in Cecil DeMille's film, but the writing and acting are still painful to watch, and the picture is always dark. It must be that people feel nostalgic about something from years gone by, because this movie looks so very bad compared to classics of the past and modern filmmaking.
Eurasia's most inspired duo.Flashbacks envelope a bullet to the future.Not for the faint of heart.
I have been through most of the test preperation books in the market, but this I was very optimistic upon coming to this book. The book itself is not written in a "user-friendly" manner, and the best parts of this book are the 3,500 word vocab list. The math section is very comprehensive, however, the questions are a lot harder than those found on the SAT, which eventually starts to discourage you. I verbal review sections are practically useless, and the strategies do not work. Once again, buy this book only for the vocabulary list, and then move on to some other book (such as kaplan, etc...). This list will give you the foundation to answer analogies and sentencecompletions but nothing more...The practice tests are quite useless, and are much harder than that found on the real SAT...Good luck on you test preperation
Having tested many books that deal with the SAT I was positively surprised by the depth this book provided. The problem is the fact that the sample questions in it do not really reflect the real SAT-test and can only be used to study the math or the critical thinking skills.Also, dont plan to use this book to brush up your vocabulary - the included word-list provides you with only the meanings of the words and not with a sample sentence.This book might be suitable for usage in combination with 10 Real SATs or some other book that features more realistic SAT questions.
This is probably the worst CD Sawyer Brown has ever came out with. Out of the 11 songs, only about 4 are worth listening to. I recommend you listen to it before you waste any of your hard earned cash on this.
Way too many names, Way too much detail.There is a story hidden in this book, but it is hard to dig it out. It could have been a good read.
This book was one of the most boring books I've had to read in a long time. I found the writing to be unimaginative and felt like the book had no direction. I was very disappointed and had forgotten it before it was even finished.
With the slinging of rubber playground balls and the realistic sound of the ball hitting and stinging its mark (how'd they capture that!) and the bathroom humor, this could have been a movie that I enjoyed with my children! HOWEVER, the sexual innuendo and outright poor language, as well as the girl-girl kiss and "crotch enhancement" received by the Stiller character makes this a movie that I'm tossing in the trash can. What a drag!
Worst movie, worst acting, and worst script, this would win hands down. When it comes to lame, witless and downright stupid movies, Ben Stiller is on quite a roll. If you are not a teenaged boy, I recommend staying away from this one.Dodgeball fancies itself as a parody of the typical sports movie, don't fall for it. The non-stop toilet humor is lame and predictable and it's a wonder that this movie can garner such rave reviews from so many people.In my humble opinion, if you have an IQ greater than 12, don't bother with Dodgeball. Personally, I'd sooner watch a marathon of Paulie Shore and Carrot Top movies before sitting thru Dodgeball again, and that my friends, is saying something.
I dont know how anyone could not laugh at this movie. It seems to appeal to all types of audiences that enjoy light humor. I wasnt a fan of Ben Stiller until this move. He is very funny in it. Despite the focus on humor, it is not entirely predictable and has some suprises in store for the audience.
This movie was really silly, but I thought it was quite watchable. I was impressed actually. I wouldn't mind watching it again. Usually I don't like Ben Stiller movies, but I laughed at some of the stuff he did in this one. I guess it may be because I respect antagonists more than protagonists.The plot in this movie doesn't matter much. No one cares about it. This movie is for nothing but cheap laughs. Fortunately the cheap laughs aren't limited to endless shots of people getting hit in the groin. There's a whole variety of goofy humor. My favorite part is the black and white short film on Dodgeball they watch.Sometimes the humor gets a bit silly though. There's a guy who walks around in the film dressed as a pirate for no reason at all. I thought the whole pirate thing was the worst part of the movie. Still, it wasn't enough to tarnish the entire work.I'd recommend checking this out for a rental. Laugh at some parts and not at others. Go with the flow.
I'm trying to locate the abridged version that I taught from in the 60s. It's out of print and I would love to get come copies of it if anyone has any to use with my not-so-good readers now.If you find any please call me at 949-854-8889.
This book is an excellent story. Lots of California history..or better..Alta California as it was known in the era.BEWARE OF THE PHYSICAL BOOK !!!!! It is about 10"x11"...printing of the story is VERY!!!! pale.I will keep this....but have ordered an older, normal paperback version...similar to the one I left accidentally at the San Diego airport.Terrible size and print itself. Find another book of Ramona, by Helen Hunt Jackson....and be ready to want to go to Old Town San Diego.Michaelene Gon.
After I install this blower fan it made a loud ticking sound. So I thought maybe it was hitting something. I uninstalled in and ran the fan uninstalled. It still made the loud ticking noise. So I had to return it. The bad part was that Amazon deducted 7.20 from the price I paid for the fan because I did super saver shipping. I don't recommend buying this fan or any auto parts from Amazon.com since they don't stand behind defective products.
I would recommend this product to everybody with a baby in the house. First, it allows you to keep the baby clean, because the bibsters are quite big. Second, they are waterproof and learning to drink out of a cup is always wet. And, third, no washing and a new, clean, spotless bib each time. Makes parenting a bit easier!
This toy is by far our favorite! I don't know how many hours total our son has spent hammering the balls and then watching them go through the maze. Sometimes he uses the hammer, sometimes he just pounds them with his hand. The hammer isn't that hard, so when he does decide to hammer Dad's head, it doesn't hurt that much :-) If your child is less than 1, it will take a few days playing with the toy before he/she masters it and pounds the balls with confidence (they LEARN the toy). If we had 1 toy to take with us on a trip, this would definitely be the one. Highly recommend.
Video only?Absolutely no sound from this "NTSC" DVD.I tried it on multiple machines and several computers...No dice...the soundtrack is absent.You have an ideal picture of the artists performing their very silent show.Not very satisfying...I'd rather hear and not see a band than see and not hear a band.just a bit pissed in Puyallup, WA
A tantalizing performance by Kathleen Turner. Anyone with a soul sometimes wants to go back in life to discover the great " what if" In this film Peggy Sue gets that chance to possibly change her life by going back ..there!Turner pulls it all off in grand style. The realities she learns are not as profound as she might think they are. Nevertheless , viewing this film might provoke a " thought" journey because its done so well and with care. Watch for Leon Ames and other older stars.Written by Jerry Leichtling and Arlene Sarner.
I love this movie...I love it because it lets me go back to 'visit' my Grandmother, who I miss every day of my life. But when I am watching this movie, I am somehow with her again, even if only for a few moments. It also lets me be a 'kid' again...remembering a time long gone by, but never quite forgotten. For me, this is a movie sprinkled with tears but rich with wonderful memories of yesterday. Let's face it, we all would love to go back to a previous time and place, even if just for a moment. This movie is the next best thing.
Got these bits a couple of weeks ago to replace a 20+ year old Craftsman set. The first thing I noticed was the heft of the assortment; same number of bits as the Craftsman, but considerably heavier. Have mainly used a couple of the larger ones on a cast iron grill; they chewed through like it was pine. Have used some of the smaller bits to drill out rusted bolts. You only need to watch the metal filings pile up to know they're doing their job. Haven't used any on wood; seems like overkill and my older ones do fine for those. I only wish the storage box had a more positive lock mechanism. But I do like its bright size markings (sure beats stamped metal, which I can never read in weak light). All in all, I'm very pleased, and the price was GREAT!.
This is a very good movie. It is so easy to be able to order old movies and enjoy them again and again,
This edition of the book is absolutely awful. The type is small and printed in a grayish fuzzy font that is hard to read. The margins are almost nonexistent. There is no space to write notes, not even at the bottom of the page. You will notice that this book is only 194 pages, whereas I recently found a very good used copy that is 378 pages. Both are unabridged, but in this edition the text is crammed onto the pages. Also, just scanning through the book today I quickly found two typos. Avoid this cheaply constructed edition. I sincerely hope Amazon stops selling it.
Clean, neat, white,one, made of paper,the cover is shiny,with words,Is anyone getting my pointgood bye
I was forced to buy this for a grad class and it was absolutely boring. I was happy with the price and that's about it.
The edition of "Jude the Obscure" that I believe you're seeing on this page -- the Signet paperback, with the two horses on the cover -- first came out in '61 and hasn't been touched since then (except to add a bibliography in 1980). There is a helpful 11-page afterword by Al Alvarez, but that's it. Signet has just been reissuing and reissuing the same thing for over four decades.With the Signet, though, there are no footnotes; you're just getting the bare text. That means that you'll have zero help with Hardy's rustic or ecclesiastical terms, not to mention the abundant Latin.In short, get this one:Jude the Obscure (Oxford World's Classic), in which said defect is remedied. And unlike the Signet, in which the text has adjusted to reflect modern spelling and pronunciation, the Oxford's World's Classics is Hardy's original text as he saw it published.
thomas harding's overly descriptive writing style backfired in this would be entertaining novel. hardy should've realized that the harsh reception of the novel by the public was probably more because it's boring than because of the controversial text. hardy ruined a perfectly good plot with excessive description and annoying detail.
I didn't enjoy reading this one. I know Hardy isn't the most cheery writer, but this was beyond just depressing -- it was boring. About halfway through, I was tempted to just skip the rest but I trudged on to the bitter end.This may have been scandalous when it was published, but why couldn't Hardy have done a better job with the ending? The almost Dickensian sequence of hard-to-swallow tragedies was too contrived for my taste. Was Hardy afraid of writing a happy ending for this unconventional pair, or did he want to display the worst-case effects of a rigid social code of behavior? Either way, it all became pretty unbelievable.From a historical point of view, as a jumping-off point for a discussion of the social constraints and morals of the period, Jude is a success; it certainly seems to have set off some fireworks when it was first published. As casual reading, I can't recommend it.
If you purchase Millennium products by Farberware do not count on getting any satisfaction if you need to use the warranty. I sent in three pieces 5 months ago for what I was told was a 6-8 week process -- I'm still waiting, and every time I call I get a different line -- they are either incompetent or lying, or both. Decent products, unacceptable customer service -- buyer beware!
Helen Kane is the flapper who was the model for Betty Boop. When you listen to this CD, you can appreciate just how well Mae Questal, who provided the voice of Betty Boop, imitated Helen Kane. The music on this CD is great fun. Not only do you get to hear more complete versions of songs that Betty Boop sings, but there are also songs like "He's So Unusual" that Betty Boop should have sung.
Works great now I get the best steamed veggies the company sent it fast I give the company and the steamer 5 star
Just love this little pot. Have been a Farberware user for over 35 years and finally replaced my 3 quart saucepan with this gem. It's a great size for a small family, doesn't take up much room on the stovetop. Only concern is that the handles do get hot and you need to use a glove or towel to use the handles after boiling or high temps. I would recommend this pot to anyone in the market for mini-size soup/stew preparations.
I agree this is a solid cookware. But it is so hot on the handles everytime I try to remove it from the stove. I believe they can do something about the design of the handles. BTW, my hands are not so sensitive to heat normally. But this is super hot beyond my tolerance.
Got this mainly for veggies. Works great and fast. Very pleased with it. It could be a little bigger but can hold 4-5 servings.
To tell the truth I was a bit hesitant to purchase this book as loosing my "joy" was not something to which I was willing to admit.John Piper doesn't disappoint. His books are deep which is exactly what I needed as there are just too many superficial books on various Christian topics which tend to lack substance or depth or have any real effect in changing one's heart. John Piper tells it like it is and gets to the heart of the matter.I'm so glad I finally gave in and purchased this book. I have been blessed and I have been able to rediscovered the joy of the Lord that I had when I was first saved.If you can't handle the truth and are not wanting to actually put the time and struggle into what it takes to truly abide with God on a deeper level than this book is not for you. If you are a mature believer who needs a good kick in the pants than this is the book for you. Awesome book! If it is what you need then you will NOT be disappointed!
I WAS LOOKING FOR INEXSPENSIVE HDMI CORDS FOR MY PS3 AND MY NEW HD TV.. WELL EVERYONE TOLD ME U HAVE TO GET MONSTER CABLES THERE LIKE 50$$$ BLAH BLAH BLAH...!!!! WELL I FOUND THESE AND THOUGHT HEY THERE CHEAP SO IF THEY DONT WORK OH WELL.. BOY I WAS WRONG THEY ARE GREAT.. THE TV IS AMAZING AND THE PS3 GAMES LOOK SOOO GOOD!!!.YOU DON'T NEED THOSE OVER PRICED MONSTER CABLES .THEY SHIPPED TO ME FAST.. I EVEN GOT THEM EARLIER THAN EXSPECTED.( I KNOW I WAS CHECKING MY MAIL BOX DAILY) .I WILL DEFINATLY BUY FROM THIS COMPANY AGAIN!!!! THANKS GUYS!!!
After two years of using component cables for my Xbox 360, and a year of using a Monster HDMI cable for my PS3, I decided that the difference in quality between the two was noticable enough for me to go out and buy another HDMI cable for my Xbox. After shopping around, and seeing the price and reviews for this cable, I bought it, and in all honesty, this cable is much worse than even my component cables. I tried a few different movies, and a few different games, all to no avail. Characters in my games are choppy, and pixelated, and all of the movies, even in HD quality are blurry. I decided to switch the two cables to see if it was just my Xbox, and immediately noticed the difference. This is a poor cable and I would not reccomend it to anyone who cares about the quality of the graphics on their screen.
The HDMI cable works OK with our plasma (someone was asking if was only for LCD before) but if you are using it with your XBOX 360 and you have a headset (Turtle Beach-type, not the regular ones) you'll also need the adaptor for audio OUT. I should have checked before, because the adaptor by itself is more expensive than cable and adaptor together, at least here in Amazon. Otherwise, no problem. Recommended, especially for the price.
This HDMI Cable category 2 hasn't fail me at all. It works great, and displays up to 1080P! I highly recommend this HDMI cable.
If you can tell the difference between the images and sounds these cables transmit and those transmitted by more expensive cables, you're not likely to be reading reviews of this generic item. These work well for any HDMI connection--don't spend more than a few dollars per cable.
This was very amateurish. Don't think it would hold even the attnetion of a child, no matter what age.
Actually I would like the option to give this tape a 0 star rating. I bought this video for my pre-school aged nephews as a Christmas gift. I thought a Rankin Bass video would be good/safe for children. I finally watched it with them the other day. I was very disappointed and would not recommend this movie for anyone. The characters in the story swear. A haggish woman swears at the unicorn saying "Damn you, damn you!" The knight/hero character says "Damn." A troll type creature says something like "What the Hell, am I supposed to look at." and a magician takes God's name in vain after being accosted by a tree he brought to life, which is a buxom "woman tree" who makes a pass at the magician. Shocking. If my nephews went up to their parents and used these expressions from the movie, they would be reprimanded by their parents who do not talk like that. I now know that I need to preview every video I buy for my nephews before giving them a present. Shame on Rankin Bass
The Last Unicorn is a TERRIBLE movie, for one the DVD release was very poor, and some aspects of the film weren't made for children...or ANYONE, for that matter. There isn't really a point to this film, so DO NOT BUY IT!
If I could give this a half star I would. I bought this for my children to watch and I felt with a rated G rating that I was safe. How wrong I was. I am ashamed to say that I let my children see this before I did. When the magician is tied to the tree and his magic brings the tree to life all I see is the tree and her huge breasts. And the magician is stuck between her cleavage. The world is getting sick enough that I don't need to show a cartoon to my children with this garbage in it. I am highly disappointed and so are my children because they cannot watch this movie. I think that you need to watch this movie first before showing small children.
The last unicorn stinks. You really shouldn't see it. Some people like it, but i think it's a bad movie and doesn't have really good characters. People who like it, like it. We all have different opinions.
The Last Unicorn was my favorite movie when I was a kid. The story is sweet, the animation lovely. I eagerly bought a copy on VHS when I saw it some years ago and awaited the release of the DVD with glee.Unfortunately, my glee was somewhat unfounded. While the movie itself is still as wonderful as ever, the DVD itself is shoddy work. The movie is only presented in fullscreen (though there was a widescreen laser disc available), there are no extras -- even the picture quality is less than outstanding.If you're looking to replace a worn VHS, this is certainly a good option. If, on the other hand, you are waiting for a DVD treatment worthy of this beautiful movie, you have more waiting ahead of you.
I remember seeing the Last Unicorn when it was first released in the 80's and loved it ever since. The story should keep adults interested throughout, with a wonderful story about dreams, love and sacrifice. The voice acting is first rate as well as the soundtrack. Yet, the transfer onto DVD is the worst I've even seen, the opening titles are blurry, the picture fuzzy. One review questioned that it may have came from the master VHS. I would not even go that far, it's a very poor copy, as for the sound, if you have 5.1 surround, you'll hear music and the voices coming from all directions. I view my movies on a HDTV, and that's even no help. As for extras, there are none, not even a trailer. So should you get it? Its nice to have it added to my collection, but expect a poor VHS viewing vice the clear DVD.
I have always loved this movie and was so excited to learn it was on DVD finally. A wonderful cast and wonderful music. I could watch it again and again. I love it.
When I was about four or five years old I loved to watch The Last Unicorn. Spotting it at Blockbuster, I decided to rent it, wondering how I would see it now.I was worried when I saw that the animation was Rankin/Bass, but in the end I found it to be a visual confection.Some of the characters do look a little cheesy, but most of the time the animation dazzled me. In particular Mommy Fortuna's tree stump hat is very cool, forestscapes are ethereal, and I love Molly's BIG brown eyes.My favorite scene is the meeting of Molly and the Unicorn...The woman is angered that the Unicorn came to her at a low point in her life rather than when she was "new and innocent." After that schpiel Molly embraces her and whispers, "I forgive you."To my mind, this is one of those works like The Little Prince or The Mouse and His Child that is meant for chidren but is sincere enough to captivate adults as well. Well done.
First things first: This is a nice movie for kids, particularly little girls. The story is compelling, though the animation is pretty lousy. The music, written by the estimable Jimmy Webb and sung by America, is quite good. I'd give the movie 3 stars on the whole, 4 stars for a little girl.Now for this particular DVD. It's absolutely attrocious! The picture looks no better than an average VHS cassette. Worse (MUCH worse), the soundtrack suffers from noticable pitch inconsistencies. It sounds like a dub from a BAD cassette tape. There is no excuse for this, and I've never seen (or heard) a poorer DVD transfer.If you already own this movie on VHS, there's no reason to spend any money to get his version. It's surely no better than the copy you have, and is (because of the soundtrack wow and flutter) arguably worse.
I love this movie so much. I have been watching it for years and I have yet to grow tired of it. It is a great movie with beautiful songs and music. The story-line will capture you. This is definately one of MY favorite movies.
This is a great movie! I first saw it when I was about 6 and I still love it! Beware of the profanity! I recently saw it again and I was surprised to hear the bad language because of the G rating.
People of all ages love this story. It is currently a movie and a book and both are equally fantastic. The Last Unicorn has been my favorite movie for as long as I can remeber. This movie will never leave you stranded. It has all the elements a fantasy story should have. Buy it while you can because this movie will remain for years to come and the longer you wait the more expensive it will be. This movie is a true classic.
Not sure why I added this one to my large collection but it is now one of my favorites. My biggest regret is not getting to see him live before he died. Unlike some CDs where there is only one or 2 good songs this one has lots of great songs.
The sound musically is good. That's the only reason I give it one star. But for the vocals no stars. If you don't care who sings, then buy it. I regret buying this cd, because the vocals don't appeal to me. Take advantage of the "Listen to" songs when available. Unfortunately on this cd that option is not available. But many others do have it.
This drum is sweet. It looks amazing coming out of the box, a classic, beautiful design. I swapped the stock Weather Master heads for an Emperor Coated/ Clear Ambassador Reso. Also swapped stock snares for 42-strand wires. No complaints about sound from this beauty.My only complaint to date is the strainer. The standard P-85 strainer would often get snagged when moving the snares from off to on. This sucks big time when you're in the middle of a song, fighting with the strainer to co-operate. I got desperate and almost snapped the arm off it once. This may have been a problem on my end, seating it incorrectly or something. I'll soon swap to a P-86 strainer.Also, watch out for fingerprints on this! The chrome looks awesome when it's clean, however fingerprints really stand out.. and drive me mad. Minor detail but thought it was worth mentioning.Overall, very good drum. If mine got stolen or destroyed in a fire I would buy another.
What were they thinking when they put this collection together? Yes, it has almost - ALMOST - all of Elvis's greatest hits but where is "One Night"? And why, why, why would they dare to include Elvis's horrendous live version of "Polk Salad Annie" and omit a classic like "One Night"? It is for that glaring omission and that glaringly bad inclusion that I give this collection a rating of 4 rather than 5. Hey, I love Elvis Presley's music as much as anyone but he had no business recording "Polk Salad Annie." There's only one version of that song that should ever be heard and that's the original by the song's writer, Tony Joe White.
I mistakenly checked this book out of the library when I was in 4th grade (1964), thinking it was going to be about knights ("The Silver Sword"). Imagine my surprise when, upon reading the first page, I discovered it was about a young boy (my age) separated from his family during WWII. Yet, even that first page sucked me in. I was not an avid, or even a good reader at that age, but I couldn't put it down, and finished the book in two days. I proceeded to check it out at least once a year until I could no longer find it in libraries. It was probably the single biggest reason I learned to love reading. My son is now in 4th grade, and I logged on to see if I could find it, and will make sure it becomes a part of his life as well.
The site of an immaculately turned out Susan Hampshire in thick eyeliner and gleaming white (flared) trouser suit prancing through the Serengeti should serve as an immediate red flag. This is about as far as you can get from Bill Travers' and Virginia McKenna's charming performances in Born Free, never mind invoking the real Adamsons, who led interesting and ultimately tragic lives. Doesn't seem much like Kenya in the fifties to me (I was there). Give it a miss.
This Born Free sequel lacks authenticity (the two leads show a loving relationship, when the opposite is well-known) and credibility (how in the world could the three young cubs shown have survived on their own for as long as they supposedly did?). It's also boring.
I love this item! It occupies the top shelf of my "sci-fi shrine" next to my tiny Star Trek models.
This film is great for family! I watched online through Amazon Prime and it played perfect and was so crystal clear! I recommend this movie for all families!This movie will make you laugh and cry it is that Great! I will order this DVD through Amazon.com soon and add it to my library! This movie is also educational for everyone!I Just Love all Cats, wild or tame! I have my own domestic cat called Snowy, he is 8 years old now and mostly all white with a little apricot on his ears and tail, he also has light blue eyes! Cats Rule, Dogs Drool!! Sorry I am just kidding, I like all animals!
THIS IS AN EXCELLENT MOVIE, THE QUALITY IS NOT AS GOOD AS IT SHOULD BE,BUT ITS GREAT TO WATCH AFTER ALL THESE YEARS
THIS BOOK HAD GREAT CHARACTERS AND PLOT. IT TOOK PLACE IN PARIS,FRANCE. IT IS ABOUT A FAMILY WITHOUT A HOME. MY FAVORITE CHARACTER IS ARMAND, THE TRAMP.THE ILLUSTRATIONS REALLY ADDED TO THE STORY. I CAN SEE WHY IT WON A NEWBERRY MEDAL. I WOULD RECOMMEND THIS BOOK TO EVERYONE.
This book, set in Paris in late December follows a hobo named Armand, who's gruff on the outside, but reveals his inner warmth when he finds a newly homeless family living under "his" bridge. While this book does have many good points, this isn't a book I would recommend. The story would be very entertaining to a fifth grader but the vocabulary skills and difficulty understanding Paris or gypsies would frustrate a reader in this age group. A sixth grader, however, would more easily comprehend the vocabulary (I admit that I didn't know many of the words and had to guess at their meaning in context--and I don't consider my vocabulary skills poor by any means) and cultural situations but they would be bored by the simplistic story. In all, I would not recommend it not because it is a bad book, but because I think there are better choices out there.
This book, The Family Under the Bridge, is about an old hobo named Armand. He and a family live in Paris.Armand the old hobo pushed all of his belongings around in an old baby buggy, that had no hood.One day Armand took the Calcet children, Suzy, Paul, & Evelyne to see Father Christmas.A whilr later, Armand took the children and their mother to a gypsy camp where they lived for a few days. But then the gypsys moved away and they were again homeless.And because Armand loved the children so much he got a job at the Halles. And while he was there he could picture the wholr family sitting and playing in the house.And until then they have lived happily ever after.
Very fast response to my request. Excellent condition of the book. Would heartily recommend.
I was very disappointed in this book. She seems to have gotten bored with her characters. I have loved all the previous books, but it seems like someone forced her to write this one. Very disappointing. Very disjointed.
Thank you for the prompt delivery and the book arrived in the described condition. The book was great and I really love the whole series.
I have worn NARS Sunset Strip lip gloss for over 8 years and still continue to get compliments on the color. I have tried all the other major brands, Dior, La Prairie, Laura Mercier and Bobby Brown to name a few and nothing begins to compare. The color saturation is perfect and the formula is great without being too sticky. Many brands do not stay put, but the NARS is always there. I think the one major difference is that I always use a lip pencil first,, this helps to intensify the color and hold the gloss on the lip. Unfortunately I have been informed that they are discontinuing this color, but they have a new one called wonder that looks similar. Anyway, regardless of the color, I highly recommend NARS lipgloss.
My foot doc recommended I use this first instead of going in for surgery for a bunion. He told me to wear it for at least 3 months at night. So far, it's been about 3 months, and I do see a minimal difference with the severity of the bunion. I can wear a pair of narrow shoes now that I previously could not. It's not an overnight cure, but I would recommend this for anyone with a Stage 1 bunion issue. It looks cheap, but it's surprisingly durable! It may feel a bit uncomfortable for the first few nights, but you get used to it.
The poltergiest: The Legacy book The Shadows Between left me in the dark. Even through the story was interesting to read I had to real follow the plot carefully. The story start with the appearance of a man, David Carson arriving at The Legacy House. Who he is and where he came from is discovered as the story moves on in the book. I am a fan of the series and the books except for this one. It was slow going and for one to understand what is happenning in the story you have to read very carefully or read it a second time. I did enjoy reading the other books in the series but "The Shadows Between" left me confused about what was going on. Sorry.
I use this book because I am under a doctor's care and have to track my food intake and exercise daily. I'm also supposed to take notes on how I feel physically each day. I was happy to find a book that included everything I needed. It's the first one I've found and I've been doing this for a while. I also write my medications down on the journal page after I take them and have them all listed in the front. That way in case of emergency the crew would know what I take. I carry this book in my purse and love it.
This was Barbra Streisand's first non singing role, but her performance is pure musical-comedy. She is hilariously funny! She also has a very good chemistry with co-star, George Segal. With a truly witty script by Buck Henry, they make a great pair. This is a very funny movie, and makes a great showcase for Ms. Streisand's comedic flair. Her fans will love it, and those who aren't fans? Hey, she'll win you over. Have a great time watching!
This item is advertised as being the R-rated (original) version. It is not! It is the reissued (and censored) GP-13 version which is not nearly as good or as funny.The listing should be corrected and we can only hope that one day the studio will release the DVD in its original version.
This imported DVD has a nice picture. It comes in the original aspect ratio of approximately 1:85 anamorphic widescreen. The audio is in Dolby Digital Mono and has Korean, Spanish, English and Italian subtittles. Buy it while you can because this movie is not available in DVD in the United States.
I was about 16 years old when this movie was in the movie theaters and being a fan of Brooke Shields I watched Endless Love and I actually liked it but unfortunately I let some people convince me that it wasn't a good movie to like but now that I'm older I find that I like this movie again and think it was good so I'm editing an older review that I wrote in which I gave it a low rating of two stars but I now would rate it 3 1/2 stars.
Book was advertised to help with any type of writing. It is not. It is only useful for improving the writing of articles, ie. newspaper, mag. etc.
Finally,it's going to happen on April 25,2000. I just couldn't believe that a video of one of the best musicals ever made didn't exist. My daughter and I recorded it years ago when she was little and we have watched it over and over for years. You have to get this movie just for the songs which were nominated for the Academy Awards. This movie is destined to become an all time classic. Now, many more people will get to experience the best Cinderella story of all. It's been long overdue.
this product is ok however, unlike the discription claims it is not easy to cut, even with new sharp tools, the seets that I recieved tend to be very hard almost like Lenoleum tile for your floor, but even harder serface then even those. Either the product some where got exposed to extreame heat or its old.
The key word in the title is "unique." I'll give it that. I'm sure the contents pass muster as "art," and in that regard, I know what I like; this ain't it. Most of these tracks take forever to go anywhere and sound like Chip Davis & Co. have just discovered synthesizers and looping software. The only really listenable track is "Zip-A-Dee-Doo-Dah", which establishes fairly quickly and at least sounds like the song it's supposed to be. Even it, along with most of the others, is a study in "Hey, Mom, watch this!" sound effects generation unworthy of either the Disney moniker or Mannheim Steamroller. "When You Wish Upon A Star" tangled up with "Twinkle, Twinkle Little Star" - with neither really coming to the fore - borders on insulting; Jiminy Cricket would not be happy! Unless you're a fan of early Moog experiments, pass on this one.
As can be found on eric.ed.gov and cbpp.org, and in this review at the Harvard Educational Review ([...]), the correct author of this book is Arloc Sherman.Marian Wright Edelman, a highly noted scholar and activist for children, wrote the Introduction, while Robert M. Solow wrote the Foreword.
I love this pan. I use it practically every day. We received one for our marriage, and, after 20 years, I finally had to replace it. (A second one we received a few years later is still holding up beautifully.) The pan is the perfect size for a can of soup or vegetables or a gravy mix. I absolutely love it!
I live In Rutherford County and my husband worked for Damon Huskey on which the movie is based. Some of the things were a little far fetched but all in all is depicted as he lived.The Part of the movie of the 3 officers that were killed was based on actual events as it took place on that horrible evening May 31st 1979.My husband was working that day and spend hours in the woods looking for the shooter.So far this movie has only been available on VHS and would love to see it on DVD.But it is worth watching to see how a country sheriff did all that was expected of him and then some.Kind of like Buford Pusser in "Walking tall" but he didn't carry a big stick just a big gun.
Stanley Tam believed in principles and in his faith. His story is truly amazing and his success cannot be disputed. Regardless of your faith or lack thereof the author does a great job in humbly recapping his lifetime achievements for our benefit. Give him a chance to tell you his story. I believe only good things will come of it.
I love this cd. My favorite song is "Gills and Tails." I have been following her music since she was with Groove Theory. True talent. She is soooooooooooo under rated. KEEP UP THE GOOD WORK AMEL!!!!
As a long-time Douglas Adams fanatic (read all 5 of the trilogy, at least a dozen time, even wrote down every noun in all 5 for a database,) I read both Last Chance to See and DGHDA and loved them. Then I read this sequel and had to admit that it was likely the worst book I'd ever encountered. I didn't laugh once and literally had to force myself through it with several lapses between readings. Odin and Thor bored me senseless. I can now understand why there's been no third addition to the series. Time wasted on this could have been much better spent working on yet another HHG novel.
This is the 2nd Dirk Gently novel and like the first it is good fun , with Adams trademark sense of humour. An explosion at Heathrow is called by the press an Act of God, and it turns out to be more than tabloid hyberbole, as Dirk Gently soon discovers.The feel of the novel is reminiscient of Thorne Smith's 'The Night Life of the Gods'. But although Adam's style is always enjoyable, the novel seems a little thin; all wit and little substance. Given Adams notorious bouts with writer's block maybe his publishers were unwilling to wait for it to be properly polished.
I had read somewhere that this foreign(german i think) slasher flick was good...so I rented it(thank goodness I did'nt buy it) and was really disapointed. The dubbing is bad and the plot is so unoriginal. Basically a maniac escapes from an aslyum who likes to kill people with big scissors-at the same time, some teenagers decide to party in a spooky old school where they just graduated from. There is alot of running around, people crawling through air vents, and of course stabbings. It isn't even gory if you're into that sorta thing and the beginning, which is like a rip-off of Scream is just plain silly....Skip this one or rent it if you have insomnia...
I am absolutely appalled and saddened to see a book with this title.I've been lost in the 'Alzheimer' labyrinth for the past decade.I have no need for a condescending book of this ilk.The title alone makes me want to vomit.Shame on the authors and anyone associated with it.Alzheimer's Disease is too complex a disease for a 'Dummies' manual.This deeply disturbs me.~m
I should have known that a Van Damme movie would not be worth the time or money. It simply sucked.
After 2nd or 3rd usage, inside of the pots started to tarnished (not a food stain). Now the food cooked using these tarnished pots are tasting bit bitter (metallic taste). Very poor quality product.
I love this cookware! I had to leave my old kitchen things behind when I moved suddenly last fall due to illness and had gotten some cheap crud at Wal-Mart. BIG MISTAKE. After just 5 months it was a mess, so I went looking at Amazon, Target, and a bunch of other sites. This set was the best bargain and the highest quality I could afford and I could not be much happier with it. The bottoms are heavy and not only retain heat but distribute it evenly. I've only scorched one dish since getting the set and that was my fault, not the cookware. I will be adding other pieces from this line to my collection. Recommended.
I really love this pot. It's a bit larger than I expected, but that's my fault for not researching the size of pots properly. I'm just cooking for myself so 6 quarts is a bit more than needed. Regardless, even when I cook small amounts of things, the food doesn't burn or stick horrifically - this pot conducts heat well and is nice and heavy bottomed. It's easy to clean and I would recommend this pot.
I bought my first set 30+ years ago and finally walked away from my big kettle and burned it dry (sucks getting old). The product has not changed in that time because its great!
I love these guys! Finally, a comedy based on my generation and humor. These guys aren't afraid to put it out there or say whatever is on their minds. If you like silly, stupid, raunchy; then this show is for you.
It's widely reported that the religious right makes up a little less than 40% of the Republican party...not exactly a controlling majority. To imply that they are driving all policy towards a theocracy is intellectually dishonest, but works as a great scare tactic.Please, look at some of the sources used in the research. To say that they lack credibility would be an understatement (Air America, etc?). But, books that are preaching to the choir are a dime-a-dozen these days. The author has his select audience and he's trying to give him what they want to hear and shaping the research to support his conclusions. There's nothing wrong with that, it sells books, just don't expect many of the arguments to hold water.
This book is very well written and researched. It is obvious that the negative reviewers on this site are the radical religious extremists that it is written about.
Even if you know a lot of this stuff, it's bracing (to say the least) to see it all presented at once. It's the kind of book that may permanently taint your view of the future, and/or get you to start making worst-case-scenario plans in the event that "all the wheels come off at once".Especially interesting were the chapters on the history of "mainstream" and "outsider" churches in the US over the past two centuries (definitely a neglected topic, as the author points out) and the "southernization" of America. If Mr. Phillips' sterling credentials and decidedly non-left orientation aren't enough to convince you that this isn't a biased, one-sided polemic, you're probably unreachable.
It gets two stars for the unintentional comedy. Other than that, it's one of the worst of the ultra-cheesy, predictable, low-budget horror movies from the early nineties. The FX are funny at first, but then they just go on and on and on and the sucking takes over from the comedy. The acting is uniformly terrible, and one has to image that the typically enjoyable Barrymore is just glad to have this ridiculous part of her career well behind her.
I purchased this from renovaters supply in March 2005. The rod itself is made of solid brass tubing which is why I purchased this. However, the wall of the tubing is made from incredibly thin brass and will bend if you hang a wet towel on it. The chrome plating is also of poor quality. For $100, you would think this would be top quality. Don't waste your money on this item.
Considering that Enemymine is the work of Zack Sally, Danny Sasaki and Mike Kunka you might wonder how a double bass - one drummer band works. The answer is heavy and quite well. This EP contains my favorite song by Enemymine: I've Got the Ice in Me. However, the EP is quite heavy and the sounds that Kunka and Sally create with their basses is incredible. Sadly, like godheadSilo, Enemymine was not all that well known. If you are interested in Dead Low Tide or Smoke and Smoke give Enemymine (and godheadSilo) a try.
This is easily the greatest example any teacher/professor could use in teaching how NOT to write a book.It's clearly a novel, full of exaggeration, distortion,and in many places complete lies.May God have had mercy when Loraine tried explaining his part in his false witness crusade against the the Church, our 2000 year old Catholic Church!
It's amazing how gullible some people can be.I bought and read this book when I was evangelical.I then began to examine the issues in it, and, seeing not only the inaccuracies and misrepresentations in this book, but also seeing the historical, theological and BIBLICAL cohesion of the claims of the Catholic Church, I became Catholic.Need I say more?
This one of the worst abominations ever put in print to "describe" Catholicism. It is of note only for its ludicrous claims, half-truths, and outright lies. DON'T BE FOOLED: THIS TEXT IS NOTHING MORE THAN RUN-OF-THE-MILL, PITIFULLY IGNORANT ANTI-CATHOLICISM AT ITS WORST.It has value only as an example of atrocious scholarship, flagrant misrepresentation, and outright bigotry.
This book is without question a codex of lies from someone who hates the Catholic Church. The truly sad part is that some people actually eschew the Bible in order to support Boettner's rancid work.The book is useful for Catholic apologists to understand the genesis of some of the more laughable arguments made against Catholicism.As a source of honest information, it's a sad joke. A sad joke that still infects some of the more naive minds out there.
As a former protestant turned Catholic, I have done substantial research myself into the doctrinal basis of Catholic Church teaching. And my conclusion: this book is at best an example of poor scholarship.......but is probably more likely a deliberate attempt to spread anti-Catholic propaganda to unknowing protestants. If you want the TRUTH about Catholic Church doctrine, better to read Karl Keating's "Catholicism and Fundamentalism" or Alan Schreck's "Catholic and Christian". If you are gonna disagree with Catholic Church doctrine, at least know what the actual doctrine IS!!!
The author displays a complete disregard for the teachings of the Catholic Church (either pre-Vatican II or post-Vatican II)and instead offers recycled stereotypical nonsense of Catholicism offered by the same pseudo-religious Protestant preachers who seek to discredit the Church.One might actually gain a better knowledge of the Catholic Church by reading:a) The Bibleb) The Catechism of the Catholic Church(Something that the author of this book has obviously not done)
Wow, what can I say? Totally ignorant, very very poorly done or just plain intentional lies to mislead people. Even those people who don't have any faith affiliations and atheists will find this book beyond poorly researched.I totally get it if one's own or other christian denomination's interpretation of the Bible is different from Roman Catholism and her teachings but when people (especially this book) intentionally MISREPRESENTS, fabricate lies that the other Church TRULY teaches, it borders bigotry and hatred which is against the 9th Commandment of God, "Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor".Please for humanity's sake.....read a lot of good historical books specially the other's side OFFICIAL teachings and not just from some disgruntled priest, nun or unverifiable source and lastly....be honest!
Mr Boettner's book has absolutely no basis in the real world. I think it is safe to say there are factual errors on nearly every page, and even when he does get it right, he often distorts the facts. Catholics should read this just to see how far anti-catholics will go!
I originally was quite interested in seeing this film after reading a lot of good press about it. When I finally did see the film theatrically I mainly saw little more than the failed possibilities.In my opinion the greatest weakness is in focus. The two founders are not particularly interesting characters and the choice to focus on them to the exclusion of the company itself brought the film down. As well there are significant time gaps in the growth of govWorks.com while other sections (most notably the rather boring part about securing venture capital) are given a disproportionate share of the time. In the end I never was able to care about the characters or gain any real feeling for the company they founded. It could have been about any other business that failed with very little that was specific to the time, place, or culture that surrounded the Dot-Com Boom and why it went bust.
SWAY IS AMAZING, THE ALBUM THIS IS MY DEMO IS ACTUALLY RELEASED THROUGH DYSHPA PRODUCTIONS, WHICH IS SWAYS COMPANY AND HE WAS IN BUSINESS WITH BIG *ALLIENCE RECORDS RELESED IN COURTESY OF ALL CITY MUSIC BECAUSE SWAY IS UNSIGNED, HE HAS NEVER HAD A RECORD DEAL BECAUSE WHAT LABELS CAN OFFER HIM, AINT ENOUGH AS TO WHAT HE CAN DO FOR HIMSELF, I SWEAR DOWN, CHECK THE WEBSITE ABOUT THIS MAN.. BRUV I SWEAR TO YOU, YOU'LL BE SO DISAPOINTD IN YOURSELF IF YOU DONT GET THIS.BRAP. SAFE
Joel Vance does a wonderful job of drawing you into his hunting life, and painting a word-picture that makes you feel like you're there. He has an easy-going writing style, so it's fun to ride along as he tells his tales. There are times when you'll laugh out loud, and others when you'll find good, solid information about hunting, guns or dogs.
I like David and have seen him live. The beginning of this book was pretty good, but then I just lost interest. There were the occasional laugh out loud sections, but it seemed like they weren't coming often enough to keep me choosing this book over others. So I say it just wasn't good enough.
I recently bought Sedaris' Carnegie Hall CD and thought it was hilarious. I am also an enthusiastic fan of This American Life and have loved his many contributions. This book proves that NPR highlights Sedaris' best work and leaves the rest. Unfortunately this is a book mostly of "the rest".I had a tough time finding any redeeming value in the story of his rickshaw hauling, trash picking sister and her ability to put out cigarettes with her bare feet. I was much more repulsed by the story of his budding homosexuality and the way he was able to coerce young, naked boys to sit on his lap.If I were to choose one word to describe this book it would be "icky". Skip the ickiness and buy the CD. Or, better yet skip the expense and listen to This American Life. It's free and it's his best material.
I love David Sedaris. I think his writing is very funny, very touching and very entertaining. I go to see Sedaris speak when he's on tour and I read short pieces he's written for The New Yorker and Esquire online. In fact, I've already read many of the stories in this book (which was somewhat disappointing). "Rooster at the Hitching Post" and several other have been printed elsewhere and you can read them online if you don't want to buy this book. I will say, though, there are plenty of new stories in here that make the book well worth it. Just don't be too surprised if you come across something you've read before.
If you enjoyed "Me Talk Pretty One Day" then you will like this book. Although it is a little more serious... with personal stories from Sedars' struggles in life. But it still has laugh out loud situations.I listened to both books, read by the author, which made the stories feel even more personal.
Being the first David Sedaris book I've ever picked up, I didn't quite know what to think when I first checked it out from the library. But after hearing it raved about by my friends and being highly allured by the cover, I decided to give it a try. Reading this book turned out to be one of the most rewarding experiences I've had in a very long time. I found myself cracking up at stories like "Six to Eight Black Men", "Baby Einstein" and "Monie Changes Everything." I often laughed so hard I received very curious stares from those around me.David Sedaris is not only hilarious and entertaining, but also a very talented writer who knows how to weave a story unlike any others. I highly, highly, as highly as anyone can, recommend this book for someone, anyone who needs a good laugh.
Sedaris' book is entirely too self-aggrandizing to rate as entertainment. Spare yourself from the temptation to buy.Lamar Nesbit
The wittiest parts are in the first 3 chapters. Other than that, don't bother. This is the sad story of the product of a dysfunctional, estranged family who has many opportunities through gifts, trusts and other money sources to find his potential, get an education and make his contribution to society. Instead, through drugs, homosexuality and extreme self-absorbtion, he descends into a sad, wasted life. I regret buying this book. Again, don't bother.
Hearfelt essays on David Sedaris' life growing up gay in middle America. Always full of astute observations of American life, you will laugh out loud many times while reading this collection of essays.
good pan, just hope you don't need the lifetime warranty. this complaint is not pan specific. If you have read the tons of consumer complaints against Meyer corp you will see that they do NOT honor there lifetime warranty on the non stick surface. I had my pan for 2 years and the surface stopped working. we have never used the pan in the oven, nor put it in the dish washer and we don't even own anything but plastic pan utensils. all of which makes our pan a perfect candidate to be replaced. according to the website, you don't need an RMA or anything just UPS the pan. well i did. the UPS tracking shows them getting it some 4 months ago and no word from them. after checking around on line, this is typical of them. save your $10 in UPS shipping and buy a different brand. vote with your dollar and spend it else ware.
I've used Farberware for 40 years and have always loved their products. Most of my pots still look great after so much use. They cook food beautifully. The only problem has been with some of the handles loosening up after years of use. They can usually be tightened with a screwdriver, but after a long while, it's a bit more difficult.
I sent this collection of Italian cheeses to my daughter and needless to say she was delighted. They were excellent!!Formaggio del Cucina (Italian Cooking Cheeses 2 pound) by igourmet.com
I followed this book and did everything it said with an open mind. The print is every bit as blurry as it every was before I tried the things in this book. I wanted so much for this to work, and I'll try again, but after four months of daily applying the techiniques of this book, my vision did not improve the least bit.
I saw the Heart of Gold concert from the Ryman Aud. on Showtime recently and found the music and staging superb.Neil sounded great and his asides between numbers showed how sensitive a performer he really is to those in his audience. I immediately ordered the Prarie Winds CD as well as the DVD. However I was disappointed that Four Strong Winds was not included on the CD. This is a beautiful song by Ian Tyson also found on CASH -V by Johnny Cash. I would hope that Neil's version will eventually make it to a CD in the future. I recommend both to all Neil's fans.
The recording is so bass heavy that it is not pleasurable to listen to. The music on this CD is also on the live "Heart of Gold" DVD movie...the sound quality is quite good on the live recording. Mr. Young's performance of the songs is also better on the live recording.
The CD does not play. I have tried it in several different CD players and it simply doesn't play. The Johnny Cash CD I purchased with it plays just fine, so I don't know why it doesn't work. I would appreciate a replacement.
I don't think this is Neil Young's best CD. I look at the radiobut the Painter gets played like 2,695 times on the radio a day.Why? Plus I've heard the songs are too slow. This is too muchof an overrated CD! Buy the last album from Neil Young, GreatestHits it has better songs like his best, Down by the River, andthe great grunge, Hey Hey, My My. This is a waste of money.
A decent book that could have been great, Homes's novel came off underbaked. Too many implausible plot lines that are hastily tossed in, incomplete, cookie-cutter characters, and a seeming desire on the part of the author to recreate the Los Angeles of "L.A. Story" sabotage an otherwise compelling story of a man who is trying to find his life again.Were this story focused on its characters more and their actual issues instead of attempting to impress readers with the flash and bang of its irrelevant events, this would have been a much more interesting book. Even the book's title suggests that Homes did not have a clear grasp on the point of this novel, and she spends 384 pages wandering around the desert trying to find it.
Ultimately, this book is frustrating. It drones on like our own mundane lives, except the characters in the book are unbelievable. Everyone is an exaggeration. Too rich, too full of themselves, too over the top, too self serving.The conversations are all meaningless, except maybe the one where Richard's son tells him how he feels about their relationship.Even the ending of the book is unresolved and open ended.If you like reading for the sake of reading, I recommend it. If you're looking for inspiration to change your life, do what the hero did... walk out your door and open your eyes...
The photo and description do not reflect the product. The screen panel kit I received was white. What a huge inconvenience during a time-crunch.
This product is shown in its picture setup with a top. There is no top with this product and there are no supports or framework of any kind to set it up with. What you get is a white folded cloth in a bag.
The story plot of this movie sucked. It started going on a boat trip it ended going back on the same boat trip. She was in this time still world that she kept re-livin. The question is WHY. The movie did not give a reason. What happened to make her go into this state. It started in the time still state and ended the same way. I will never watch this movie again. I gave it one star because that is lowest grade I can go.
The movie was kind of low budget and more like a college film class movie/project than anything. Some disconnects in it where the story didn't make sense. The overall concept was interesting, using greek myth to drive the theme. B movie when you're bored.
What the hell? Weird and beyond disturbing. I had trouble figuring this one out. Didn't care for this one at all.
Only this and 'Sherlock Holmes' were grabbing my interest on the new Video On Demand releases. I was afraid this was going to be a slasher flick. I'm so glad I picked 'Triangle'. I haven't been this freaked out by a movie in a long time. There's truly some memorable scenes and one that gave me goose bumps towards the end. Superb directing, the atmosphere was just fantastic. Melissa George really showed her acting potential here, although I only have one other movie to compare to. And I'm like, who are these other actors? Surely one of them is going to completely bring the movie down in some way. Absolutely not. Solid acting all around. If you dig 'Twilight Zone' or just like freaky movies that make you think afterwards, you can't go wrong with this gem.
a movie that sneaks up on you. not a big budget. but an excellent film.and i like excellent films.
The plot and acting for this movie are terrible. The conclusion doesn't make any sense. I watched this movie because of the positive reviews. After watching the movie, I wonder if the positive reviewers were paid to review this movie. It is very frusterating to watch because the main character continues to make the same mistakes over and over again. The ending brings no closure. Spoiler: The beginning is the ending and the ending is the beginning. I suppose the writer thought it would be witty but it is just a ridiculous plot.
No one is perfect but a non-fiction is no use if you cannot trust the accuracy of the information in it. In Mistresses of Mayhem, Ms. Hornberger makes mistakes so blatant that it calls the whole book into question. One wonders if she did any research at all or just read up on the criminals on the Court Tv Website. She misnames Countess Elizabeth Bathory (the so-called female Dracula) as Bathroy. (No it is not a typo. It is spelled that way all through the book.) In the famous Diane Downs case already well documented by Ann Rule in Small Sacrifices and made into a tv movie seen by many, she misidentifies the daughter who died as Christie who might be surprised by this since Christie not only survived but testified against her mother. (Cheryl is the daughter who died but Hornberger describes Cheryl as testifying at the trial.) Simple proofreading could have corrected these mistakes. Good research would have made proofreading and this review unnecessary.
I am surprised at so many positive reviews. The prose in this book is very poor quality, it's simplistic, repeptitive and many times plain silly. It reads like a quick amateur effort. While I think that the autor is entitled to the right to fictionalize some characters or events, i can't understand why her language is so dismal.
I wouldnt call this a literary masterpiece or the best book that I have ever read, but I found it to be one of the most demanding--that I go back to it and finish as soon as possible!It's one of those literary candy novels that you can't put down. You will be up at night trying to find out who is sleeping with whom and killing whom next...The amount of sex in the book (without too much graphic detail) is numbing afterwards. It's almost as mundane as brushing one's teeth, after reading hundreds of pages on the role that sex plays in politics, weath, class, manipulation, etc.A harlequin story.Unbelievable society that Tudor was.So glad that women have it much better these days.The PILL did change history!
I bought this book as an assignment for my moms' book club. I could NOT put it down! If my history books had been this interesting in high school, I probably would have considered majoring in history in college! Gregory's writing is absolutely delicious. She enhances the historical facts with dialogue and really gives you a sense of how these characters lived and interacted. Now I am completely fascinated by historical novels. Another recommendation from my book club is Abundance, about Marie Antoinette. (Even if you don't read it, please know that Marie is NOT the one who said "Let them eat cake!" That infamous quote was actually uttered by a man and incorrectly attributed to her. She actually loved the French people.) Anyway, this novel is much better than the movie "The Other Boleyn Girl," which I did see, so if you saw the movie you should still read this book to really get the details of the story!
This is one of the best pieces of historical fiction that I have read. Very hard to put down, the story keeps you wondering what will happen next, even when you know the historical ending.A very enjoyable book to read!
For a classier historical novel about the Boleyns, I recommend The Lady in the Tower by Jean Plaidy.
I never really was all that interested in the whole Henry VIII thing but I was given this book and just started reading the first couple of pages. It really has a way of engaging you from the start. In the beginning Mary is only a little girl involved in this larger than life role she has to play. You follow her along with her exciting life, and just when things start to cool off for her, you become fixed on her sister. I loved reading how nasty the author made her. I know there are legends of how Ann really was a royal pain. The author did a good job playing it up. It really is quite long over 650 pages, but you wouldn't know it, I read it in 6 days. Its really a page turner. It really only portrays Ann, and Mary in depth, and I liked that. I also liked how the author depicts an aging, baby of a king who likes to get his own way. In the end the author does an amazing job wrapping up the looses ends to the already known facts making this history/fiction story a great read.
First let me say that the purchasing end of this exchange was excellent. The book reached me promptly and was in fine condition physically. If only the writing were at least half as fine. The conversations sounded 20th century, not remotely 16th century. Nor did they sound like genuine exchanges among the Boleyn siblings but instead like devices to let the reader know explicitly what was going on in the palaces and historically. The author's choice of starting with a wholly naive narrator (Mary in her early teens) and increasing her knowledge and perceptiveness was not unwise in itself, but was clulmsy in execution. She seems altogether too dense for too long, and even after she's much more worldly still frequently demonstrates her "cotton head". There's no denying that the Tudor era was racy and dangerous. If this is the only book at hand on that subject, grab it and skim.
A wonderfully written book that gives insight into a siginificant time in history with a very personnel look.
Book is very different than the movie, it's more indept. I enjoyed it, would recommend to fans of the Tudor age.
I loved this book. I seen the movie and have to say the book is so much better. I finished reading it then started reading it all over again. This was the first book I've read about Henry VIII and its inspired me to want to know everything I can about that time. Now I own over 30 books about Tudor history. I want to read everything I can get my hands on, and I never bore of it. And to think I owe it all to this book! It's from Mary Boleyn's point of view. You will see her challanges as well as Anne and the rest of their family. You will feel like your right there at court with them. It's an exciting and fearful time at the court of Henry VIII. It is also very accurate and I highly recommend it. Its one of Phillippa Greggory's better books. I've read all her books and this one is by far her best work. You will fall in love with the Tudor era if your not already.
This book, first and foremost, brings to life the pure beauty of Britain; the old houses, wildlife and its rather bizarre history and has made me very proud of where I come from.The Other Boleyn Girl is extremely readable and tells of the rise and fall of the Boleyn family. I have never been much of a person for history but this book certainly interested me and went beyond anything I could have learnt in history class.I recommend this book without really saying why (for fear of ruining parts) but coming from a history know nothing I say it is definitely worth a read if you want to know about the greed of one man and the unstoppable ambition of one tragic family.
I have to admit, I usually do not like historical fiction...this book was no exception. I read half, and read the end because it was boring.....
With an emphasis on the "fiction" part! This could've been a really good novel but it fell way short. I guess I just prefer historical fiction to be well, historical!
I liked how it started, with the beheading of a relative. And details of court life were interesting, at the beginning, but became tedious with the repetitiveness. This book really could have been half or one-third the size, it drug on and on and on. Getting to the end was a relief, I doubt I'll read another book by this author.
Anyone who treasures good historical fiction will, after reading--or trying to read--THE OTHER BOLEYN GIRL--see at once that they stumbled upon what we once called a "dime novel"-that pejorative characterizing hack writing, which in our time is seen most often in historical romances-novels peopled with superficial modern characters costumed in period dress. THE OTHER BOLEYN GIRL is such a novel. In our time of computers, the internet and blogs, the dime novel has been given new life through heavy promotion and phony critiques. It's a world where lies flourish, and publications such as "Publishers Weekly" with their fatuous critiques, become co-conspirators in this deception.
The hallmarks are all there--the air of virtue and innocence, the first love quickly disillusioned, jealousy, backbiting, a second romance that proves to be the reason for living--yes, we will someday see some actress playing Mary Boleyn on the Lifetime channel in "The Other Boleyn Girl." That's all this novel is fit for. Mary Boleyn is the most bovine "heroine" I've ever encountered, and Philippa Gregory's writing never gets above the Weepie of the Week level. The Boleyns are a fascinating subject for fiction; they aren't served well or made interesting by Gregory's book...
This book is a wonderfully and thrillingly written account of the machinations of the Boleyn-family to get close to the throne at the times of Henry VIII. Mary Boleyn is ordered by her family to be at King Henry's command whatever his wishes and whims. She obeys her family, since she is barely 13 when first presented to the king. She succeeds in keeping him at her side for a while, until his eyes begin to wander again and he seeks fulfilment (in every way) elsewhere. All of a sudden she is commanded to stand back and let her sister Anne bathe in the king's glory. In my opionion Mary was quite helpless, whereas her sister Anne is portrayed as a scheming whore. The author has a fabulous way with words and if you are interested in English history written at a wonderful pace as well as a thrilling account(in other words: you will probably be utterly, competely, totally unable to put this book down, once you have started) this is a book you simply cannot miss!
Just finished and I could go back and read it again. Ms. Gregory truly 'gets' the era, history and nuances of court life and brings to life how it affects each character.
It's one of the greatest books I've ever read. It's beautifully written. Gregory finds a great balance of description, not to much not to little. She has this great ability to make the reader feel as he were in that space and time. I also found that the author leaves you with the feeling of "wanting to find out more" which I find great. I finished this book last night (2am, couldn't stop reading)and first thing in the morning I was at the bookstore looking for more books on the topic. I'm going to start "The secret diary of Anne Boleyn" , I hope it's as good as this one. Don't miss this great read!!!
I breezed through this book and I found it a great read. I had a hard time with some of the stuff, like being married at twelve and the beheading, however, I enjoyed the view point from so long ago and how very difficult women had it. I have leant this book out and haven't gotten it back!
I had recorded this movie originally off of TV years ago. It is in my opinion one of the classics and it brought back plenty of memories. What I really appreciated with this DVD is that it included the viewer to watch the film at it was originally intented. It's definitely worth the price of admission.
I saw the newer version a couple years ago and never knew that it was a remake. Then I found out that Martin Milner was in it and I knew I had to see it. This was your typical old black and white movie. With the typical dialogue that you would think. But I thought this movie was really funny, i know it's not supposed to be but oh well. Different times during the movie the background would change to blue and then ghosts would appear in red. The problem that I didnt realize when I bought this movie was that you need those 3-D glasses to view the ghosts without straining your eyes. I really liked this movie. It wasnt as scary as the recent one but it was a good horror movie for the 60's.
I've bought two copies of this movie on DVD and each one was missing the ghost viewers. Buyer beware if you buy this DVD....you may get what you pay for or you may not.
Poor quality product. Great idea - my daughter was super-excited to get this one, but flash light broke right away, binoculars are not strong at all, thermometer on the whistle does not reflect outside temp-re properly. Very disappointing purchase.
The lovely watercolor print shows a pond skating scene, full of Holly Pond Hill bunnies in their victorian costumes. Very sweet! There is a little flap to open for each day of the advent season with a cute little surprise inside.It will stand upright on a table or under your tree. It can be stored for use in years to come.I'm looking forward to starting an advent calendar tradition with my toddler this year. She'll really enjoy those cute bunnies.
Worked perfectly from the start. Simple. Clean. No hassle. Pay close attention to instructions regarding using pump to stimulate ink flow, and avoid refilling a cartridge which has been empty for some time (it has dried up and may not refill properly). Also, as another reviewer mentioned, the calibration marks on the ink tank serve as an excellent guide to monitor how much ink has gone into the cartridge.Construction quality is very precise... much better than I would have expected for a product of this nature. This product will save HUGE dollars over feeding HP their profit gouging prices for OEM. Hooray!
Griffiths' QM text provides excellent problems and a coherent, though somewhat cryptic, development of the theory. He has a conversational style (also evident in his EM text) that elucidates many of the hard-to-visualize concepts in QM. However, he relies on the use of many specialized techniques to solve problems. If the student is unfamiliar with the mathematical tricks involved, it leads to frustration. I recommend Griffiths' text as the main book in a QM course only if it is supplemented with additional hints (from the professor) on the problems, or with an additional text such as Shankar's or the Eisberg and Resnick work.
Three words...BUY A BOPPY! Its not just for breastfeeding moms, though I can definately see how it would be a great asset for those who choose to breastfeed.I've used it during feedings, to take some strain off my arm (because baby can get heavy to hold in an upright position that is best for bottle feeding.) I've also used it to prop my baby up in a sitting position and she loves it! She looks so comfortable, I almost wish they made adult size boppys :-) I have also put it around my waist (and yes, it does bring back prego memories!) and layed the baby in it so she can snuggle close to me while my hands are free to do other things (read, change the channel, etc.) A great buy for every parent!
I don't have children yet, but my profession is a photographer, and with infants so little it's sometimes hard to get them in a perfect pose, the boppy is a great tool to get a natural look, you can cover it with a blanket to match whatever you want, so next time you go to get those special memories captured, bring along your boppy and introduce your favorite photographer to the boppy, ( i also prop it up a little if they are on a table, and the camera is fixed ie jcpenney or sears) Congrats to all and many smiles!!!
I LOVE THIS! I AM A FIRST TIME MOM WHO BREAST FEEDS MY BABY AND I FOUND THIS TO BE SUCH A LIFE SAVER! MY SON IS 9 MONTHS NOW AND WE STILL USE IT ALMOST EVERY FEEDING. IT SAVES YOUR ARM AND NECK FROM FEELING STRAINED AND HOLDS THE BABY AT JUST THE RIGHT LEVEL FOR NURSING. I HIGHLY RECOMMEND THIS PRODUCT TO ANY MOTHER.
I breastfed my daughter until she was a year old and found the Boppy to be pretty much useless. It wasn't the right height for nursing for me and I preferred to use a smaller pillow which conformed to my daughter's body better.We used it once or twice for sitting up, but most of the time, she was supported by my legs or multiple pillows. I think this is one of those products that's either love/hate--for us, it has to be the latter!
I went to target today to purchase this boppy. Apparently it has been recalled and they took all the other ones off the shelf. I don't know why it has been recalled yet but I wanted to warn the amazon buyers first.
I urge mothers to wait to purchase the boppy. I was sold by all the rave reviews, bought the pillow and never used it. I had an 8 lbs. 9 oz. baby boy and found it difficult to nurse him with it. It got in the way. Now it just sits in a corner. I guess I'll use it when he's learning to sit up to prop him up with. I urge mothers to borrow one first to see if they like it before spending the $.
We got this to support our arms while bottle feeding (though it seems to be known for breastfeeding-it is helpful to us bottle feeders as well.) The unique shape is great because it can be turned to be comfortable for different sized people and different height chairs. Also, our 2 week old loves to lie in it. It keeps him snuggled and supported and it gives our arms a break now and then! :) The pillow is so soft that sometimes when I snuggle with him in it that both of us take a little nap! It is a bit pricy (that's why it's 4 stars and not 5), but it makes a great gift!
This Boppy was very helpful in feeding my daughter during the early weeks of life. It also helped with laying her down when she was in the phase of waking up everytime you put her down. I would nurse her and then transfer her to the bed on the pillow, then remove the pillow. But most of all, I loved taking photos of my daughter with the clouds as the backround. It makes some of the most beautiful pictures when they are small and can't do much.
A warm and rather lighthearted movie that is pleasing to most tastes and obviously uplifting to the vast majority of reviewers here at Amazon. Not a whole lot of character development throughout the movie, but the characters are rather endearing nonetheless. Some will be skeptical as to the plausibility of such a prison set up, but it was refreshing to see an approach to incarceration that offers some real rehabilitation and redemption.
I saw this movie at a preview screening in L.A. and I thought it was amazing.... it was such a cute, original story and all the actors were great. Clive Owen (who was in Croupier last year) was especially good - he is going to be a big star. This is a movie for everyone who loved Saving Grace and Waking Ned Devine.
I had a hard time finishing this book. Not enough adventure for me. I was actually glad when I finally reached the end. I kept thinking the storyline might improve but to no avail. Definitely a disappointment.
While Golding is correct in that there is a dark side to human nature, he is a fool for having created such an implausible plot.Boys of that age rarely attack people under any circumstances.Instaed, they use more subtle forms of psychological warfare.They could only have acted like that if they had had to eat each other to survive. To expect boys to shrug off social conditioning in such a short time is, however absurd.
this book had good morals but it was so confusing, that to even understand one of the main points in the book i needed cliffs notes. some of it was exciting inside the chapter but i cant remember one cliffhanger chapter ending. trust me, if you are a teen, take it from another, unless FORCED to read this for school (like i was) dont read this book. it isnt worth your effort to read such a terrible book. whoever called it a classic is crazy
Golding certainly seems to root out the very psychology that lays behind the rudimentary world of the male youth. In magnificently eloquent prose and a deeply engrossing story to boot, Lord of the Flies has deservedly been dubbed a modern classic. One can relate to the actions of the characters simply because we were all once of that age and were all once driven by the same urges, impulses, and emotions that Golding so graphically and yet so effectively illustrates. An essential read there can be no doubt......
I believe that the author's purpose in the "The Lord of the Flies" was to show that without laws, there would be chaos in the world. To show that authority is trully needed in the world . I agree one hundred percent with this message because there is a need for consequences for people who refuse to listen to authority. The literary element that Golding handled the best was symbolism. For example, the conch was a symbol of authority and power. When the conch was broken , there was no authority , but complete chaos. This book is believeable because it is possible to get stranded on an island and it is possible for people to become mean and spiteful. The only bad thing about the book was some of the words were hard to understand. If I had written the book. I wouldn't have used such large discriptive words But " The Lord of the Flies" was a good book and I would recommend it to my friends or anyone looking for a good book to read.
Well written but definately not my "cup of tea". High reccomendations for those who enjoy this type of literature.
The noval "Lord of the flies" written by William Golding is one of the most complex books i have ever read. I love how this book makes you think and relate situations and characters to those in your own life. at first glance this noval may seem like its not worth reading but dont judge a book by its cover.the only reason i gave this book a 4 instead of 5 is that it diddnt seem very realistic for example: the boys age i didnt think they were old enogh to even really comprehend what they had done,also there seemed to be no remorse for death.But that is easily forgotton because of the intensity of this great book . Not only is this book entertaining and colorful but its also got a not so easily seen message.But through symbolism and getting to know the characters you will find that this book makes you see your society and yourself in a whole new way.
I had to read this book for literiture class I hated it. my teacher rattled on about the symbolizm in this book.It was so boring and kinda gory.Plus no girls, wasnt they susposed to repopulate the world after nuclear war so not possible wih only boys. The one thing i found interesting was how they acted like wild animals after they had been on the island a while.that was kinda cool.But it was to confusing
Well I have read this in 7th grade. I really don't think of it as a great novel. I have read better. It depends on what your taste in novels are I suppose. I know that this isn't a good review on this novel and I am sorry if this misleads you. Well, I suggest to read it before you decide whether or not you like it.
This book is not for a rainy day. Rainy day's are depressing and exploring the dark side of the human soul is no less. If you are into dreams leave this book on the shelf. If you want to feel like puking from the pit of stomach at the depts of human depravity this is the book for you.One sentence to describe this book:A daring expose of the cruelty of children and a slap on the wrist of anybody who thinks kids don't need discipline.
Well, how can I review this product when it still haven't arrived. It has apparently been resent but once again hasn't arrived. Very disappointed!!!!
As a response to one of the reviews that speaks quite highly of this novel, I would like to say that despite my understanding and comprehension of the book, I still found it entirely dull, boring, and a waste of my time. Since it was required of me to read this book in school, I was forced to make my way through each dragging chapter, but I would have never on my own time, and it's not because I didn't understand the book that I feel this way about it. My class discussed quite thouroughly about the book's symbolism, which was Golding's intention to start out with. Despite its hidden meanings, the novel still remains absolutely ridiculous in the sense that these young British boys turn completely salvage and kill their fellow islanders. If the book was looked at through a totally symbolic perspective, it would make more sense, but in order to understand its symbolism, one still has to read it, and it is really not worth it.
God this was terrible.A group of children are marooned on a deserted island and must survive on their own. We see the rise and fall of their society as order is achieved; power corrupts the strongest of the group and the weakest members are dismissed or destroyed and finally chaos rules.Despite my dislike of this book, I'll admit it is a very true commentary on society. The powerful abuse those weaker than them; how quickly rules become obsolete when they become inconvenient; the set roles of people in society (the chubby guy with glasses can never be as powerful as the cool, good-looking guy).If you are not being forced to read this for school, please don't do it! The Simpsons parody of it is also a good thing to watch. At least in a cartoon it is entertaining, with just as much commentary on society as the original.
Golding was trying to say that there is evil in everyone. I do agree on this theme becuase I don't think everyone is "good". I believe everyone does something that is evil. Although, some people have it in them more than others. I think the author used a lot of description which made it really boring. He also used too much violence, which in my opinion, only made it worse. I think this can happen to anyone who is in a plane crash. Being in this situatuion can get your mind crazy and make you do weird things, like the boys did. If it was me who wrote the book, I would use less description becuase is made it boring. I would also make it less vioent.
The lLord of the Flies is a great book. It is a book that should be used in every school, because is shows a great struggle for survival on a deserted island with basicly nothing.
I love this book, but I wasn't halfway through the introduction when I realized how painful it would be to have the author read it to me. He sighs and breathes heavy in the middle of sentences, speaks in a monotone voice, and makes all the characters sound the same, which makes it hard to tell who is saying what during the book's argument scenes.Overall, great story that deserved a professional voice actor to read it - somebody who could have made the story come alive. Any nuance the author could have added through his own insight into the story was lost in the lackluster presentation.
It was so boring i had to induce ain to stay awake while reading i
This book stunk. I believe that reality can have deeper meanings, but don't get to deep or you'll drown. The only time you can go that deep and not drown, is with drugs. I never thought Lord of the Flies would attract so many druggies.
I was disgusted by the grotesque display of savagery in this novel. I found it lacking purpose and realism. All I found in this novel is one man's sick views of humanity. I do not reccomend this novel to anyone, especially children.
Even though it's been years since I first encountered this novel, I still vividly recall the brave leadership of Ralph, the understanding innocence of Piggy, the thrill of the hunt, the smell of the pigs blood, and the intense primitive nature that takes dominion over the boys. The exploration of the various social interactions and the influence human nature has on them is intriguing and well delineated. However, the internal savagery that slowly and universally reveals itself amongst the characters proves to be the trues force which holds this novel high in my regard. Truly captivating and dangerously luring!
I would not reccomend this book. It was very boring and I didn't find much of a purpose. The end was the best part, but it was still bad. l did not get into this book or enjoy it. it was for school.
I am a fan of classic literature but this book was just too slow for me. Everyone should read it because it's a classic but I didn't enjoy it.
This is my favorite book yet (and by the way, I've read quite a few.) Not only is the symbolism masterful, but the book is thoroughly interesting and captivating as well. I am shocked at some of the criticisms of this work of such epic proportions. I honestly can't figure how anyone could find fault with it. I understand that it's not the most enjoyable of experiences to "read books for school," but this one is not one of the "boring" kind. The book is beautifully written and Golding's use of metaphor, allegory, and personification is consummate. Golding pulls all he can into this book, details from all walks of life. The book is incredible, as there is a vibrantly suspenseful surface story with ingenious characters and plot, as well as richly deep undertones of life and the depths of human heart and consciousness. All you have to do is read it.
this book came on time and was in good condition. It has been on my list of books to read for a very long time
LOTF is a short and simple novel with a deep subject matter. Golding tries to convey his beliefs in the innate evil in individual humanity through a story wrought with simplicity.Golding does a great job in developing the characters of LOTF. The characters (unlike the 90's movie) are quite believable. Each of the main characters have their own personality and are utilized by Golding to symbolize his ideas.Golding uses a lot of imagery and symbolism, but he does this in a manner that is easy to understand. His writing style is simple and clear and without all of the complex language that can bog down a good novel. This story flows at a nice pace and never seems to "drag on".I enjoyed this novel. Underneath the symbolism there was a fast-moving, suspenseful story. And Golding did a good job in making the reader of this novel contemplate the nature of man and society. It's well worth the read.
My favorite chapter in this book would definitely be the first chapter when the kids are introduced on the island. There was this one kid that everyone had called piggy. To me that is the funniest thing in the world. I don't know why but the humiliation of another kid is extremely hilarious. It may seem cruel but to me it's funny. I would have to say that this book was definitely for the older more mature kids, like high school kids. All in all I would have to say that even with the kid getting humiliated I dislike this book with a passion it is way to boring and just when you think it's going to get good the book disappoints you and I don't think that is a very good book for the serious reader
this book exists to support the author's opinion that man is brutish and destructive.this was written well before clinical studies of violance, child abuse, the effects of peer pressure, etc. it reflects the basic christain view that man is vile.itis obvious that golding never considers that by the time any of these boys has spent time in their families and then in the prep school, any natural impulse has been thoroughly ground out bysocial standards. these boys are as affected by all they psychological influences as adults, with fewer methods to deal with them.of course they revert to so-called savagery--it's what they experienced at their school. of course there are no intelligent responses, we aren't trained to use intelligent response.the book is a polemic of the conservative christian--man is vile and must be controlled or he will become a savage.nurture has no place.i find it a completely annoying book, presenting an unrealistic result.
It's great ordering a book, and the book was good, but the delivery took so long that I had to go to the bookstore and get it for my daughters class anyway, so it was really a waste. Shouldn't take over two weeks to get a book.
I was required to read this book for school in my Honors English Class(9th grade), I found it very hard to follow and too symbolic. This is the book of dreams for any English teacher who loves to get their students to read between the lines. Personally, I enjoy a book that is a challenging read, but in this book, every little detail meant something "deeper" and it gave me a headache trying to interpret the aspect of society the detail was trying to depict. I understood the book, but, it was not enjoyable for me and if it were not a required reading, I would not have read the book otherwise. But, if you like books to give you a headache, then this is perfect for you.
We think that the book, Lord of the Flies, was just 'ok'. It was an intense way of looking at a goodlife. We believe that the message of the novel was always have hope. We thought it could have ended better, but it pulled it all together well. Although we were bored at times, we liked the way Golding had items symbolize ideas. The book was different then ones we have read in the past, therefore, it broadened our views of good versus evil.
I first read this book at a young age. I enjoyed it very greatly then. Not as an allagory for anything or as anything of that sort but as a story of adventure and survival. Recently I have read it with my english class and explored the symbolism and allegories. I think that the lord of the flies is a very strong book with a strong message that can be understood at many levels and I think that this is a book that ever family that enjoys reading should own. The Lord of the Flies can be enjoyed and reread by people of all ages and spending an hour to read up on the symbolism in this book is well worth it as it enriches the story alot and provides a whole new meaning to the book. 5/5 for a great read for all ages.
I loved this book. It explores social interactions between young males, and the limits of the conscience. The ending was shocking... be prepared for an exciting story! (This is middle school reading)
The Lord of the Flies by William Golding wasn't as good as I thought it was going to be. I thought that the idea of the book was very good and the theme was well thought out, but i don't think it was well written. Some parts could have been better, but it was interesting. Somethings I disliked were that there were only boys on the island and no girls. If there were girls I think the story would have been different. I also didn't like how Piggy died. I think the book would have had a better ending if Piggy stayed alive.Some things that i liked about the book were most of it was realistic. The schoolboys made rules for themselves, and there became two sides. I liked how the characters were described and how the meanings of their names mathed their actual names.
I think it was a good book because the story was very interesting and easy to read . The message of the novel is very important important because it relates to ancient times, morden times and the future you must read this book.
This is a book for every teen to read. It gives the feelng of pride... and intense excitment!
I read this book two years ago for a grade 10 English class, and have not had the chance to reread it, but I do remember it well. The premise is not especially exciting initially, but it becomes a living parable of terror.I find it interesting that the author used boys as his subjects rather than little girls, or both. But would this have changed the outcome? That is something you must decide for yourself. Also, when finally "saved", the naval officer is confused as to what the boys are doing exactly, and yet Ralph knows exactly. Perhaps children are not as intellectually inferior as we are assumed to be.Though chilling, I highly recommend this book, as it gives a startling clear view of broken society. It's pessimistic, but perhaps, all too realistic.
This is one of those novels that everyone should read. Through isolation on a remotes island, we get to glimpse the life of these young boys and how chaos takes over their uncivilized new world. The refelection on human nature may be frightening but it is riveting and honest.Lord of the Flies is a short and easy read, and it should not be missed. I highly recommend this novel!
I cannot say enough about this book. There is so much depth in it and so much ot think about. There's more than just an innocence lost thing in it -like the choir leader, Jack, becoming the most evil on the island. I think Golding meant to imply that innocence is an illusion, as shallow as the choir boys' outfits. Being a substitute teacher for both high school and middle school, I would vouch Golding's implications hold true even for kids who aren't lost on desserted islands. Ultimately, the island signifies a pre-adolescent's experience, as being cut off from the world while admist a wild sway of new emotions. I'm glad this book exists, because peopel need access to eloquent articulation of youth's experiences.
Friends who know I`m interested in war history recommended this book. But this is not war history. This is a rather banal love story mixed up with a lot of bloody details. If you are looking for the real stuff, go somewhere else.
This book was written in 1987! Technically speaking, it's completely out of date.My major criticism, though, is the low value of the content. Do we really need to be taught that soft or pastel colors appeal more to women? Not only is that kind of thinking outdated, but who needs to read a book with that level of "information"?
I dunno about the stand-alone Blu Ray, but the DVD of "Otis" has a ton of great extras (commentary, deleted/alternate scenes/ending, featurette, trailers, etc.). This version, however, has no extras whatsoever. I thought the point of Blu Ray was being able to jam more on the disc while maintaining superior picture quality.On the plus side, "Dr. Giggles" has never looked better, and this seems to be the only Blu Ray release of that film. Though it's weird that they've paired it with a completely unrelated movie made nearly 20 years later.If you're only interested in the films themselves, you can't beat the price. But the lack of extras is irksome.
I am a big Jane Austen's fan, and I love to read the continuations and sequels. However, I had trouble finishing this book. The break in the writing between Austen's original text and the addition is glaring. The style changes, the characters change, the plot leaps wildly. It's almost like two books -- the author shouldn't have bothered keeping the original text. She probably would have done better rewritting it to fit her own style. I highly recommend reading the other Sanditon continuation by Anne Telscombe instead. It does a seamless job of continuing and the characters stay in character.
This was a dull read that I had to force myself to finish. The plot wanders aimlessly and is hard to follow. Mnay of the other continuations are better than this so I would recommend saving your money.
While the finished product--a working phone with see-through cover and flashing lights--is great, this toy is definitely not easy to assemble. It took a bright 9-year-old, her 40-year-old aunt, and the child's grandfather (well-versed in electronics) two hours or more to finally get all the pieces in place! The parts seem to be well made and the phone really *does* work, but the directions are very difficult to understand and there was no explanation whatsoever of how a phone works. In short, what was supposed to be a fun "learning experience" turned out to be an exercise in frustration. This kit is probably best suited for teenagers or adults who already have some background in electronics.
This battery operated little jewel allows playing of old 78's and stillsounds reasonable in it's single onboard speaker mode. It also has thestandard stereo outputs to drive an external soound system for all threeRPMs. All this and it's built to pack around.My wife called it one of the best electronics purchases I've ever made..
Techno, house, ambient, dance, electronica, whatever you want to call it, "Everything is Wrong" is just great music by a great artist. It has everything a fan of pop music could want.
We love reading this book to our six month old. It has a rhythm to it that makes it so much fun. The illustrations are adorable and the story-line is very creative. The cardboard books are best for a young baby who likes to turn the pages too.I give this book as gifts all the time.
First of all, I am quite offended by this author. I am a licensed speech-language pathologist with 30 years of experience in the public school system. I am currently working as a special education coordinator in (heaven forbid) a public school system. I read about children and their issues/concerns/characteristics continuously. This book was recommended by a parent and I was very excited to read it. I was not prepared for the assault on speech-language pathologists and others in the public schools of America. I truly wish the author would do a more thorough investigation of our credentials and our job performances. We are not in the business of "creating business". Believe me, we have plenty to keep us busy. We are, however, very dedicated to children and their needs....whether that involves "Einstein type children", Asperger's, Autistic, Hyperlexic, Attention Deficit Disordered, Gifted or any of the multitude of diagnoses.
If you have a child that is late with speech development, seems frustrated with communications, strong willed & defiant, prone to tantrums, good at solving puzzles, loving but sometimes aloof, concentrates on some tasks, ignores requests to perform other tasks, not the least interested in potty training, exhibiting some autistic or PDD tendancies but having exceptional memory and suprising intelligence, then you need to get this book. Don't be put off by reviews of the professionals, the book has some information that will help concerned parents bypass those professional egos and cut to the main issue, how to best understand and help your child.
I bought this for my grandson, he has already written in for several grants, and working on more. This is a great gift for any high school kid, and even kids in college. I don't believe the parents should go into debet for this, the kids will do much better if they have to work for it. I've seen to many parents almost go broke with several kids at college at the same time. They end up with nothing for retirement. Believe me, you need a nest egg.Take if from a grandma that has a great pension.
I'm not much for writing book reviews, but this book was so good that I decided to do so anyway. The author has really done a comprehensive treatment of the subject of college scholarships. This is the scholarship book to get.
This book is very informative. Ben Kaplan manages to convey the information in a fun and lighthearted manner. This is a great book for parents and students alike.
I guess it makes one feel intellectually in touch if he can praise this book. I guess I will never make it to that level, because I think this is one terrible book. I read approximately 100 pages on the traits of Fox Edwards, therefore, I was a little upset when I found out it was for no reason. I read with interest the last few pages where I found out that Wolfe's editor had to piece together several parts of this book, and then he had to write many pages in order to tie this mess together. All of this occured after Wolfe's death. I believe this is a collection of ramblings from Thomas Wolfe. I am sure that I can be attacked verbally for not understanding the meaning of this great work, but if it was truly a great work, I would not have missed its significance. Please, play with the kids, walk around the block, start drinking, but don't waste your time on this book.
Let's see now ... have you bought in to the "PowerPoint," bullet-ed, "concise" notion of literature (i.e., stupid, undeveloped, soul-less notion of expressing what it is to be human?) --In THAT case, you will find the works of Thomas Wolfe (as you find the works of Marcel Proust or Thomas Mann) a great big bore. Otherwise ... you will NOT find them a bore; but the very opposite of a bore:--a source of inspiration, of joy, of excitement, of the quintessence of life.
I have always been a fan of Orson Welles on radio and television. Having collected a ton of radio broadcasts on CD and audio cassette and having watched most of his movies, I appreciate the genius of his work. I picked up a copy of this book recently and am amazed at the amount of research put into it. An aspect of Welles rarely discussed is his magic career. At the Mid-Atlantic Nostalgia Convention this September in Aberdeen, Maryland, I plan to attend the presentation about Orson Welles and his magic career so I can watch rare footage and films with Welles, and get an even deeper insight to his trickery. Book comes recommended.
We've used this product for many years. It cleans stainless steel coffee pots perfectly. They shine better than they did when new.
I still have not receivied what I ordered and paid for. They claim the first shippemnt was damaged and have yet to ship a replacement. Three phone calls were not returned from them. The vendor is very slow to resolve the problem. They said it would be here last week, now it is this week. I have no confidence that they will ever deliver the product.
The main character was insufferable. Parker has tried to create a male Spencer but fails miserably. She appears to be without fault and has an answer for everything. At least Spencer admits to feet of clay. The plot was implausible.
Yeah, same wisecracking dialogue, sidekicks, and relationship quandaries as the Spenser novels.Realized the plot was familiar a few chapters in-- lifted from previous early Spencer novel.Characterizations inconsistent and contrived if not absurd-- a lot of villainous stereotypes-- and the plot point that the whole story is based on is ludicrous.There are much better written "guilty pleasures" than this one-- some by the same author.
Being a huge Spenser fan I am of course a Robert B. Parker fan. Sunny Randall makes her debut in this yarn of sex, deceit and extortion. Not his best but getting his feet wet with this new female perspective, he makes more than a solid effort. (he gets the ball rolling in following tales) I'm grateful to Mr. Parker and his pen (figuratively???) If you are a fan...don't miss it. If you're not...WHY not???!!!!
Listening to the song 'Alone' right now compels me to write this review. If nothing, buy this CD only for this track. A 10-minute long epic ambient composition. Showcases the genius that Moby is. There are several other very good songs on this album. This album is predominantly hard/punk rock with some softer ambient pieces sparsed in between. Most people know Moby for his work on techno and ambient music, but here Moby shows his versatility by doing an equally good job with hard rock. Many of the songs have him screaming at the top of his voice, but rest assured, they are still good and not average hard/punk rock music. Again, Moby shows that he doesn't go by what sells. Rather he goes by his artistic instinct and likes to experiment with different genres of music.Most of Moby's works are highly underrated and misunderstood. This is one of them. Moby's music is intelligent music. Unfortunately, not many people can understand or appreciate that.
The autumn series its just amazing,I first bought them in ebooks but it was so good thAt I had to buy the complete series in paperback.It's amazing how after so many books the author keeps you in suspense and doesn't get boring,this Moody guy it's really gifted.
Alot of stuff for Nokia is GSM only. Pull off your battery, and take a look at your Nokia phone. The older phones that alot of people carry is TDMA/CDMA, like the 5185. Guess what? It dosen't work.
this is the best book i have ever read on jesus other than the bible. this man was very knowledgeable about his subject. he was also very familiar with his subject [jesus] as you will see when you read this book. no christian should be without this book in his library.
I do not intend to review content here. This new edition is so full of typographical errors that sometimes the reader will have to intuit what the author really wrote. It is clear that the proofreaders of this edition were not actually reading; they were simply following the little red lines under the "misspelled" words. This has resulted in some truly bizarre apparent statements by the author, unreproducible here due to copyright laws. Disclaimer-- I have not purchased this book, merely checked it out of the library.
This book is overrated by a longshot. If I didn't know any better I could swear that this book wasn't even edited! Turtledove has 50 things going on at once! There are too many characters and too little continuity. I would recommend this book to anyone who has insomnia.
Turtledove certainly has a good grasp of history but the quality of his writing is only so-so. When you combine this with a very long plot development and stereotypical characters it is almost impossible to finish 
